Louisiana, session 2026, HB2.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of Louisiana:
Section 1.(A) The following sums or so much thereof as may be necessary are
hereby appropriated out of any monies in the state treasury from the sources specified, from
federal funds and self-generated revenues belonging to the state of Louisiana and/or
collected by boards, commissions, departments, and agencies thereof, all for making capital
outlay and for the purposes and in the amounts specified herein for the Fiscal Year
commencing July 1, 2026, and ending June 30, 2027, subject to the conditions thereafter
provided:
A project with funding payable from General Obligation Bonds Priority 1
indicates that the funding for the project includes the reauthorization of funding which was
previously granted as a line of credit by the State Bond Commission in Fiscal Year 2025-
2026. As used in this Section, the term "general obligation bonds" means state general
obligation bonds or other evidences of indebtedness payable from the Bond Security and
Redemption Fund. The amount set forth in this Section opposite each project, or so much
thereof as may be necessary, is hereby appropriated and payable from the source of funding
indicated; provided, however, amounts appropriated and payable from federal funds may be
encumbered or expended only to the extent such amounts shall have been committed or
received. Pursuant to the provisions of R.S. 39:82, funds for planning, acquisition,
construction, and major repair projects appropriated by this Act may be retained until
completion of the project, even if no bona fide liability exists on the last day of the fiscal
year.
Page 1 of 174

HB NO. 2 ENROLLED
This Act shall constitute the comprehensive state capital outlay budget for the
2026-2027 Fiscal Year. Projects set forth which are payable from the proceeds available
from the sale of general obligation bonds shall have the priorities as indicated. The Request
for Line of Credit form used by the attorney general and Bond Counsel in evaluating
Louisiana Constitutional, Internal Revenue Code, and applicable income tax regulations
shall be filed with the commissioner of administration, State Bond Commission, and state
attorney general. No general obligation bond cash lines of credit shall be granted to fund
any lower priority project prior to the granting of general obligation bond cash lines of credit
to fund all higher priority projects (the "general rule"), except as hereinafter provided. This
prohibition against funding a lower priority project shall not apply upon a showing of an
impossibility or impracticality either to proceed with all unfunded higher priority projects
or to proceed with the funding of such projects or any part thereof through the issuance of
general obligation bonds for any reason. Such showing shall be stated in reasonable detail
in a certificate or certificates signed by the state agency responsible for administering the
funding, and filed with the commissioner of administration and the State Bond Commission
(hereinafter referred to as "the Commission"). Upon a determination by the Commission
that proceeding with such a project or the funding thereof through the issuance of general
obligation bonds is impractical or impossible, the Commission may then proceed with the
sale of general obligation bonds or the granting of cash lines of credit without regard to the
priority of the unfunded projects determined to be impossible or impractical.
Upon recommendation by the state agency responsible for administering the
funding, if it is determined at any time that proceeding with the project or with the funding
thereof is no longer impossible or impractical, the State Bond Commission may rescind the
certificate of impossibility or impracticality and may proceed with the project or with the
issuance of general obligation bonds or the granting of cash lines of credit to fund the
project. Alternatively, the Interim Emergency Board (hereinafter referred to as "the Board"),
upon reviewing certificates as described above and determining that proceeding with such
projects or the funding thereof through the issuance of general obligation bonds is
impossible or impractical, may designate a lower priority for such projects. The Board's
determination and lower priority designation shall be submitted to the members of the
legislature for their approval in accordance with the provisions of Chapter 3-B of Subtitle
Page 2 of 174

HB NO. 2 ENROLLED
I of Title 39 of the Louisiana Revised Statutes of 1950. In accordance with the provisions
of Chapter 3-B of Subtitle I of Title 39 of the Louisiana Revised Statutes of 1950, whenever
at the written request of the appropriate legislators and agency, the Board determines that
an adjustment to a project description originally set forth in such capital budget adopted by
the legislature for a current fiscal year is necessary to correct a mistake in a project
description, clarify a description, change the scope of a description, or make any other
adjustment the Board deems necessary to implement the purpose of the project, such
adjustment shall become effective only upon the approval by majority vote of the elected
members of each house of the legislature in the manner provided for in Chapter 3-B of
Subtitle I of Title 39 of the Louisiana Revised Statutes of 1950.
If such approval is granted, notification by the chair or secretary of the Board of
the results of the balloting shall be transmitted to the State Bond Commission, which may
then proceed with the sale of general obligation bonds or the granting of cash lines of credit
for each change approved upon request of the commissioner of administration in accordance
with the general rule.
With respect to Priorities 1 through 5, a lower priority project may be moved to
a higher priority only upon a showing of an emergency or other cause not reasonably
anticipated by the legislature, which shall be stated in reasonable detail in a certificate signed
by the head of the appropriate department, political subdivision, or agency and filed with the
commissioner of administration and the Board. Upon a determination by the Board that such
project should be moved to a higher priority because of an emergency or other cause not
reasonably anticipated by the legislature, the Board shall designate a higher priority to the
project. The matter then shall be submitted to and be subject to the same approval by the
members of the legislature in the manner previously indicated in this Section. If such
approval is granted, notification by the chair or secretary of the Board of the change of
priority shall be transmitted to the State Bond Commission, which then upon request of the
commissioner of administration, may proceed with the sale of general obligation bonds or
the granting of cash lines of credit in accordance with the general rule. As to projects within
a priority, the State Bond Commission acting on requests submitted by the commissioner of
administration shall determine when such project, or phases thereof, shall be funded. In
making such determination, the State Bond Commission shall consider the amount of
Page 3 of 174

HB NO. 2 ENROLLED
proceeds of general obligation bonds to be made available in light of money and capital
market conditions; the expenditure requirements of the project; the time required for
architectural plans and drawings, public bidding, and site acquisition and preparation;
availability of receipt of federal monies; litigation affecting the undertaking or completion
of a project; federal tax laws and regulations regarding the sale of municipal bonds; and
other items of a similar nature bearing upon the possibility or the necessity to commence a
project or any particular phase thereof.
Any other provision of this Act to the contrary notwithstanding, projects
described in Priority 5 of this Act shall not be moved to a higher priority except upon one
of the following conditions: (1) Funding is necessary to complete or additionally fund a
project located elsewhere in the Capital Outlay Act. Determination of such condition shall
be made by the head of the appropriate department or agency by means of a certificate to
that effect filed with the Interim Emergency Board, who shall, by mail ballot, request
approval of such change and if approved by a majority of each house of the legislature it
shall be funded, or (2) unless required by an emergency or other cause not reasonably
anticipated by the legislature, to be in accordance with procedures set forth in this Section.
However, the State Bond Commission may authorize a non-cash line of credit for any
project in Priority 5 which represents that portion of construction contracts which were let
during a previous fiscal year, or construction contracts which will be let during the current
fiscal year, but which will not require cash expenditures during the year. Such non-cash
lines of credit, when combined with previously sold bonds or with higher priority bonds or
lines of credit, or with funds appropriated from other sources, will provide sufficient
appropriated funds to award equipment or construction contracts. Contracts shall not be
awarded without approval of the division of administration.
Upon approval by the State Bond Commission, and subject to compliance with
its policies and procedures and the procedures set forth herein, a line of credit providing for
the use of funds in anticipation of the sale of general obligation bonds may be granted to the
appropriate administering agency or department from the Comprehensive Capital Outlay
Escrow Account, or if there is not a sufficient amount available in such account, from other
available state cash in the state treasury, for capital improvement projects for which bond
proceeds are appropriated by a current capital budget, prior to the actual issuance of bonds
Page 4 of 174

HB NO. 2 ENROLLED
for such projects, unless the attorney general advises that an impediment exists to the valid
issuance of the bonds on the date such line of credit is granted.
All bonds that are to be repaid, in whole or in part, by revenues generated by the
project shall be designated as "Reimbursement Bonds." The State Bond Commission shall
enter into such agreements as are necessary to provide that the agency or subdivision, whose
project is reimbursable, shall pay the bond debt costs into the Bond Security and Redemption
Fund. Such costs may be paid annually or at the end of the term of the bonds issued as
determined by the State Bond Commission.
Priority 1 general obligation bond funding shall be limited to:
(1) Projects and amounts which were previously authorized by Act 2 of the 2025
Regular Session of the Legislature; and which were granted cash lines of credit by the State
Bond Commission. The bonds to fund these projects were not sold in Fiscal Year 2025-
2026.
(2) The reauthorization of the portion of the outstanding Fiscal Year 2025-2026
Priority 5 Non-Cash Lines of Credit for projects which will require cash expenditures in
Fiscal Year 2026-2027 and therefore must be converted to Cash Lines of Credit in Fiscal
Year 2026-2027.
(3) Commitments made in the Higher Education Desegregation Settlement
Agreement.
Priority 2 general obligation bond projects are for the completion of plans and
specifications, land acquisition, site preparation, or for construction which will begin during
the fiscal year. It is presently anticipated that the listed projects will require the sale of
bonds or extension of lines of credit during the fiscal year after adoption of this Act.
Priority 3 general obligation bond projects are for the preparation of plans and
specifications, land acquisition, site preparation, or for construction and shall be limited to
funding for the portion of construction contracts which will not require cash expenditures
during the fiscal year. The projects in this category shall be considered future year projects
in the state's five-year capital outlay plan. It is presently anticipated that the listed projects
will not require the sale of bonds or extension of lines of credit during the fiscal year.
Priority 4 general obligation bond projects are for the preparation of plans and
specifications, land acquisition, site preparation, or for construction and shall be limited to
Page 5 of 174

HB NO. 2 ENROLLED
funding for the portion of construction contracts which will not require cash expenditures
during the fiscal year. The projects in this category shall be considered future year projects
in the state's five-year capital outlay plan. It is presently anticipated that the listed projects
will not require the sale of bonds or extension of lines of credit during the fiscal year.
Priority 5 general obligation bond funding shall be limited to funding for the
portion of construction contracts which will not require cash expenditures during the fiscal
year. These funds, when combined with previously sold bonds or with higher priority bonds
on lines of credit, or with funds appropriated from other sources, will provide sufficient
appropriated funds to award contracts. Non-cash lines of credit shall be required prior to the
award of these contracts.
In accordance with the cash management plan adopted pursuant to R.S.
48:251(D) and the provisions of Act 161 of the 1998 First Extraordinary Session, the
Department of Transportation and Development is authorized to enter into contracts or
agreements for projects approved pursuant to the Highway Priority Program, Airport
Construction and Development Priority Program, Port Construction and Development
Priority Program, and Statewide Flood Control Program for projects bid and awarded,
authorized, or commenced during the fiscal year which do not require cash expenditures for
the full contract or agreement amount.
EXECUTIVE DEPARTMENT
01/107 DIVISION OF ADMINISTRATION
(576744) State Office Buildings Major Repairs, Equipment
Replacement, and Renovations, Planning and Construction
(Statewide)
Payable from General Obligation Bonds
Priority 1 $ 5,000,000
Priority 5 $ 7,110,000
Payable from Federal Funds via Interagency Transfers $ 10,000,000
Total $ 22,110,000
(576969) Shreveport Storage Facility, Planning and Construction
(Caddo)
Payable from State General Fund (Direct) Non-Recurring
Revenues $ 1,440,000
(576970) Storage Building Renovation and Paved Catering Pad,
Louisiana Governor's Mansion, Planning and Construction
(East Baton Rouge)
Payable from State General Fund (Direct) Non-Recurring
Revenues $ 798,000
Page 6 of 174

HB NO. 2 ENROLLED
(576981) Pentagon Barracks Repair Brick Walls/Mitigate Rising
Damp, Planning and Construction
(East Baton Rouge)
Payable from General Obligation Bonds
Priority 5 $ 33,900,000
(576983) Exterior Waterproofing and Repairs, Chief Justice
Pascal F. Calogero, Jr. Courthouse, Planning and
Construction
(Orleans)
Payable from General Obligation Bonds
Priority 1 $ 4,080,818
Priority 5 $ 22,300,000
Total $ 26,380,818
(576986) Exterior Waterproofing at State Capitol Building, Planning
and Construction
(East Baton Rouge)
Payable from General Obligation Bonds
Priority 1 $ 28,890,540
Priority 5 $ 60,200,000
Total $ 89,090,540
(576989) Renovations and Additions, Louisiana Governor's
Mansion, Planning and Construction
(East Baton Rouge)
Payable from General Obligation Bonds
Priority 5 $ 2,000,000
Payable from State General Fund (Direct) Non-Recurring
Revenues $ 225,000
Total $ 2,225,000
(578157) Community Water Enrichment Program
(Statewide)
Payable from General Obligation Bonds
Priority 5 $ 11,000,000
Payable from State General Fund (Direct) Non-Recurring
Revenues $ 5,000,000
Total $ 16,000,000
(578163) Local Government Assistance Program
(Statewide)
Payable from General Obligation Bonds
Priority 5 $ 10,000,000
Payable from State General Fund (Direct) Non-Recurring
Revenues $ 3,000,000
Payable from the balance of State General Funds (Direct)
previously allocated under the authority of Act 485 of
2021 for Abbeville Harbor and Terminal District, Port of
Vermillion South Slip Entrance Emergency Dredging,
Planning and Construction (Vermilion), Act 29 of 2018
for Madison Parish Port, Harbor and Terminal District,
Improvements to Madison Parish Port former Northrop
Grumman Shipbuilding Expansion (Madison), Act 485 of
2021 for Acadia Parish, Street Improvements on Hains
Road, Planning and Construction (Acadia), Act 2 of 2004
for Bossier Parish, Drainage Improvements Mimosa
Gardens Subdivision, Planning and Construction
(Bossier), Act 2 of 2020 for Jefferson Parish, Brown
Avenue Roadway Reconstruction Between the Westbank
Expressway and 36th Street, Planning and Construction
Page 7 of 174

HB NO. 2 ENROLLED
(Jefferson), Act 465 of 2023 for St. Mary Parish, Facility
and Infrastructure Improvements at Kemper Williams
Park Near Patterson, Planning and Construction (St.
Mary), Act 29 of 2018 for Abita Springs, Water Lines and
Sewer Lines, Extensions and Upgrades, Planning and
Construction (Cash and/or In-Kind Match Required) (St.
Tammany), Act 29 of 2018 for Arcadia, Drainage
Improvement Louisiana Highway 151 and Gap Farm
Road, Planning and Construction (Bienville), Act 117 of
2022 for Haughton, Additional Water Supply Wells and
Elevated Tank, Planning and Construction (Bossier), Act
20 of 2019 for Lake Arthur, Repair and Upgrades to City
Hall, Planning and Construction (Jefferson Davis), Act 29
of 2018 for Opelousas, Opelousas Infrastructure
Renovation Program, Planning and Construction (St.
Landry), Act 465 of 2023 IEB for Thibodaux, Andolsek
Park, Planning and Construction (Lafourche), Act 485 of
2021 for Capitol City Family Health Center, Inc. Care
South Medical and Dental Expansion, Planning and
Construction (East Baton Rouge), Act 2 of 2025 for
Capitol City Family Health Center, Inc., Care South
Medical and Dental Expansion, Planning and
Construction (East Baton Rouge), Act 20 of 2019 for East
Baton Rouge Sheriffs Office, Renovation of Special
Operations/Detectives Building, Planning and
Construction (East Baton Rouge), Act 485 of 2021 for
Monroe Downtown Economic Development District for
Monroe Riverwalk, Planning and Construction
(Ouachita), Act 21 of 2010 for West Feliciana School
Board, Julius Freyhan Cultural/Conference Center,
Planning and Construction
(West Feliciana) $ 2,103,730
Total $ 15,103,730
(578882) Major Repairs, Equipment Replacement and Renovations
for State Buildings to Address Deferred Maintenance
Backlog and Infrastructure, Planning and Construction
(Statewide)
Payable from General Obligation Bonds
Priority 1 $ 5,000,000
Priority 5 $ 25,000,000
Payable from the balance of Interest Earnings previously
allocated under the authority of Act 52 of 2011 for
Division of Administration, Supplemental Funding, New
Orleans State Office Facility (Orleans), Act 26 of 2005
for Division of Administration, Emergency Major
Repairs, Planning and Construction (Statewide), Act 54
of 2013 for Nunez Community College, Replace
Administration Building at Nunez Community College,
Chalmette (Supplemental Funding) (St. Bernard), Act 485
of 2021 for Office of Wildlife, Region 5/Lake Charles
Office
(Calcasieu) $ 349,354
Payable from the balance of State General Funds (Direct)
previously allocated under the authority of Act 21 of 2000
for Division of Administration, Technical College
Campus Buildings Major Repairs, Equipment
Replacement and Site Work, Planning and Construction
(Statewide), Act 29 of 1998 for Division of
Administration, Technical College Campus Buildings
Page 8 of 174

HB NO. 2 ENROLLED
Major Repairs, Equipment Replacement and Site Work,
Planning and Construction (Statewide), Act 485 of 2021
for Department of Veterans Affairs, Northwest LA
Veterans Cemetery Expansion (Caddo), Act 5 of 2024 for
Office of Behavioral Health, Center Building and Fire
Alarm System Renovation and Restoration, East
Louisiana State Hospital, Planning and Construction (East
Feliciana), Act 20 of 2019 for Office of Secretary,
Atchafalaya Basin Protection and Enhancement (Federal
Match and Local/Sponsor Match) (Assumption,
Avoyelles, Iberia, Iberville, Pointe Coupee, St. Landry,
St. Martin, St. Mary), Act 465 of 2023 for Louisiana Tech
University, Carson-Taylor Hall Renovation, Planning and
Construction (Lincoln), Act 2 of 2020 for McNeese State
University, ADA Upgrades Campus-Wide, Planning and
Construction
(Calcasieu) $ 1,467,673
Total $ 31,817,027
(578883) Repair, Restoration and Replacement for Declared
Disasters, Planning, Construction, Renovation, and
Acquisition
(Statewide)
Payable from General Obligation Bonds
Priority 1 $ 58,874,753
Priority 5 $ 53,000,000
Payable from Federal Funds via Interagency Transfers $ 70,000,000
Total $ 181,874,753
(578884) Outstanding Percent for Arts Projects
(Statewide)
Payable from General Obligation Bonds
Priority 1 $ 5,233,845
Priority 5 $ 5,000,000
Total $ 10,233,845
(578971) Statewide Roofing Asset Management Program and
Waterproofing, Related Repairs and Equipment
Replacement Program
(Statewide)
Payable from General Obligation Bonds
Priority 5 $ 5,000,000
Payable from State General Fund (Direct) Non-Recurring
Revenues $ 4,335,000
Total $ 9,335,000
(578975) Deferred Maintenance and Capital Improvements on
Public Postsecondary Educational Institutions, Planning
and Construction
(Statewide)
Payable from General Obligation Bonds
Priority 5 $ 100,000,000
Payable from the balance of State General Funds (Direct)
previously allocated under the authority of Act 776 of
2024 for the Office of Wildlife, Region 5/Lake Charles
Office (Calcasieu), Act 2 of 2025 for Southern University
- Baton Rouge, A.O. Williams Hall Renovations,
Planning and Construction (East Baton Rouge), Act 2 of
2025 for Mcneese State University, Contraband Bayou
Erosion Retaining Wall, Phase II, Planning and
Construction (Calcasieu), Act 2 of 2025 for University of
Page 9 of 174

HB NO. 2 ENROLLED
Louisiana - Lafayette, Madison Hall Renovation,
Planning and Construction (Lafayette), Payable from the
balance of State General Fund (Direct) Non-Recurring
Revenues from Act 5 of 2024 for Fletcher Technical
Community College, Precision Agriculture Training
Facility, Planning and Construction
(Terrebonne) $ 14,000,000
Payable from Interest Earnings $ 5,000,000
Total $ 119,000,000
01/109 COASTAL PROTECTION AND RESTORATION AUTHORITY
(577890) Atchafalaya Basin Protection and Enhancement (Federal
Match and Local/Sponsor Match)
(Assumption, Avoyelles, Iberia, Iberville, Pointe Coupee,
St. Landry, St. Martin, St. Mary)
Payable from General Obligation Bonds
Priority 1 $ 4,000,000
Priority 5 $ 7,000,000
Total $ 11,000,000
(577891) Union Diversion Project, Planning and Construction
(Ascension, Livingston, St. James, St. John the Baptist)
Payable from General Obligation Bonds
Priority 1 $ 2,010,212
Priority 5 $ 22,350,000
Total $ 24,360,212
(577892) Coastal Protection Projects, Planning and Construction
(Statewide)
Payable from General Obligation Bonds
Priority 1 $ 25,500,000
Priority 5 $ 197,000,000
Payable from State General Fund (Direct) Non-Recurring
Revenues $ 20,000,000
Payable from Interagency Transfers $ 6,275,000
Total $ 248,775,000
(577893) Larose to Golden Meadow Hurricane Protection Project,
Planning and Construction
(Lafourche)
Payable from General Obligation Bonds
Priority 5 $ 37,000,000
(577909) Morganza to the Gulf of Mexico Hurricane Protection
Project
(Ascension, Assumption, Iberia, Iberville, Lafourche,
Pointe Coupee, St. Martin, St. Mary, Terrebonne,
West Baton Rouge)
Payable from General Obligation Bonds
Priority 5 $ 131,500,000
(577910) Eden Isle Flood Risk Reduction and Coastal Resilience
Project
(St. Tammany)
Payable from General Obligation Bonds
Priority 1 $ 621,766
Priority 5 $ 104,000,000
Total $ 104,621,766
Page 10 of 174

HB NO. 2 ENROLLED
(578397) Construction of the Pumping Capacity Improvements,
Phase I Project
(Ascension, Assumption, Lafourche, Terrebonne)
Payable from General Obligation Bonds
Priority 5 $ 11,000,000
(578398) Military Road Flood Risk Reduction and Coastal
Resilience Project
(St. Tammany)
Payable from General Obligation Bonds
Priority 5 $ 3,000,000
(578399) St. Tammany Parish Coastal Storm and Flood Risk
Management Project
(St. Tammany)
Payable from General Obligation Bonds
Priority 1 $ 207,756
Priority 5 $ 4,500,000
Total $ 4,707,756
01/112 DEPARTMENT OF MILITARY AFFAIRS
(576550) At-Risk Youth Education Center of Excellence - Gillis
W. Long Center
(Iberville)
Payable from General Obligation Bonds
Priority 1 $ 1,700,000
Priority 5 $ 8,300,000
Total $ 10,000,000
(576555) Renovate-Upgrade Cadet Barracks Building 131, 132,
and 133, Youth Challenge Program, Camp Minden,
Minden, Louisiana
(Webster)
Payable from General Obligation Bonds
Priority 1 $ 700,000
(576559) Plaquemine Readiness Center Modernization
(Iberville)
Payable from General Obligation Bonds
Priority 1 $ 676,000
(576560) Renovate-Upgrade Cadet Barracks Buildings 18, 21, 22,
23, and 24, Youth Challenge Program (YCP), Carville,
Louisiana
(Iberville)
Payable from General Obligation Bonds
Priority 1 $ 8,426
(576561) Gillis W. Long Center, Water, Fire, and Sewage Line
Upgrades, Carville, Louisiana
(Iberville)
Payable from General Obligation Bonds
Priority 1 $ 573,605
(576563) Statewide Backlog of Maintenance and Repair (BMAR),
Phase 3, and Statewide Infrastructure Rehabilitation, Phase 3
(Statewide)
Payable from General Obligation Bonds
Priority 5 $ 40,235,000
Page 11 of 174

HB NO. 2 ENROLLED
Payable from State General Fund (Direct) Non-Recurring
Revenues $ 8,235,000
Payable from the balance of general obligation bond
proceeds previously allocated under the authority of Act
117 of 2022 for the Department of Military Affairs, Camp
Minden, Infrastructure, Rehabilitation, Phase 2, Planning
and Construction
(Webster) $ 4,115
Payable from Federal Funds $ 91,000,000
Payable from the balance of State
General Funds (Direct) previously
allocated under the authority of
Act 2 of 2025 for the Department
of Military Affairs, Coushatta Readiness
Center Modernization
(Red River) $ 735,000
Total $ 140,209,115
(576564) Louisiana Military Department Conference Center at
Jackson Barracks
(Orleans)
Payable from the balance of State General Funds (Direct)
previously allocated under the authority of Act 2 of 2025
for the Department of Military Affairs, Coushatta
Readiness
Center Modernization (Red River) $ 500,000
(576565) Historical Garrison Preservation - Jackson Barracks
(Orleans)
Payable from General Obligation Bonds
Priority 1 $ 950,000
Priority 5 $ 2,590,000
Total $ 3,540,000
(576567) Louisiana National Guard Readiness Center Complex,
Abbeville LA, Planning and Construction
(Vermilion)
Payable from General Obligation Bonds
Priority 1 $ 5,411,041
(576568) Multi-Purpose Machine Gun (MPMG) Range -
Training Center Pineville
(Rapides)
Payable from General Obligation Bonds
Priority 1 $ 7,875,000
(576573) Louisiana National Guard Readiness Center Replacement,
Lafayette LA, Planning and Construction
(Lafayette)
Payable from General Obligation Bonds
Priority 1 $ 5,906,956
Payable from the balance of State General Funds (Direct)
previously allocated under the authority of Act 2 of 2025
for the Department of Military Affairs, Coushatta
Readiness Center Modernization
(Red River) $ 765,000
Total $ 6,671,956
Page 12 of 174

HB NO. 2 ENROLLED
(577361) Hammond Readiness Center, Planning and Construction
(Tangipahoa)
Payable from State General Fund (Direct) Non-Recurring
Revenues $ 10,400,000
Payable from Federal Funds $ 30,000,000
Total $ 40,400,000
(578805) Convert Building 2033 to 122nd Cyber Squadron
(Orleans)
Payable from Federal Funds $ 8,000,000
(578885) Louisiana National Guard Training Center Pineville Road
Network Rehabilitation
(Rapides)
Payable from General Obligation Bonds
Priority 1 $ 802,979
01/120 OFFICE OF LOUISIANA HIGHWAY CONSTRUCTION
(578967) Louisiana Bridge Program
(Statewide)
Payable from General Obligation Bonds
Priority 5 $ 40,000,000
(578968) Louisiana Highway Road Program
(Statewide)
Payable from General Obligation Bonds
Priority 5 $ 158,000,000
Payable from the Louisiana Transportation Infrastructure
Fund $ 55,000,000
Total $ 213,000,000
Provided, however, that of the funds appropriated herein for the Office of Louisiana
Highway Construction, the amount of $25,000,000 from the Louisiana Transportation
Infrastructure Fund shall be expended solely on costs associated with the Division of
Administration Box Culvert Program.
(578969) LA 91: Bayou Plaquemine Brule Bridge Replacement,
Planning and Construction
(Acadia)
Payable from General Obligation Bonds
Priority 2 $ 1,000,000
Priority 5 $ 1,000,000
Total $ 2,000,000
(578970) Mills Avenue and Champagne Boulevard Extensions
(St. Martin)
Payable from General Obligation Bonds
Priority 5 $ 8,000,000
(578985) Non-Federal Aid Eligible Highway Program,
Planning and Construction
(Statewide)
Payable from the State Highway Improvement
Fund $ 79,000,000
Page 13 of 174

HB NO. 2 ENROLLED
01/124 LOUISIANA STADIUM AND EXPOSITION DISTRICT
(578516) Zephyr Field Improvements, Planning and Construction
(Jefferson)
Payable from General Obligation Bonds
Priority 1 $ 13,676,176
Priority 5 $ 1,000,000
Total $ 14,676,176
(578886) Bayou Segnette Recreation Complex, Land Acquisition,
Planning and Construction
(Jefferson)
Payable from General Obligation Bonds
Priority 1 $ 198,688
Priority 5 $ 9,000,000
Total $ 9,198,688
DEPARTMENT OF VETERANS AFFAIRS
03/130 DEPARTMENT OF VETERANS AFFAIRS
(578732) Northeast Louisiana Veterans Cemetery - In-Ground
Cremation and Above-Ground Cremation Spaces, Planning
and Construction
(Richland)
Payable from Federal Funds $ 1,500,000
03/135 NORTHWEST LOUISIANA WAR VETERANS HOME
(578510) Roof Replacement, Planning and Construction
(Richland)
Payable from Federal Funds via Interagency Transfers $ 570,000
ELECTED OFFICIALS
04/139 SECRETARY OF STATE
(578786) Old State Capitol Exterior Repairs, Planning and
Construction
(East Baton Rouge)
Payable from General Obligation Bonds
Priority 1 $ 5,992,420
Priority 5 $ 5,200,000
Total $ 11,192,420
LOUISIANA ECONOMIC DEVELOPMENT
05/250 OFFICE OF ECONOMIC DEVELOPMENT
(577235) Donaldsonville Training Facility, Planning and Construction
(Ascension)
Payable from General Obligation Bonds
Priority 5 $ 5,600,000
Payable from State General Fund (Direct) Non-Recurring
Revenues $ 16,000,000
Total $ 21,600,000
Page 14 of 174

HB NO. 2 ENROLLED
(577561) Economic Development Award Program for Infrastructure
Assistance
(Statewide)
Payable from General Obligation Bonds
Priority 1 $ 5,000,000
(577606) NIRC BSL-3 Lab and Animal Housing, Planning and
Construction
(Iberia)
Payable from General Obligation Bonds
Priority 1 $ 20,600,000
(577607) NIRC Iberia BioInnovation Accelerator GMP CDMO
Planning and Construction
(Iberia)
Payable from General Obligation Bonds
Priority 1 $ 8,000,000
Priority 5 $ 45,400,000
Total $ 53,400,000
(577612) LA 1 Overpass Rail Improvements Phase 4
(Ascension)
Payable from General Obligation Bonds
Priority 5 $ 132,520,250
(577614) ETP Parkway Road Project within the RiverPlex MegaPark
Phases 1 and 3
(Ascension)
Payable from General Obligation Bonds
Priority 5 $ 31,162,500
Payable from State General Fund (Direct) Non-Recurring
Revenues $ 6,650,000
Payable from the Louisiana Economic Development
Initiatives Fund previously allocated under the authority
of Act 2 of 2025 for the Office of Economic Development,
Energy Transition Parkway, Phase II and Extension,
Planning and Construction
(Ascension) $ 7,750,000
Total $ 45,562,500
( ) Louisiana Economic Development Capital Projects,
Planning and Construction
(Statewide)
Payable from General Obligation Bonds
Priority 5 $ 169,282,750
Provided, however, that the funds appropriated herein shall be expended solely on the
following projects:
Donaldsonville Training Facility, Planning and Construction
LA 1 Overpass Rail Improvements Phase 4
ETP Parkway Road Project within the Riverplex Megapark Phases 1 and 3
Energy Transition Parkway, Phase II and Extension, Planning and Construction
Notwithstanding the provisions of Section 5 of this Act which requires the approval of the
Joint Legislative Committee on the Budget, the secretary of Louisiana Economic
Development is authorized to combine the specific projects listed within this appropriation
into the single project entitled Louisiana Economic Development Capital Projects.
Furthermore, all appropriations for the specific projects combined into the single project
entitled Louisiana Economic Development Capital Projects, including cash appropriations,
appropriations of fees and self-generated revenues, interagency transfers, statutory
Page 15 of 174

HB NO. 2 ENROLLED
dedications, general obligation bond appropriations, and appropriations from any other
means of finance, contained in this Act and any prior Capital Outlay Act, and all previously
approved cash and noncash lines of credit approved by the State Bond Commission for the
specific projects included within this appropriation shall transfer to and be included within
the Louisiana Economic Development Capital Projects appropriation when the projects are
combined by the secretary of Louisiana Economic Development.
DEPARTMENT OF CULTURE, RECREATION AND TOURISM
06/263 OFFICE OF STATE MUSEUM
(577180) Madame Johns Legacy Restoration ADA and Safety
Upgrades/Fire Suppression, Planning and Construction
(Orleans)
Payable from General Obligation Bonds
Priority 5 $ 3,275,000
Payable from State General Fund (Direct) Non-Recurring
Revenues $ 325,000
Total $ 3,600,000
(577500) New Orleans Jazz Museum - Old U.S. Mint Emergency
Waterproofing, Structural Repair, Renovations, and Other
Development
(Orleans)
Payable from General Obligation Bonds
Priority 5 $ 23,000,000
Payable from State General Fund (Direct) Non-Recurring
Revenues $ 225,000
Total $ 23,225,000
(578887) Construction of Civil Rights Museum, Planning and Construction
(Orleans)
Payable from General Obligation Bonds
Priority 1 $ 48,992
Priority 5 $ 25,000,000
Total $ 25,048,992
06/264 OFFICE OF STATE PARKS
(577176) Bogue Chitto State Park - Trail Design, Construction,
Acquisition and Other Development
(Washington)
Payable from General Obligation Bonds
Priority 1 $ 3,000,000
Priority 5 $ 1,500,000
Total $ 4,500,000
(577177) Poverty Point State Historic Site - Land Acquisition,
Design, Museum/Interpretive Center and Expansion
(West Carroll)
Payable from General Obligation Bonds
Priority 1 $ 6,160,587
Priority 5 $ 17,500,000
Total $ 23,660,587
Page 16 of 174

HB NO. 2 ENROLLED
(577178) Tunica Hills State Preservation Area, Construction,
Development and Acquisition
(West Feliciana)
Payable from General Obligation Bonds
Priority 1 $ 4,500,000
Priority 5 $ 15,500,000
Total $ 20,000,000
(577179) Preventive Maintenance/Major Repairs and Improvements
(Statewide)
Payable from General Obligation Bonds
Priority 1 $ 3,457,963
Priority 5 $ 1,339,649
Payable from State General Fund (Direct) Non-Recurring
Revenues $ 4,339,649
Payable from Interagency Transfers $ 20,000,000
Total $ 29,137,261
(578889) Bogue Chitto State Park Emergency Erosion, Planning,
Design, Construction and Other Development
(Washington)
Payable from General Obligation Bonds
Priority 5 $ 1,200,000
Payable from State General Fund (Direct) Non-Recurring
Revenues $ 840,013
Total $ 2,040,013
(578890) Bayou Segnette State Park, Land Acquisition, Additional
Cabins, Planning and Construction
(Jefferson)
Payable from General Obligation Bonds
Priority 1 $ 2,198
06/A20 NEW ORLEANS CITY PARK
(577337) City Park Practice Track, Design, Renovation, and
Enhancements
(Orleans)
Payable from State General Fund (Direct) Non-Recurring
Revenues $ 3,400,000
(577338) Bayou Oaks Driving Range Planning, Design, and
Construction
(Orleans)
Payable from the Capital Outlay Savings Fund $ 3,100,000
(577343) Repairs to Historic Structures, Planning and Construction
(Orleans)
Payable from General Obligation Bonds
Priority 1 $ 2,089,307
06/A98 LOUISIANA NAVAL WAR MEMORIAL COMMISSION
(577174) USS KIDD Veterans Museum Ship/Cradle and
Building/Campus/Memorial Repair & Renovation,
HVAC Replacement, Education Classroom, Security,
Artifact Restoration Equipment, Parking Expansion,
Planning and Construction
(East Baton Rouge)
Page 17 of 174

HB NO. 2 ENROLLED
Payable from General Obligation Bonds
Priority 5 $ 1,200,000
Payable from State General Fund (Direct) Non-Recurring
Revenues $ 125,000
Total $ 1,325,000
DEPARTMENT OF TRANSPORTATION AND
DEVELOPMENT
07/270 ADMINISTRATION
(576769) Jimmie Davis Bridge Rehabilitation and Lighting, or
Design, Engineering, Planning and Construction
(Bossier)
Payable from General Obligation Bonds
Priority 1 $ 56,364,853
Priority 5 $ 36,000,000
Payable from State General Fund (Direct) Non-Recurring
Revenues $ 50,000,000
Total $ 142,364,853
(576770) LA 1 Improvements, Phase 2, Planning, Engineering,
Right-of-Way, Utilities and Construction
(Lafourche)
Payable from General Obligation Bonds
Priority 1 $ 46,905,593
Payable from State General Fund (Direct) Non-Recurring
Revenues $ 28,000,000
Total $ 74,905,593
(576771) LA 3241 (I-12 to Bush), Planning, Engineering,
Right-of-Way, Utilities and Construction
(St. Tammany)
Payable from General Obligation Bonds
Priority 5 $ 28,000,000
(576772) I-10 Calcasieu River Bridge, Environmental, Planning,
Engineering, Right-of-Way, Utilities, Demolition and
Construction
(Calcasieu)
Payable from General Obligation Bonds
Priority 1 $ 49,385,563
Priority 5 $ 50,000,000
Total $ 99,385,563
(576776) LA 964 (Groom Road - US 61) Highway Lighting
(East Baton Rouge)
Payable from General Obligation Bonds
Priority 1 $ 450,000
Priority 5 $ 2,400,000
Total $ 2,850,000
(576777) Loyola/I-10 Interchange Improvements, Feasibility Study,
Interchange Modification Report, Environmental
Assessment, Engineering, Right-of-Ways, Utilities and
Construction
(Jefferson, Orleans)
Payable from General Obligation Bonds
Priority 1 $ 1,350,548
Page 18 of 174

HB NO. 2 ENROLLED
(576778) Improvements on LA 3038, Including Patching,
Repairing and Overlaying of the Highway, Planning
and Construction
(Ascension)
Payable from General Obligation Bonds
Priority 1 $ 47,139
(576779) Florida Avenue Bridge, Planning and Construction
(Orleans)
Payable from General Obligation Bonds
Priority 5 $ 7,200,000
(576780) Claiborne Corridor Rehabilitation
(Orleans)
Payable from General Obligation Bonds
Priority 5 $ 20,000,000
(576781) Pecue Lane/I-10 Interchange and I-10, Planning, Design,
Rights-of-Way, Utilities and Construction
(East Baton Rouge)
Payable from General Obligation Bonds
Priority 1 $ 1,355,887
(576789) LA 335: LA 35 - LA 14, Planning and Construction
(Vermilion)
Payable from General Obligation Bonds
Priority 2 $ 7,500,000
Priority 5 $ 17,100,000
Total $ 24,600,000
(576790) LA 35: Lafayette Parish Line - US 90
(Acadia)
Payable from General Obligation Bonds
Priority 2 $ 6,800,000
Priority 5 $ 7,300,000
Total $ 14,100,000
(576791) LA 29 Improvements (LA 13 - LA 758)
(Evangeline, St. Landry)
Payable from General Obligation Bonds
Priority 1 $ 5,009,987
(576792) LA 86: LA 320 - LA 3242, Planning and Construction
(Iberia)
Payable from General Obligation Bonds
Priority 1 $ 1,500,000
Priority 5 $ 7,200,000
Total $ 8,700,000
(576793) LA 117: Improvements from LA 8 to LA 118
(Natchitoches, Vernon)
Payable from General Obligation Bonds
Priority 1 $ 5,904,380
Priority 5 $ 13,500,000
Payable from State General Fund (Direct) Non-Recurring
Revenues $ 16,500,000
Total $ 35,904,380
Page 19 of 174

HB NO. 2 ENROLLED
(576794) Highway 397 in Calcasieu Parish, North and South Turning
Lanes
(Calcasieu)
Payable from General Obligation Bonds
Priority 1 $ 1,980,430
Priority 5 $ 3,800,000
Total $ 5,780,430
(576795) City of Gonzales - GO Program LA Highway 30 Corridor,
Planning and Construction
(Ascension)
Payable from General Obligation Bonds
Priority 1 $ 5,655,302
Priority 5 $ 2,500,000
Total $ 8,155,302
(576796) LA 156: LA 479 - LA 501, Planning and Construction
(Natchitoches, Winn)
Payable from General Obligation Bonds
Priority 5 $ 8,000,000
(576797) LA 182 Resurfacing
(St. Mary)
Payable from General Obligation Bonds
Priority 5 $ 8,000,000
(576809) LA 70 Resurfacing and Drainage Repairs
(St. Mary)
Payable from General Obligation Bonds
Priority 5 $ 6,460,000
(576810) US 190 (Vine Street) Reconstruction
(St. Landry)
Payable from General Obligation Bonds
Priority 1 $ 182,710
Priority 5 $ 19,200,000
Total $ 19,382,710
(576811) Roundabout on LA 447 and LA 1025, Planning and
Construction
(Livingston)
Payable from General Obligation Bonds
Priority 1 $ 35,205
Priority 2 $ 3,000,000
Priority 5 $ 5,000,000
Total $ 8,035,205
(576812) Roundabout at Intersection of LA 3125 and LA 3274
(St. James)
Payable from General Obligation Bonds
Priority 1 $ 1,999,807
Priority 5 $ 4,400,000
Total $ 6,399,807
(576813) LA 92: LA 91 - LA 13
(Acadia)
Payable from General Obligation Bonds
Priority 5 $ 15,100,000
Page 20 of 174

HB NO. 2 ENROLLED
(576814) LA 28 Widening (LA 3128 - LA 116)
(Rapides)
Payable from General Obligation Bonds
Priority 1 $ 204,706
Priority 5 $ 40,000,000
Total $ 40,204,706
(576815) Widening of Highway 447 and I-12 Overpass
Improvements, Environmental Phase Commencement,
Planning and Construction
(Livingston)
Payable from General Obligation Bonds
Priority 1 $ 3,739,209
Priority 5 $ 28,152,600
Payable from State General Fund (Direct) Non-Recurring
Revenues $ 6,000,000
Total $ 37,891,809
(576820) LA 14: Zwan Road - LA 91
(Vermilion)
Payable from General Obligation Bonds
Priority 1 $ 9,000,000
(576821) LA 384 (Big Lake Rd. to McNeese St.), Planning and
Construction
(Calcasieu)
Payable from General Obligation Bonds
Priority 5 $ 10,000,000
(576822) LA 29:US 167-LA 182, Planning and Construction
(Evangeline, St. Landry)
Payable from General Obligation Bonds
Priority 2 $ 15,400,000
Priority 5 $ 15,400,000
Total $ 30,800,000
(576823) LA 363: St. Landry Parish Line - LA 1169, Planning and
Construction
(Evangeline)
Payable from General Obligation Bonds
Priority 2 $ 2,000,000
Priority 5 $ 5,300,000
Total $ 7,300,000
(576824) LA 621 Realignment and Other LA 73 Corridor
Improvements, Planning and Construction
(Ascension)
Payable from General Obligation Bonds
Priority 1 $ 3,797,761
Priority 5 $ 8,100,000
Total $ 11,897,761
(576826) US 190 Widening: LA 25 - US 190 Bus
(St. Tammany)
Payable from General Obligation Bonds
Priority 1 $ 2,000,000
Priority 5 $ 3,100,000
Total $ 5,100,000
Page 21 of 174

HB NO. 2 ENROLLED
(576827) LA 22: North Hoover Road - Dunson Road
(Tangipahoa)
Payable from General Obligation Bonds
Priority 5 $ 12,600,000
(576829) Roundabout at LA 3211 and Yokley Road
(St. Mary)
Payable from General Obligation Bonds
Priority 1 $ 3,500,000
Priority 5 $ 3,800,000
Total $ 7,300,000
(576830) LA 31: LA 341 - LA 355, Planning and Construction
(St. Martin)
Payable from General Obligation Bonds
Priority 5 $ 6,000,000
(576831) LA 330: LA 82 - Old LA 690, Planning and Construction
(Vermilion)
Payable from General Obligation Bonds
Priority 5 $ 10,400,000
Payable from State General Fund (Direct) Non-Recurring
Revenues $ 500,000
Payable from State General Fund (Direct) $ 300,000
Total $ 11,200,000
(576832) LA 13: Court Circle - Sherwood Lane, Planning and
Construction
(Acadia)
Payable from General Obligation Bonds
Priority 5 $ 14,750,000
(576833) US 90 in Acadia Parish, Planning and Construction
(Acadia)
Payable from General Obligation Bonds
Priority 5 $ 6,350,000
(576834) LA 182/LA 92-1 Intersection Improvements, Planning and
Construction
(St. Martin)
Payable from General Obligation Bonds
Priority 2 $ 1,000,000
Priority 5 $ 5,400,000
Total $ 6,400,000
(576835) LA 182/LA 88 Intersection Improvements, Planning
and Construction
(Iberia)
Payable from General Obligation Bonds
Priority 2 $ 1,000,000
Priority 5 $ 8,800,000
Total $ 9,800,000
(576836) US 167 J-Turns, Planning and Construction
(Vermilion)
Payable from General Obligation Bonds
Priority 2 $ 1,250,000
Priority 5 $ 1,250,000
Total $ 2,500,000
Page 22 of 174

HB NO. 2 ENROLLED
(576839) LA 3127: St. James Canal Bridge - LA 20, Planning
and Construction
(St. James)
Payable from General Obligation Bonds
Priority 5 $ 17,220,000
Payable from State General Fund (Direct) Non-Recurring
Revenues $ 400,000
Total $ 17,620,000
(576844) US 90: Lafayette Regional Airport - Assumption Parish
Line, Planning and Construction
(Iberia, Lafayette, St. Martin, St. Mary)
Payable from General Obligation Bonds
Priority 5 $ 40,000,000
(576845) LA 409 (Liberty Road): LA 64 - East Feliciana Parish Line
Planning and Construction
(East Baton Rouge)
Payable from General Obligation Bonds
Priority 1 $ 1,000,000
(576846) LA 74/I-10 Interchange, Planning and Construction
(Ascension)
Payable from General Obligation Bonds
Priority 5 $ 5,000,000
(576847) LA 347: LA 351 - LA 328
(St. Martin)
Payable from General Obligation Bonds
Priority 5 $ 2,000,000
(576850) Relocate Hickory Avenue (LA Hwy. 48-11th Street)
(Mounes) (LA Hwy. 3154) Construction, Right of Way,
and Utilities
(Jefferson)
Payable from General Obligation Bonds
Priority 1 $ 1,000,000
Priority 5 $ 1,000,000
Total $ 2,000,000
(576851) LA 699: LA 35 - LA 343, Planning and Construction
(Vermilion)
Payable from General Obligation Bonds
Priority 1 $ 2,929,357
(576852) Intersection Improvements (Roundabouts), Planning and
Construction
(Lafayette)
Payable from General Obligation Bonds
Priority 1 $ 5,000,000
Priority 5 $ 5,000,000
Total $ 10,000,000
(576853) Hooper Road Extension and Widening, Environmental,
Planning, Engineering, Right-of-Way, Utilities and
Construction
(East Baton Rouge, Livingston)
Payable from General Obligation Bonds
Priority 1 $ 7,597,091
Priority 5 $ 27,000,000
Total $ 34,597,091
Page 23 of 174

HB NO. 2 ENROLLED
(576855) LA 31: LA 182 - 0.15 Mi N of N LA 96
(Iberia, St. Martin)
Payable from General Obligation Bonds
Priority 1 $ 6,694,539
(576857) LA 343 (Bosco Hwy) LA 98 - LA 356, Planning and
Construction
(St. Landry)
Payable from General Obligation Bonds
Priority 1 $ 6,229,762
(576858) LA 3211: Yokley Road to LA 182, Planning and
Construction
(St. Mary)
Payable from General Obligation Bonds
Priority 5 $ 15,000,000
(576859) LA 44 Widening, I-10 to LA 22, Planning, Utilities,
Right-of-Way and Construction
(Ascension)
Payable from General Obligation Bonds
Priority 1 $ 7,544,409
Priority 5 $ 17,000,000
Total $ 24,544,409
(576860) LA 42 (US 61 to LA 44) Widening, including a Roundabout
at Joe Sevario Road, Planning and Construction
(Ascension)
Payable from General Obligation Bonds
Priority 1 $ 173,885
(576861) I-49 South from Lafayette to Westbank Expressway,
Planning, Engineering, Right-of-Way, Utilities and
Construction
(Iberia, Jefferson, Lafayette, Lafourche, St. Charles,
St. Martin, St. Mary, Terrebonne)
Payable from General Obligation Bonds
Priority 1 $ 64,981
Priority 5 $ 188,000,000
Total $ 188,064,981
(576862) LA 91: Bayou Plaquemine Brule Bridge Replacement,
Planning and Construction
(Acadia)
Payable from General Obligation Bonds
Priority 1 $ 1,000,000
Priority 5 $ 5,200,000
Total $ 6,200,000
(576863) Louisiana Highway 64 and Louisiana Highway 1019
Roundabout, Planning and Construction
(Livingston)
Payable from General Obligation Bonds
Priority 1 $ 175,000
Priority 5 $ 2,000,000
Total $ 2,175,000
Page 24 of 174

HB NO. 2 ENROLLED
(576864) Roundabout at LA 3233 and I-49 Northbound Service
Road, Planning and Construction
(St. Landry)
Payable from General Obligation Bonds
Priority 5 $ 9,600,000
(576865) LA 429/I-10 Interchange, Planning and Construction
(Ascension)
Payable from General Obligation Bonds
Priority 5 $ 5,000,000
(576866) Peters Road Bridge and Extension, Planning and Construction
(Jefferson, Plaquemines)
Payable from General Obligation Bonds
Priority 1 $ 16,957,402
Payable from State General Fund (Direct) Non-Recurring
Revenues $ 7,000,000
Total $ 23,957,402
(576867) Earhart/Causeway Interchange, Planning, Engineering,
Right-of-Way, Utilities and Construction
(Jefferson)
Payable from General Obligation Bonds
Priority 1 $ 4,731,751
Priority 5 $ 48,800,000
Total $ 53,531,751
(576869) Livingston Roundabout at Corner of LA 16 and LA 42,
Planning and Construction
(Livingston)
Payable from General Obligation Bonds
Priority 5 $ 3,600,000
(576870) LA 22 Extension and Improvements, LA 22 Roundabout,
Design, Engineering, Planning and Construction
(St. Tammany)
Payable from General Obligation Bonds
Priority 1 $ 614,570
Priority 5 $ 3,240,000
Total $ 3,854,570
(576871) LA 3034 Improvements
(East Baton Rouge)
Payable from General Obligation Bonds
Priority 1 $ 10,538,487
Priority 5 $ 22,000,000
Total $ 32,538,487
(576872) New Mississippi River Bridge
(Ascension, East Baton Rouge, Iberville, St. James,
West Baton Rouge)
Payable from General Obligation Bonds
Priority 1 $ 538,082
Priority 5 $ 3,000,000
Total $ 3,538,082
(576873) Verot School Road, State Hwy. 339 Widening, Planning
and Construction
(Lafayette)
Payable from General Obligation Bonds
Priority 5 $ 60,500,000
Page 25 of 174

HB NO. 2 ENROLLED
(576874) Hooper Road Widening and Sewer Improvements
(Blackwater Bayou to Sullivan Road) Planning,
Engineering, Utilities and Construction
(East Baton Rouge)
Payable from General Obligation Bonds
Priority 1 $ 11,057,818
Priority 5 $ 5,000,000
Total $ 16,057,818
(576875) US 371 Widening
(Webster)
Payable from General Obligation Bonds
Priority 5 $ 3,600,000
(576876) Interchange Improvements on La. Highways (current or
former) in Lafayette Parish, Planning and Construction
(Lafayette)
Payable from General Obligation Bonds
Priority 5 $ 15,000,000
(576877) New Orleans International Airport Landside Access
Improvements
(Jefferson)
Payable from General Obligation Bonds
Priority 1 $ 5,892,521
(577318) LA 3227 - LA 157 Intersection Realignment, Planning and
Construction
(Bossier)
Payable from General Obligation Bonds
Priority 1 $ 12,287
(577415) Highway Program (Up to $4,000,000 for Secretary's
Emergency Fund)
(Statewide)
Payable from General Obligation Bonds
Priority 1 $ 53,404,621
Priority 2 $ 56,450,000
Priority 5 $ 374,850,000
Payable from the balance of general obligation bond
proceeds previously allocated under the authority of Act
485 of 2021 for Department of Transportation and
Development - Administration, LA 182 Overlay (LA
3069 - LA 317) (St. Mary), Act 117 of 2022 for
Department of Transportation and Development -
Administration, LA 35 Overlay (LA 98 - LA 365)
(Acadia) $ 839,253
Payable from the balance of State General Funds (Direct)
previously allocated under the authority of Act 73 of 1998
for Department of Transportation and Development -
Administration, State Parks Road Overlay, Construction
(Statewide), Act 23 of 2002 for Department of
Transportation and Development - Administration, Ridge
Road (LA 342) at West Broussard Road, Turn Lane,
Planning and Construction (Lafayette), Act 27 of 2006 for
Department of Transportation and Development -
Administration, LA Hwy. 6 Turn Lanes in Many at Many
Jr. and Sr. High Schools, Planning and Construction
(Sabine), Act 28 of 2007 for Department of
Transportation and Development - Administration, Turn
Page 26 of 174

HB NO. 2 ENROLLED
Lane on LA Hwy. 171 in front of Mount Bethal Church
in Keithville, Planning and Construction (Caddo), Act
511 of 2008 for Department of Transportation and
Development - Administration, Bridge Replacement at
La. Hwy. 77 and La. Hwy. 78/411 (Pointe Coupee), Act
511 of 2008 for Department of Transportation and
Development - Administration, Leesville Route 171
Study (Vernon), Act 28 of 1997 for Evangeline Parish,
LA 29 and US 167, Improvements, Engineering,
Construction, Right of Way and Utilities (Evangeline),
Act 28 of 1997 for Jefferson Parish, Barataria Blvd.
Drainage Improvements Barataria Blvd./Patriot Street To
Ames Blvd. (Jefferson), Act 29 of 1998 for Jefferson
Parish, Lead Street Access, Planning and Construction
(Jefferson), Act 45 of 1996 for Lafourche Parish,
Thibodaux-Raceland-Savoie Flood Protection
(Lafourche), Act 26 of 2005 for Sabine Parish, Blue Lake
Road Improvements /North Toledo Bend State Park Road
(LA 3229 to North Toledo Bend State Park), Planning
and Construction (Sabine), Act 45 of 1996 for St. Mary
Parish, Sewer Improvements and Repairs at Kemper-
Williams Park (St. Mary), Act 479 of 1997 for Vidalia,
Comprehensive Traffic Improvements For Industrial Park
Areas, Planning and Construction
(Concordia) $ 1,889,243
Payable from Transportation Trust Fund - Construction
Subfund $ 4,300,000
Payable from Transportation Trust Fund - Regular $ 20,400,000
Payable from Transportation Trust Fund - Federal
Receipts $ 1,500,000,000
Payable from State General Fund (Direct) Non-Recurring
Revenues $ 8,115,000
Payable from Federal Funds $ 25,000,000
Payable from the Louisiana Transportation Infrastructure
Fund $ 260,000,000
Total $ 2,305,248,117
Provided, however, that the funds appropriated herein for the Highway Program, the amount
of $35,000,000 from the Louisiana Transportation Infrastructure Fund shall be expended
solely on costs associated with Box Culverts.
(577692) LA 1/LA 415 Connector
(West Baton Rouge)
Payable from General Obligation Bonds
Priority 5 $ 50,000,000
Payable from the balance of State General Funds (Direct)
previously allocated under the authority of Act 20 of
2009 for West Baton Rouge Parish, LA 415 Bridge at
Intracoastal Canal, Planning and Construction
(West Baton Rouge) $ 1,610,990
Total $ 51,610,990
(577736) LA 3127: LA 70 - St. James Canal Bridge
(Ascension, St. James)
Payable from General Obligation Bonds
Priority 2 $ 9,500,000
Priority 5 $ 6,000,000
Total $ 15,500,000
Page 27 of 174

HB NO. 2 ENROLLED
(577739) LA 641: LA 44-LA 3125
(St. James)
Payable from General Obligation Bonds
Priority 5 $ 5,000,000
Payable from State General Fund (Direct) Non-Recurring
Revenues $ 400,000
Total $ 5,400,000
(578083) Secretary's Emergency Fund for Bridge Damages, Other
Reimbursements, Local Matching Dollars, Federal Funds,
and Opportunity Grants Subject to the Provisions of
R.S. 48:232
(Statewide)
Payable from Interagency Transfers $ 25,000,000
Payable from Fees and Self-Generated Revenues $ 45,000,000
Payable from Transportation Trust Fund - Federal
Receipts $ 25,000,000
Payable from Federal Funds $ 2,500,000
Total $ 97,500,000
(578119) I-49 N: Inner City Connector
(Caddo)
Payable from General Obligation Bonds
Priority 5 $ 50,000,000
Payable from Megaproject Leverage Fund $ 20,000,000
Total $ 70,000,000
(578724) LA 45 Roadway Raising
(Jefferson)
Payable from General Obligation Bonds
Priority 5 $ 3,000,000
(578777) US 165: Roundabout at Pinecrest
(Rapides)
Payable from General Obligation Bonds
Priority 5 $ 12,500,000
Payable from State General Fund (Direct) Non-Recurring
Revenues $ 5,500,000
Total $ 18,000,000
(578784) LA 13 (Crowley to Vermilion Parish Line)
(Acadia)
Payable from General Obligation Bonds
Priority 1 $ 28,516
(578997) LA 8: Richard Thompson Bridge to Colfax,
Planning and Construction
(Grant, Rapides)
Payable from General Obligation Bonds
Priority 5 $ 18,000,000
(579010) LA10: LA 106- LA 13
(Evangeline)
Payable from General Obligation Bonds
Priority 5 $ 19,000,000
Payable from the Capital Outlay Savings Fund $ 500,000
Total $ 19,500,000
Page 28 of 174

HB NO. 2 ENROLLED
07/274 PUBLIC IMPROVEMENTS
(576766) Mississippi River Deepening, Phase 3, Planning, Design,
Construction, Rights-of-Way, Relocations and Utilities
(Ascension, East Baton Rouge, Jefferson, Orleans,
Plaquemines, St. Bernard, St. Charles, St. James, St. John
the Baptist, West Baton Rouge)
Payable from General Obligation Bonds
Priority 1 $ 55,500,000
Priority 5 $ 25,000,000
Total $ 80,500,000
(576767) Houma Navigational Canal Deepening Project, Planning,
Design, Construction, Rights-of-Ways, Relocations and
Utilities
(Terrebonne)
Payable from General Obligation Bonds
Priority 1 $ 9,650,000
Priority 5 $ 37,150,000
Total $ 46,800,000
(576768) Acadiana Gulf of Mexico Access Channel (AGMAC),
Port of Iberia, Planning, Design, Construction,
Rights-of-Way, Relocations and Utilities
(Iberia, Vermilion)
Payable from General Obligation Bonds
Priority 1 $ 2,840,987
(576773) J. Bennett Johnston (Red River) Deepening
(Avoyelles, Bossier, Caddo, Grant, Natchitoches, Rapides,
Red River)
Payable from General Obligation Bonds
Priority 1 $ 400,000
(576816) Bayou Dechene Reservoir, Planning, Land Acquisition
and Construction
(Caldwell)
Payable from General Obligation Bonds
Priority 1 $ 2,885,096
Priority 5 $ 18,300,000
Total $ 21,185,096
(576817) Ouachita River and Tributaries Bank Stabilization and
Levee Repairs
(Caldwell, Catahoula, Franklin, LaSalle, Ouachita)
Payable from General Obligation Bonds
Priority 1 $ 2,742,599
Priority 5 $ 14,650,000
Total $ 17,392,599
(576818) West of Atchafalaya Basin Feasibility Study
(Statewide)
Payable from General Obligation Bonds
Priority 5 $ 750,000
(576819) Short Line Railroad Upgrades
(Statewide)
Payable from General Obligation Bonds
Priority 1 $ 7,088,146
Priority 5 $ 14,720,000
Total $ 21,808,146
Page 29 of 174

HB NO. 2 ENROLLED
(576840) Rehabilitation and Repair of State-Maintained Reservoirs
and Dams
(Statewide)
Payable from General Obligation Bonds
Priority 1 $ 5,082,788
Priority 2 $ 2,000,000
Priority 5 $ 19,130,000
Total $ 26,212,788
(576841) New Orleans Rail Gateway Program
(Jefferson, Orleans)
Payable from General Obligation Bonds
Priority 1 $ 1,272,606
Priority 5 $ 10,600,000
Total $ 11,872,606
(576842) Bundick Lake Level Control Structure, Planning and
Construction
(Beauregard)
Payable from General Obligation Bonds
Priority 1 $ 1,691,918
Priority 5 $ 3,180,000
Total $ 4,871,918
(576843) Turkey Creek Lake Repairs, Planning and Construction
(Franklin)
Payable from General Obligation Bonds
Priority 1 $ 5,355,289
(576878) Flood Control Reservoirs in the Amite River Basin
Watershed
(Ascension, East Baton Rouge, East Feliciana,
Livingston, St. Helena)
Payable from General Obligation Bonds
Priority 5 $ 2,000,000
(576879) Mississippi River Levee Raising, Arkansas to Old River,
Planning and Construction
(Avoyelles, Concordia, East Carroll, Madison, Pointe
Coupee, Tensas)
Payable from General Obligation Bonds
Priority 1 $ 10,642,245
Priority 5 $ 36,820,000
Total $ 47,462,245
(576880) Comite River Diversion Canal Planning, Right-of-Way,
Utilities and Construction
(Ascension, East Baton Rouge, Livingston)
Payable from General Obligation Bonds
Priority 1 $ 515,747
Payable from Federal Funds $ 50,000,000
Total $ 50,515,747
(577494) Port Construction and Development Priority Program
(Statewide)
Payable from Transportation Trust Fund - Regular $ 39,400,000
(578084) Statewide Flood Control Program
(Statewide)
Payable from Transportation Trust Fund - Regular $ 20,000,000
Page 30 of 174

HB NO. 2 ENROLLED
(579003) Public Improvements Multimodal Program Capital
Projects, Planning and Construction
(Statewide)
Payable from General Obligation Bonds
Priority 2 $ 76,751,739
Priority 5 $ 87,470,000
Total $ 164,221,739
Provided, however, that the funds appropriated herein shall be expended solely on the
following projects:
Mississippi River Deepening, Phase 3, Planning, Design, Construction, Rights-of-Way,
Relocations and Utilities
Houma Navigational Canal Deepening Project, Planning, Design, Construction, Rights-
of-Ways, Relocations and Utilities
Acadiana Gulf of Mexico Access Channel (AGMAC), Port of Iberia, Planning, Design,
Construction, Rights-of-Way, Relocations and Utilities
J. Bennett Johnston (Red River) Deepening
Short Line Railroad Upgrades
New Orleans Rail Gateway Program
Notwithstanding the provisions of Section 5 of this Act which requires the approval of the
Joint Legislative Committee on the Budget, the secretary of the Department of
Transportation and Development is authorized to combine the specific projects listed within
this appropriation into the single project entitled Public Improvements Multimodal Program
Capital Projects. Furthermore, all appropriations for the specific projects combined into the
single project entitled Public Improvements Multimodal Program Capital Projects, including
cash appropriations, interagency transfers, statutory dedications, general obligation bond
appropriations, and appropriations from any other means of finance, contained in this Act
and any prior Capital Outlay Act, and all previously approved cash and noncash lines of
credit approved by the State Bond Commission for the specific projects included within this
appropriation shall transfer to and be included within the Public Improvements Multimodal
Program Capital Projects appropriation when the projects are combined by the secretary of
the Department of Transportation and Development.
(579002) Public Improvements Public Works Program Capital
Projects, Planning and Construction
(Statewide)
Payable from General Obligation Bonds
Priority 2 $ 30,399,935
Priority 5 $ 94,830,000
Total $ 125,229,935
Provided, however, that the funds appropriated herein shall be expended solely on the
following projects:
Bayou Dechene Reservoir, Planning, Land Acquisition and Construction
Ouachita River and Tributaries Bank Stabilization and Levee Repairs
West of Atchafalaya Basin Feasibility Study
Rehabilitation and Repair of State-Maintained Reservoirs and Dams
Bundick Lake Level Control Structure
Turkey Creek Lake Repairs
Flood Control Reservoirs in the Amite River Basin Watershed
Mississippi River Levee Raising, Arkansas to Old River
Notwithstanding the provisions of Section 5 of this Act which requires the approval of the
Joint Legislative Committee on the Budget, the secretary of the Department of
Transportation and Development is authorized to combine the specific projects listed within
this appropriation into the single project entitled Public Improvements Public Works
Program Capital Projects. Furthermore, all appropriations for the specific projects combined
into the single project entitled Public Improvements Public Works Program Capital Projects,
Page 31 of 174

HB NO. 2 ENROLLED
including cash appropriations, interagency transfers, statutory dedications, general obligation
bond appropriations, and appropriations from any other means of finance, contained in this
Act and any prior Capital Outlay Act, and all previously approved cash and noncash lines
of credit approved by the State Bond Commission for the specific projects included within
this appropriation shall transfer to and be included within the Public Improvements Public
Works Program Capital Projects appropriation when the projects are combined by the
secretary of the Department of Transportation and Development.
07/276 ENGINEERING AND OPERATIONS
(576765) Reconstruction and/or Rehabilitation of DOTD
Maintenance Unit Facilities
(Statewide)
Payable from General Obligation Bonds
Priority 5 $ 47,500,000
(578086) Motor Vessel and Equipment Drydocking, Repairs,
Various Locations Statewide
(Statewide)
Payable from Transportation Trust Fund - Regular $ 1,500,000
(578087) Facilities Program Major Repairs, Renovations,
Additions, New Facilities, Equipment Replacement at
Various DOTD Sites, Planning and Construction
(Statewide)
Payable from Transportation Trust Fund - Regular $ 2,000,000
(579004) Engineering and Operations Facilities Program
Capital Projects, Planning and Construction
(Statewide)
Payable from General Obligation Bonds
Priority 5 $ 47,500,000
Payable from Transportation Trust Fund - Regular $ 2,000,000
Total $ 49,500,000
Provided, however, that the funds appropriated herein shall be expended solely on the
following projects:
Reconstruction and/or Rehabilitation of DOTD Maintenance Unit Facilities
Facilities Program Major Repairs, Renovations, Additions, New Facilities, Equipment
Replacement at Various DOTD Sites
Notwithstanding the provisions of Section 5 of this Act which requires the approval of the
Joint Legislative Committee on the Budget, the secretary of the Department of
Transportation and Development is authorized to combine the specific projects listed within
this appropriation into the single project entitled Engineering and Operations Facilities
Program Capital Projects. Furthermore, all appropriations for the specific projects combined
into the single project entitled Engineering and Operations Facilities Program Capital
Projects, including cash appropriations, interagency transfers, statutory dedications, general
obligation bond appropriations, and appropriations from any other means of finance,
contained in this Act and any prior Capital Outlay Act, and all previously approved cash and
noncash lines of credit approved by the State Bond Commission for the specific projects
included within this appropriation shall transfer to and be included within the Engineering
and Operations Facilities Program Capital Projects appropriation when the projects are
combined by the secretary of the Department of Transportation and Development.
Page 32 of 174

HB NO. 2 ENROLLED
07/277 AVIATION IMPROVEMENTS
(578088) State Aviation and Airport Improvement Program
(Statewide)
Payable from the Transportation Trust Fund -
Regular $ 19,945,415
Payable from the Capital Outlay Savings Fund $ 2,000,000
Total $ 21,945,415
DEPARTMENT OF PUBLIC SAFETY AND CORRECTIONS
08/400 DEPARTMENT OF CORRECTIONS
(576807) Statewide Fencing and Security Enhancements Project at
all State Adult Correctional Facilities
(Statewide)
Payable from General Obligation Bonds
Priority 5 $ 8,000,000
Payable from State General Fund (Direct) Non-Recurring
Revenues $ 1,000,000
Total $ 9,000,000
(576808) HVAC Installation, Offender Housing, Planning and
Construction
(Statewide)
Payable from General Obligation Bonds
Priority 1 $ 5,473,930
Priority 5 $ 29,000,000
Total $ 34,473,930
08/402 LOUISIANA STATE PENITENTIARY
(576901) Electrical Distribution System Upgrade, Planning and
Construction
(West Feliciana)
Payable from General Obligation Bonds
Priority 1 $ 7,342,276
Priority 5 $ 17,000,000
Total $ 24,342,276
(576902) Main Prison Shower and Cellblock Plumbing Upgrade,
Planning and Construction
(West Feliciana)
Payable from General Obligation Bonds
Priority 1 $ 1,563,382
08/403 OFFICE OF JUVENILE JUSTICE
(577433) Community Based Program, Juvenile Justice
Improvements, Planning, Construction, Renovation,
Acquisition, and Equipment
(Statewide)
Payable from General Obligation Bonds
Priority 1 $ 50,849,226
Priority 5 $ 52,000,000
Total $ 102,849,226
Page 33 of 174

HB NO. 2 ENROLLED
08/406 LOUISIANA CORRECTIONAL INSTITUTE FOR WOMEN
(578892) Rebuild and/or Replace Facility Due to Damage from 2016
Flood Event
(Iberville)
Payable from General Obligation Bonds
Priority 1 $ 7,972,290
08/416 RAYBURN CORRECTIONAL CENTER
(576729) Security Perimeter Fence, Planning and Construction
(Washington)
Payable from General Obligation Bonds
Priority 1 $ 115,567
08/419 OFFICE OF STATE POLICE
(578481) State Police Region 3 Headquarters, Planning and
Construction
(Rapides)
Payable from General Obligation Bonds
Priority 5 $ 6,550,000
Payable from State General Fund (Direct) Non-Recurring
Revenues $ 650,000
Total $ 7,200,000
(578486) New Louisiana State Police Troop L Facility, Planning
and Construction
(St. Tammany)
Payable from General Obligation Bonds
Priority 1 $ 25,500,000
Priority 5 $ 1,500,000
Total $ 27,000,000
(578487) JESTC Training Facility Improvements, Planning and
Construction
(East Baton Rouge)
Payable from General Obligation Bonds
Priority 1 $ 3,750,000
LOUISIANA DEPARTMENT OF HEALTH
09/320 OFFICE OF AGING AND ADULT SERVICES
(578896) Replace Roof and Storm Drains on all Patient Buildings,
Planning and Construction
(East Feliciana)
Payable from General Obligation Bonds
Priority 1 $ 900,000
09/330 OFFICE OF BEHAVIORAL HEALTH
(577312) Central Louisiana State Hospital "Warehouse" Relocation,
Planning and Construction
(Rapides)
Payable from General Obligation Bonds
Priority 1 $ 2,100,000
Priority 5 $ 1,440,000
Total $ 3,540,000
Page 34 of 174

HB NO. 2 ENROLLED
(577317) Central Louisiana State Hospital Demolition of Buildings
Located on Rainbow Drive
(Rapides)
Payable from Interagency Transfers $ 10,000,000
(577363) Center Building and Fire Alarm System Renovation and
Restoration, East Louisiana State Hospital, Planning and
Construction
(East Feliciana)
Payable from General Obligation Bonds
Priority 1 $ 2,000,000
Priority 5 $ 3,000,000
Total $ 5,000,000
(577364) ELMHS Water System Replacement
(East Feliciana)
Payable from General Obligation Bonds
Priority 5 $ 2,020,000
Payable from State General Fund (Direct) Non-Recurring
Revenues $ 200,000
Total $ 2,220,000
(577365) Fire Alarm System Replacement for Ten Buildings,
Planning and Construction
(East Feliciana)
Payable from General Obligation Bonds
Priority 1 $ 2,453,200
09/340 OFFICE FOR CITIZENS WITH DEVELOPMENTAL DISABILITIES
(577065) Pinecrest New Kitchen, Planning and Construction
(Rapides)
Payable from Interagency Transfers $ 5,000,000
DEPARTMENT OF CONSERVATION AND ENERGY
11/431 OFFICE OF THE SECRETARY
(578673) Water Monitoring System
(East Baton Rouge)
Payable from General Obligation Bonds
Priority 1 $ 924,968
Priority 5 $ 1,800,000
Total $ 2,724,968
DEPARTMENT OF WILDLIFE AND FISHERIES
16/513 OFFICE OF WILDLIFE
(578294) Woodworth Central Office Complex and Pineville
Office/Region 3, Planning and Construction
(Rapides)
Payable from General Obligation Bonds
Priority 1 $ 2,022,698
Priority 5 $ 4,160,000
Total $ 6,182,698
(578307) Hammond Headquarters, Planning and Construction
(Tangipahoa)
Payable from General Obligation Bonds
Priority 1 $ 324,036
Page 35 of 174

HB NO. 2 ENROLLED
(578723) Kitterlin Creek Acquisition
(LaSalle)
Payable from General Obligation Bonds
Priority 5 $ 9,000,000
Payable from State General Fund (Direct) Non-Recurring
Revenues $ 2,000,000
Total $ 11,000,000
DEPARTMENT OF EDUCATION
19/601 LSU BATON ROUGE
(576747) Science - Strategic Capital Plan Repairs and Upgrades -
Food Science Renovation, New Science Building,
Infrastructure and Utilities, Planning and Construction
(East Baton Rouge)
Payable from General Obligation Bonds
Priority 1 $ 16,938,033
Priority 5 $ 2,000,000
Total $ 18,938,033
(576748) Louisiana State University Library Learning Commons
and Associated Infrastructure and Renovations
(East Baton Rouge)
Payable from General Obligation Bonds
Priority 1 $ 38,843,667
Priority 5 $ 95,200,000
Payable from Fees and Self-Generated Revenues $ 3,000,000
Total $ 137,043,667
(576749) Military and Security Sciences Center, Planning and
Construction
(East Baton Rouge)
Payable from General Obligation Bonds
Priority 1 $ 21,293,192
(576750) Construction Management & Engineering Sciences
Building, Planning and Construction
(East Baton Rouge)
Payable from General Obligation Bonds
Priority 5 $ 52,000,000
(576751) Veterinary Medicine Facilities Repairs/Addition
(East Baton Rouge)
Payable from General Obligation Bonds
Priority 1 $ 4,424,704
Priority 5 $ 5,680,000
Total $ 10,104,704
(578801) Facility Upgrade, Planning and Construction
(East Baton Rouge)
Payable from General Obligation Bonds
Priority 5 $ 9,000,000
Payable from Fees and Self-Generated Revenues $ 9,000,000
Total $ 18,000,000
Page 36 of 174

HB NO. 2 ENROLLED
(578984) Construction Education and Workforce Hub,
Planning and Construction
(East Baton Rouge)
Payable from General Obligation Bonds
Priority 5 $ 15,000,000
Payable from Fees and Self-Generated Revenues $ 15,000,000
Total $ 30,000,000
(579000) Louisiana State University Baton Rouge Campus
Capital Projects, Planning and Construction
(East Baton Rouge)
Payable from General Obligation Bonds
Priority 2 $ 81,499,596
Priority 5 $ 178,880,000
Total $ 260,379,596
Provided, however, that the funds appropriated herein shall be expended solely on the
following projects:
Science - Strategic Capital Plan Repairs and Upgrades - Food Science Renovation, New
Science Building, Infrastructure and Utilities
Library Learning Commons and Associated Infrastructure and Renovations
Military and Security Sciences Center
Construction Management & Engineering Sciences Building
Veterinary Medicine Facilities Repairs/Addition
Facility Upgrade
Construction Education and Workforce Hub
Notwithstanding the provisions of Section 5 of this Act which requires the approval of the
Joint Legislative Committee on the Budget, the director of the office of facility planning and
control is authorized to combine the specific projects listed within this appropriation into the
single project entitled Louisiana State University Baton Rouge Campus Capital Projects.
Furthermore, all appropriations for the specific projects combined into the single project
entitled Louisiana State University Baton Rouge Campus Capital Projects, including cash
appropriations, appropriations of fees and self-generated revenues, interagency transfers,
statutory dedications, general obligation bond appropriations, and appropriations from any
other means of finance, contained in this Act and any prior Capital Outlay Act, and all
previously approved cash and noncash lines of credit approved by the State Bond
Commission for the specific projects included within this appropriation shall transfer to and
be included within the Louisiana State University Baton Rouge Campus Capital Projects
appropriation when the projects are combined by the director of the office of facility
planning and control.
19/602 LSU ALEXANDRIA
(576628) Student Success Center, Planning and Construction
(Rapides)
Payable from General Obligation Bonds
Priority 1 $ 2,900,000
(576629) Downtown Health Services Center, Planning and
Construction
(Rapides)
Payable from General Obligation Bonds
Priority 1 $ 19,259,545
Priority 5 $ 9,885,000
Total $ 29,144,545
Page 37 of 174

HB NO. 2 ENROLLED
(576630) Workforce Academic Center, Planning and Construction
(Rapides)
Payable from General Obligation Bonds
Priority 5 $ 21,304,391
Payable from Fees and Self-Generated Revenues $ 2,000,000
Total $ 23,304,391
(578993) Parking Garage, Planning and Construction
(Rapides)
Payable from General Obligation Bonds
Priority 5 $ 6,750,000
Payable from State General Fund (Direct) $ 750,000
Total $ 7,500,000
( ) Property Acquisition
(Rapides)
Payable from General Obligation Bonds
Priority 2 $ 4,000,000
Pending approval of the capital outlay budget request pursuant to the provisions of R.S.
39:112.
19/603 UNIVERSITY OF NEW ORLEANS
(577089) Hotel, Restaurant and Tourism Program Relocation
Buildout to North Central Plant Building - Phase 1,
Planning and Construction
(Orleans)
Payable from General Obligation Bonds
Priority 1 $ 5,793,570
(577090) Miscellaneous Roof Replacements, Planning and
Construction
(Orleans)
Payable from General Obligation Bonds
Priority 1 $ 4,800,000
19/604 LSU HEALTH SCIENCES CENTER - NEW ORLEANS
(576587) LSUHSC-NO Medical Education Building Laboratory
Renovation, Phase 1, Planning and Construction
(Orleans)
Payable from General Obligation Bonds
Priority 1 $ 12,556
(576588) Health Science Center Facility Renovations - Dental
School Simulation Facility, Planning and Construction
(Orleans)
Payable from General Obligation Bonds
Priority 1 $ 20,931,927
Priority 5 $ 70,000,000
Total $ 90,931,927
(576592) Elevated Walkways Structural and ADA
Improvements, Planning and Construction
(Orleans)
Payable from General Obligation Bonds
Priority 5 $ 12,000,000
Page 38 of 174

HB NO. 2 ENROLLED
(576593) LSUHSC-NO Campus Stormwater Infrastructure Upgrades,
Planning and Construction
(Orleans)
Payable from General Obligation Bonds
Priority 5 $ 3,000,000
(578778) Center for Advanced Learning and Simulation
3rd Floor Renovations, Planning and Construction
(Orleans)
Payable from Fees and Self Generated Revenues $ 3,000,000
19/605 LSU EUNICE
(576942) Manuel Hall Exterior Wall and Roof Repair,
Planning and Construction
(Acadia)
Payable from General Obligation Bonds
Priority 1 $ 1,054,802
(576943) Athletic Complex Facility, Planning and Construction
(Acadia)
Payable from General Obligation Bonds
Priority 1 $ 228,007
Priority 5 $ 4,750,000
Payable from State General Fund (Direct) Non-Recurring
Revenues $ 4,750,000
Total $ 9,728,007
(576944) STEAM Innovation Center, Phase 1,
Planning and Construction
(Acadia)
Payable from General Obligation Bonds
Priority 1 $ 9,500,000
Priority 5 $ 13,400,000
Total $ 22,900,000
19/606 LSU SHREVEPORT
(576634) HPE Renovation for Student Wellness Facility and
Campus Repairs, Planning and Construction
(Caddo)
Payable from General Obligation Bonds
Priority 5 $ 9,000,000
Payable from the balance of the Capital Outlay Savings
Fund previously allocated under the authority of Act 2
of 2025 for Shreveport, Shreveport Healthcare and
Development Corridor, Planning and Construction
(Caddo) $ 1,500,000
Total $ 10,500,000
(576848) Building Exterior Walls and Bridge Repair,
Planning and Construction
(Caddo)
Payable from General Obligation Bonds
Priority 1 $ 951,628
Page 39 of 174

HB NO. 2 ENROLLED
(576900) High Voltage Grid System, Planning and
Construction
(Caddo)
Payable from General Obligation Bonds
Priority 5 $ 4,120,000
Payable from State General Fund (Direct) Non-Recurring
Revenues $ 500,000
Total $ 4,620,000
19/607 LSU AGRICULTURAL CENTER
(576601) Food Innovation Center, Planning and Construction
(East Baton Rouge)
Payable from General Obligation Bonds
Priority 1 $ 1,993,355
Priority 5 $ 2,000,000
Payable from State General Fund (Direct) Non-Recurring
Revenues $ 750,000
Total $ 4,743,355
(576606) Animal and Food Science Facilities Renovations and
Modernization, Phase I through Phase V, Planning and
Construction
(East Baton Rouge)
Payable from General Obligation Bonds
Priority 1 $ 1,460,479
Priority 5 $ 28,203,500
Total $ 29,663,979
(576607) Renewable and Natural Resources Building Repairs,
Planning and Construction
(East Baton Rouge)
Payable from General Obligation Bonds
Priority 1 $ 2,499,874
Priority 5 $ 2,500,000
Total $ 4,999,874
(576611) John M. Parker Agricultural Center & Livestock Show Barn
Renovations and Repairs
(East Baton Rouge)
Payable from General Obligation Bonds
Priority 1 $ 1,500,000
Priority 5 $ 21,500,000
Total $ 23,000,000
(578935) Dean Lee Tornado Damage Building Repairs and
Reconstruction
(Rapides)
Payable from General Obligation Bonds
Priority 1 $ 97,687
19/609 PENNINGTON BIOMEDICAL RESEARCH CENTER
(576605) Replacement of Underground Chilled Water & Hot Water
Piping, Both Supply and Return, Planning and Construction
(East Baton Rouge)
Payable from General Obligation Bonds
Priority 1 $ 2,200,000
Page 40 of 174

HB NO. 2 ENROLLED
19/611 LSU HEALTH SCIENCES CENTER - SHREVEPORT
(576740) Comprehensive Emergency Water Supply Improvements,
Planning and Construction
(Caddo)
Payable from General Obligation Bonds
Priority 1 $ 4,920,006
(576741) Gross Anatomy Lab Expansion and Modernization,
Planning and Construction
(Caddo)
Payable from General Obligation Bonds
Priority 1 $ 26,872
(576742) Center for Medical Education and Wellness, Planning and
Construction
(Caddo)
Payable from General Obligation Bonds
Priority 1 $ 1,077,028
(576743) Stonewall Animal Research and Training Facility, Planning
and Construction
(DeSoto)
Payable from General Obligation Bonds
Priority 5 $ 5,000,000
(578410) Student and Faculty Parking Expansion, Planning and
Construction
(Caddo)
Payable from General Obligation Bonds
Priority 5 $ 3,000,000
19/612 BATON ROUGE COMMUNITY COLLEGE
(577595) Campus Development, Planning and Construction
(Pointe Coupee)
Payable from General Obligation Bonds
Priority 1 $ 4,000,000
Priority 5 $ 2,000,000
Total $ 6,000,000
(577596) Office of Motor Vehicles Building and Campus
Renovation, Demolition and Improvements,
Planning and Construction
(East Baton Rouge)
Payable from General Obligation Bonds
Priority 1 $ 6,789,354
19/614 SOUTHERN UNIVERSITY LAW CENTER
(577088) Renovations and Addition to Existing Law Library,
Planning and Construction
(East Baton Rouge)
Payable from General Obligation Bonds
Priority 1 $ 9,372,184
Page 41 of 174

HB NO. 2 ENROLLED
19/616 SOUTHERN UNIVERSITY - BATON ROUGE
(577072) Global Innovation and Welcome Center, Phase II, Planning
and Construction
(East Baton Rouge)
Payable from General Obligation Bonds
Priority 5 $ 30,000,000
Payable from State General Fund (Direct) Non-Recurring
Revenues $ 1,680,000
Total $ 31,680,000
(577073) New STEM Science Complex, Planning and Construction
(East Baton Rouge)
Payable from General Obligation Bonds
Priority 1 $ 50,684,466
(577074) College of Business/Professional Accountancy, Planning
and Construction
(East Baton Rouge)
Payable from General Obligation Bonds
Priority 1 $ 18,456,267
Priority 5 $ 25,000,000
Payable from Fees and Self-Generated Revenues $ 10,000,000
Total $ 53,456,267
(577075) J. K. Haynes Hall School of Nursing Renovation and
Addition, Planning and Construction
(East Baton Rouge)
Payable from General Obligation Bonds
Priority 1 $ 10,300,000
(577076) New Southern University Laboratory School Complex,
Planning and Construction
(East Baton Rouge)
Payable from General Obligation Bonds
Priority 1 $ 1,469,524
Priority 5 $ 71,500,000
Total $ 72,969,524
(577077) Replace Chilled Water Lines, Planning and Construction
(East Baton Rouge)
Payable from General Obligation Bonds
Priority 1 $ 24,500,000
Priority 5 $ 7,500,000
Total $ 32,000,000
(577078) Ravine, Bluff and Riverbank Stabilization Project, Planning
and Construction
(East Baton Rouge)
Payable from General Obligation Bonds
Priority 1 $ 1,500,000
Priority 5 $ 30,500,600
Payable from Federal Funds via Interagency Transfers $ 7,565,000
Total $ 39,565,600
Page 42 of 174

HB NO. 2 ENROLLED
(578639) A.O. Williams Hall Renovations, Planning and Construction
(East Baton Rouge)
Payable from General Obligation Bonds
Priority 1 $ 10,941,331
Priority 5 $ 8,441,346
Payable from State General Fund (Direct) Non-Recurring
Revenues $ 14,500,000
Total $ 33,882,677
(578934) Stewart Hall - Wall Mount HVAC Units 1st, 2nd and 3rd
Floors, Planning and Construction
(East Baton Rouge)
Payable from General Obligation Bonds
Priority 1 $ 1,663,215
Priority 5 $ 1,200,000
Total $ 2,863,215
(579005) Southern University Baton Rouge Campus
Capital Projects, Planning and Construction
(East Baton Rouge)
Payable from General Obligation Bonds
Priority 2 $ 115,514,803
Priority 5 $ 178,141,946
Total $ 293,656,749
Provided, however, that the funds appropriated herein shall be expended solely on the
following projects:
Global Innovation and Welcome Center, Phase II
New STEM Science Complex
College of Business/Professional Accountancy
J. K. Haynes Hall School of Nursing Renovation and Addition
New Southern University Laboratory School Complex
Replace Chilled Water Lines
Ravine, Bluff and Riverbank Stabilization Project
A.O. Williams Hall Renovations
Stewart Hall - Wall Mount HVAC Units 1st, 2nd and 3rd Floors
Notwithstanding the provisions of Section 5 of this Act which requires the approval of the
Joint Legislative Committee on the Budget, the director of the office of facility planning and
control is authorized to combine the specific projects listed within this appropriation into the
single project entitled Southern University Baton Rouge Campus Capital Projects.
Furthermore, all appropriations for the specific projects combined into the single project
entitled Southern University Baton Rouge Campus Capital Projects, including cash
appropriations, appropriations of fees and self-generated revenues, interagency transfers,
statutory dedications, general obligation bond appropriations, and appropriations from any
other means of finance, contained in this Act and any prior Capital Outlay Act, and all
previously approved cash and noncash lines of credit approved by the State Bond
Commission for the specific projects included within this appropriation shall transfer to and
be included within the Southern University Baton Rouge Campus Capital Projects
appropriation when the projects are combined by the director of the office of facility
planning and control.
19/617 SOUTHERN UNIVERSITY - NEW ORLEANS
(577079) University Cafeteria, Planning and Construction
(Orleans)
Payable from General Obligation Bonds
Priority 1 $ 7,411,545
Priority 5 $ 6,900,000
Total $ 14,311,545
Page 43 of 174

HB NO. 2 ENROLLED
(577086) Nursing and Allied Health Building, Planning and
Construction
(Orleans)
Payable from Fees and Self-Generated Revenues $ 3,000,000
(577087) University Housing Renovation, Planning and Construction
(Orleans)
Payable from General Obligation Bonds
Priority 2 $ 19,500,000
(578932) ADA Compliant Restrooms and Public Accommodations
in the Cafeteria, University Center, Health & Physical
Education, Library and Administration Building, Planning
and Construction
(Orleans)
Payable from General Obligation Bonds
Priority 1 $ 977,998
(578933) Campus Exterior Lighting Upgrades, Planning and
Construction
(Orleans)
Payable from General Obligation Bonds
Priority 1 $ 100,062
19/618 SOUTHERN UNIVERSITY - SHREVEPORT
(577081) Domestic Water Loop, Hot Water Loop and Drainage
Improvements, Planning and Construction
(Caddo)
Payable from General Obligation Bonds
Priority 5 $ 7,480,000
(577082) New Workforce Training and Technology Center, Planning
and Construction
(Caddo)
Payable from General Obligation Bonds
Priority 1 $ 1,506,598
Priority 5 $ 17,500,000
Total $ 19,006,598
(577085) Louis Collier Hall Science Building Replacement, Planning
and Construction
(Caddo)
Payable from General Obligation Bonds
Priority 1 $ 5,454,083
Priority 5 $ 12,450,000
Total $ 17,904,083
19/619 SOUTHERN UNIVERSITY - BATON ROUGE
(578961) Disaster Relief Mega Shelter and Safe Room, Planning and
Construction
(East Baton Rouge)
Payable from General Obligation Bonds
Priority 1 $ 1,138,067
Priority 5 $ 9,200,000
Total $ 10,338,067
Page 44 of 174

HB NO. 2 ENROLLED
19/621 NICHOLLS STATE UNIVERSITY
(576406) Didier Fieldhouse, Planning and Construction
(Lafourche)
Payable from General Obligation Bonds
Priority 1 $ 3,100,000
(576407) Women's Student Athlete Performance Center, Planning
and Construction
(Lafourche)
Payable from General Obligation Bonds
Priority 1 $ 3,700,000
(576408) New Nursing Building, Planning and Construction
(Lafourche)
Payable from General Obligation Bonds
Priority 1 $ 12,143,600
(576409) May and Harvey Peltier Center (Welcome Center-Alumni
House), Planning and Construction
(Lafourche)
Payable from General Obligation Bonds
Priority 1 $ 1,000,000
Priority 5 $ 3,335,000
Total $ 4,335,000
(576422) Coastal Center Facility, Planning and Construction
(Lafourche)
Payable from General Obligation Bonds
Priority 5 $ 3,500,000
Payable from Fees and Self-Generated Revenues $ 3,500,000
Total $ 7,000,000
(576423) Al Danos New College of Business/School of Marine
Transportation Building, Planning and Construction
(Lafourche)
Payable from General Obligation Bonds
Priority 1 $ 2,500,000
Priority 5 $ 22,500,000
Total $ 25,000,000
19/623 GRAMBLING STATE UNIVERSITY
(577133) Reroof, Waterproof, Envelope Repairs for Various
Buildings, Planning and Construction
(Lincoln)
Payable from General Obligation Bonds
Priority 1 $ 4,500,000
Priority 5 $ 4,000,000
Total $ 8,500,000
(577135) Criminal Justice Building Renovation
(Lincoln)
Payable from General Obligation Bonds
Priority 1 $ 696,301
Priority 2 $ 12,000,000
Priority 5 $ 4,000,000
Total $ 16,696,301
Page 45 of 174

HB NO. 2 ENROLLED
(577297) Indoor Athletics Facility, Planning and Construction
(Lincoln)
Payable from General Obligation Bonds
Priority 5 $ 12,000,000
Payable from Fees and Self-Generated
Revenues $ 6,700,000
Payable from the Capital Outlay Savings Fund $ 6,000,000
Total $ 24,700,000
(578931) Campus Utility Infrastructure Assessment Emergency
Repair/Replacement, Planning and Construction
(Lincoln)
Payable from General Obligation Bonds
Priority 1 $ 7,277,741
(578986) Construction of Campus Dining and Student Union
Facility, Planning and Construction
(Lincoln)
Payable from Fees and Self-Generated Revenues $ 25,000,000
(578987) Construction of GSU Hotel and Conference Center,
Planning and Construction
(Lincoln)
Payable from Fees and Self-Generated Revenues $ 43,000,000
(578991) Campus Perimeter Fencing, Planning and Construction
(Lincoln)
Payable from Fees and Self-Generated Revenues $ 5,000,000
(578992) Deferred Maintenance Repairs, Planning and Construction
(Lincoln)
Payable from Fees and Self-Generated Revenues $ 16,400,000
19/625 LOUISIANA TECH UNIVERSITY
(576716) Renovation of George T. Madison Hall, Planning and
Construction
(Lincoln)
Payable from General Obligation Bonds
Priority 1 $ 31,683,762
Priority 5 $ 5,000,000
Total $ 36,683,762
(576733) Wyly Tower - Prescott Library - Emergency Waterproofing
and Restoration, Planning and Construction
(Lincoln)
Payable from General Obligation Bonds
Priority 2 $ 500,000
Priority 5 $ 4,500,000
Total $ 5,000,000
(578927) Agriculture and Forestry Wood Products Education and
Research Center, Planning and Construction
(Lincoln)
Payable from General Obligation Bonds
Priority 1 $ 9,416,818
Page 46 of 174

HB NO. 2 ENROLLED
(578928) Central Steam Generator - Switch Gear, Planning and
Construction
(Lincoln)
Payable from General Obligation Bonds
Priority 1 $ 169,906
(578929) Athletic Academic Center, Planning and Construction
(Lincoln)
Payable from General Obligation Bonds
Priority 1 $ 1,860
19/627 MCNEESE STATE UNIVERSITY
(577048) Burton Business Center Exterior Mitigation, Planning and
Construction
(Calcasieu)
Payable from General Obligation Bonds
Priority 1 $ 7,000,000
(577049) Cowboy Stadium Repairs and Code Upgrade,
Planning and Construction
(Calcasieu)
Payable from General Obligation Bonds
Priority 2 $ 200,000
Priority 5 $ 1,800,000
Total $ 2,000,000
(577242) Shearman Fine Arts Building Renovation and Addition,
Planning and Construction
(Calcasieu)
Payable from General Obligation Bonds
Priority 1 $ 4,182,206
(577243) McNeese Disaster Recovery, Planning and Construction
(Calcasieu)
Payable from General Obligation Bonds
Priority 1 $ 6,661,316
(577244) Contraband Bayou Erosion Retaining Wall, Phase II,
Planning and Construction
(Calcasieu)
Payable from General Obligation Bonds
Priority 1 $ 414,114
Priority 5 $ 2,200,000
Total $ 2,614,114
19/629 UNIVERSITY OF LOUISIANA - MONROE
(576666) Brown Hall Renovation, Planning and Construction
(Ouachita)
Payable from General Obligation Bonds
Priority 5 $ 10,500,000
Payable from State General Fund (Direct) Non-Recurring
Revenues $ 650,000
Total $ 11,150,000
(578920) Health Science Complex Renovation, Sugar Hall and
Caldwell Hall, Planning and Construction
(Ouachita)
Payable from General Obligation Bonds
Priority 1 $ 3,765,676
Page 47 of 174

HB NO. 2 ENROLLED
19/631 NORTHWESTERN STATE UNIVERSITY
(577059) Renovation of Nursing Education Center at Warrington
Place (Shreveport Campus), Planning and Construction
(Caddo)
Payable from General Obligation Bonds
Priority 1 $ 7,000,000
Priority 5 $ 10,525,000
Total $ 17,525,000
(578919) Replacement of John S. Kyser Hall, Planning and
Construction
(Natchitoches)
Payable from General Obligation Bonds
Priority 1 $ 6,544,641
19/634 SOUTHEASTERN LOUISIANA UNIVERSITY
(576508) Academic Athletic Training and Ancillary Athletic Facility,
Planning and Construction
(Tangipahoa)
Payable from General Obligation Bonds
Priority 1 $ 16,814,543
Priority 5 $ 3,400,000
Payable from State General Fund (Direct) Non-Recurring
Revenues $ 5,800,000
Payable from Fees and Self-Generated Revenues $ 1,000,000
Total $ 27,014,543
(576509) Baton Rouge Nursing Center Renovation, Planning and
Construction
(East Baton Rouge)
Payable from General Obligation Bonds
Priority 1 $ 13,210,900
Priority 5 $ 2,000,000
Total $ 15,210,900
(576510) Nursing and Health Science Building, Planning and
Construction
(Tangipahoa)
Payable from General Obligation Bonds
Priority 1 $ 1,001,729
Priority 5 $ 30,300,000
Total $ 31,301,729
(578918) D. Vickers Hall Renovation and Addition, Planning and
Construction
(Tangipahoa)
Payable from General Obligation Bonds
Priority 1 $ 6,978,220
19/640 UNIVERSITY OF LOUISIANA - LAFAYETTE
(577039) Health Care Education and Training Facility and UL/LSU
Health Science Education Collaboration Building, Planning
and Construction
(Lafayette)
Payable from General Obligation Bonds
Priority 1 $ 21,425,391
Priority 5 $ 91,920,000
Total $ 113,345,391
Page 48 of 174

HB NO. 2 ENROLLED
(577040) Engineering Classroom Building, Planning and Construction
(Lafayette)
Payable from General Obligation Bonds
Priority 1 $ 27,894,149
Priority 5 $ 32,876,573
Total $ 60,770,722
(577041) Kinesiology, Hospitality Management, and Athletic
Administration Complex, Engineering, Stabilization,
Equipment, Planning and Construction
(Lafayette)
Payable from General Obligation Bonds
Priority 1 $ 3,854,466
Priority 5 $ 48,141,000
Total $ 51,995,466
(577042) Sciences Lab/Classroom Building, Planning and
Construction
(Lafayette)
Payable from General Obligation Bonds
Priority 1 $ 1,450,000
Priority 5 $ 57,600,000
Total $ 59,050,000
(577043) Learning Lab, Planning and Construction
(Lafayette)
Payable from General Obligation Bonds
Priority 5 $ 57,000,000
(577044) Billeaud Hall Renovation, Planning and Construction
(Lafayette)
Payable from General Obligation Bonds
Priority 5 $ 49,500,000
(577045) Montgomery Hall Renovation, Planning and Construction
(Lafayette)
Payable from General Obligation Bonds
Priority 5 $ 50,500,000
(578914) Foster Hall Renovation, Planning and Construction
(Lafayette)
Payable from General Obligation Bonds
Priority 1 $ 292,272
(578915) DeClouet Hall Renovation, Planning and Construction
(Lafayette)
Payable from General Obligation Bonds
Priority 1 $ 84,335
(578999) University of Louisiana Lafayette Campus
Capital Projects, Planning and Construction
(Lafayette)
Payable from General Obligation Bonds
Priority 2 $ 55,000,613
Priority 5 $ 387,537,573
Total $ 442,538,186
Provided, however, that the funds appropriated herein shall be expended solely on the
following projects:
Page 49 of 174

HB NO. 2 ENROLLED
Health Care Education and Training Facility and UL/LSU Health Science Education
Collaboration Building
Engineering Classroom Building
Kinesiology, Hospitality Management, and Athletic Administration Complex
Sciences Lab/Classroom Building
Learning Lab
Billeaud Hall Renovation
Montgomery Hall Renovation
Foster Hall Renovation
DeClouet Hall Renovation
Notwithstanding the provisions of Section 5 of this Act which requires the approval of the
Joint Legislative Committee on the Budget, the director of the office of facility planning and
control is authorized to combine the specific projects listed within this appropriation into the
single project entitled University of Louisiana Lafayette Campus Capital Projects.
Furthermore, all appropriations for the specific projects combined into the single project
entitled University of Louisiana Lafayette Campus Capital Projects, including cash
appropriations, appropriations of fees and self-generated revenues, interagency transfers,
statutory dedications, general obligation bond appropriations, and appropriations from any
other means of finance, contained in this Act and any prior Capital Outlay Act, and all
previously approved cash and noncash lines of credit approved by the State Bond
Commission for the specific projects included within this appropriation shall transfer to and
be included within the University of Louisiana Lafayette Campus Capital Projects
appropriation when the projects are combined by the director of the office of facility
planning and control.
19/647 LOUISIANA DELTA COMMUNITY COLLEGE
(577593) Campus Development for Louisiana Delta Community
College, Planning and Construction
(Union)
Payable from General Obligation Bonds
Priority 1 $ 600,000
Priority 5 $ 16,900,000
Total $ 17,500,000
(578913) Campus Expansion for Louisiana Delta Community
College, Winnsboro, Planning and Construction
(Franklin)
Payable from General Obligation Bonds
Priority 1 $ 2,463
19/649 LOUISIANA COMMUNITY AND TECHNICAL COLLEGE SYSTEM
(577400) Central Louisiana Technical Community College - Campus
Development Rod Brady Campus, Planning and
Construction
(LaSalle)
Payable from General Obligation Bonds
Priority 5 $ 17,500,000
Payable from State General Fund (Direct) Non-Recurring
Revenues $ 1,500,000
Total $ 19,000,000
(577590) Resurface Campus Parking, Planning and Construction
(Calcasieu)
Payable from General Obligation Bonds
Priority 1 $ 635,020
Priority 5 $ 2,000,000
Total $ 2,635,020
Page 50 of 174

HB NO. 2 ENROLLED
(577591) Maritime/Petroleum Workforce Training Academy,
Planning and Construction
(Terrebonne)
Payable from General Obligation Bonds
Priority 5 $ 9,334,817
19/656 LOUISIANA SPECIAL SCHOOL DISTRICT
(578661) Replacement of Air Handling Units (AHU) on the
Administrative Building and B1 Building, Planning and
Construction
(East Baton Rouge)
Payable from Interagency Transfers $ 500,000
(578662) Roof Replacement - Louisiana School for the Deaf Middle
and High School and Vocational School, Planning and
Construction
(East Baton Rouge)
Payable from Interagency Transfers $ 717,877
19/657 LOUISIANA SCHOOL FOR MATH, SCIENCE AND THE ARTS
(577257) Louisiana School for Math, Science, and the Arts and
Northwestern State University Innovation Center, Planning
and Construction
(Natchitoches)
Payable from General Obligation Bonds
Priority 1 $ 6,900,000
Priority 5 $ 6,900,000
Total $ 13,800,000
19/671 BOARD OF REGENTS
(578907) Major Repairs and Deferred Maintenance of Buildings and
Facilities, Planning and Construction
(Statewide)
Payable from General Obligation Bonds
Priority 5 $ 10,000,000
(578908) System-Wide Telecommunications Wiring and Equipment,
Planning and Construction
(Statewide)
Payable from General Obligation Bonds
Priority 1 $ 1,995,822
(578911) Land Acquisition for Post Secondary Educational
Institutions
(Statewide)
Payable from General Obligation Bonds
Priority 1 $ 160,908
19/674 LOUISIANA UNIVERSITIES MARINE CONSORTIUM
(578572) Research Vessel (R/V Pelican) Replacement
(Terrebonne)
Payable from General Obligation Bonds
Priority 1 $ 20,823,903
Page 51 of 174

HB NO. 2 ENROLLED
(578573) Houma Marine Campus Phase 2, Planning and Construction
(Terrebonne)
Payable from General Obligation Bonds
Priority 1 $ 14,740,647
19/712 LOUISIANA TECHNICAL COLLEGE-SULLIVAN CAMPUS
(577589) New Diesel Automotive Building, Northshore Technical
Community College - Sullivan Campus, Planning and Construction
(Washington)
Payable from General Obligation Bonds
Priority 1 $ 11,585,635
19/731 FLETCHER TECHNICAL COMMUNITY COLLEGE
(577588) Precision Agriculture Training Facility, Planning and
Construction
(Terrebonne)
Payable from General Obligation Bonds
Priority 1 $ 5,441,625
19/788 NORTHSHORE TECHNICAL COMMUNITY COLLEGE
(577587) Livingston Campus Expansion, Planning and Construction
(Livingston)
Payable from General Obligation Bonds
Priority 5 $ 9,200,000
(579027) New Hammond Area Campus, Planning and Construction
(Tangipahoa)
Payable from General Obligation Bonds
Priority 5 $ 38,975,000
JUDICAL EXPENSES
23/949 LOUISIANA JUDICIARY
(578900) Land Acquisition, Planning, and Construction of New
Courthouse for the Louisiana Court of Appeal, Third Circuit
(Calcasieu)
Payable from General Obligation Bonds
Priority 1 $ 268,700
LEVEE DISTRICTS AND PORTS
36/L03 LAFOURCHE BASIN LEVEE DISTRICT
(578253) West Bank and Vicinity Western Tie-In, Planning and
Construction
(St. James)
Payable from General Obligation Bonds
Priority 5 $ 30,000,000
36/L13 PONTCHARTRAIN LEVEE DISTRICT
(578551) Lake Pontchartrain West Shore Hurricane Protection
Project Enhancement
(Ascension, St. Charles, St. James, St. John the Baptist)
Payable from General Obligation Bonds
Priority 1 $ 10,566,307
Page 52 of 174

HB NO. 2 ENROLLED
(579022) Bayou Manchac Regional Clearing and Snagging,
Planning and Construction
(Ascension, East Baton Rouge, Iberville)
Payable from General Obligation Bonds
Priority 5 $ 7,370,000
(578647) Bayou Manchac Regional Flood Risk Reduction Permitting
(Ascension, East Baton Rouge, Iberville)
Payable from General Obligation Bonds
Priority 5 $ 1,240,000
(578648) LA 22 Gapping Project, Planning and Construction
(Ascension, Livingston, St. James)
Payable from General Obligation Bonds
Priority 2 $ 1,000,000
Priority 5 $ 2,990,000
Total $ 3,990,000
(578899) Amite Diversion Canal Weir, Planning and Construction
(Ascension, Livingston, St. James)
Payable from General Obligation Bonds
Priority 5 $ 11,000,000
36/L15 SQUIRREL RUN LEVEE DRAINAGE DISTRICT
(577399) Maintenance of Levee and FEMA Certification
(Iberia)
Payable from General Obligation Bonds
Priority 1 $ 21,488
Payable from State General Fund (Direct) Non-Recurring
Revenues $ 200,000
Total $ 221,488
36/L16 SOUTH LAFOURCHE LEVEE DISTRICT
(576774) Larose to Golden Meadow Pump Station SCADA
System, Planning and Construction
(Lafourche)
Payable from State General Fund (Direct) Non-Recurring
Revenues $ 1,600,000
(578898) Larose to Golden Meadow Hurricane Protection System,
Planning and Construction
(Lafourche)
Payable from General Obligation Bonds
Priority 5 $ 10,200,000
36/L25 GRAND ISLE INDEPENDENT LEVEE DISTRICT
(578265) Grand Isle Back Levee Flood Protection, Planning and
Construction
(Jefferson)
Payable from General Obligation Bonds
Priority 1 $ 1,500,000
Page 53 of 174

HB NO. 2 ENROLLED
36/L26 NATCHITOCHES LEVEE AND DRAINAGE DISTRICT
(578449) Levee Setbacks for the Campti-Clarence Levee and
Powhatan Levee, Planning and Construction
(Natchitoches)
Payable from General Obligation Bonds
Priority 1 $ 865,000
Priority 5 $ 2,160,000
Payable from State General Fund (Direct) $ 800,000
Total $ 3,825,000
36/L27 TERREBONNE LEVEE AND CONSERVATION DISTRICT
(577568) District Office Building/Satellite EOC and Louisiana
Department of Wildlife and Fisheries Facility, Planning
and Construction
(Terrebonne)
Payable from General Obligation Bonds
Priority 5 $ 7,100,000
Payable from the Capital Outlay Savings Fund $ 2,500,000
Total $ 9,600,000
36/L30 SOUTHEAST LOUISIANA FLOOD PROTECTION
AUTHORITY EAST
(576886) Lakefront Airport Flood Protection, Planning,
Design, and Permit Analysis
(Orleans)
Payable from General Obligation Bonds
Priority 2 $ 500,000
Priority 5 $ 22,000,000
Total $ 22,500,000
36/L34 LAKEFRONT MANAGEMENT AUTHORITY
(576757) Seabrook Public Boat Launch Rehabilitation, Planning and
Construction
(Orleans)
Payable from General Obligation Bonds
Priority 1 $ 92,800
Priority 5 $ 1,780,000
Total $ 1,872,800
36/L36 LAFITTE AREA INDEPENDENT LEVEE DISTRICT
(578578) Goose Bayou/The Pen Levee Basin, Planning and
Construction
(Jefferson)
Payable from General Obligation Bonds
Priority 1 $ 1,000,000
(578894) Lower Lafitte (Orange Street) Basin, Planning and
Construction
(Jefferson)
Payable from General Obligation Bonds
Priority 1 $ 3,570,631
Page 54 of 174

HB NO. 2 ENROLLED
36/P00 VIDALIA PORT
(576692) Vidalia Port Expansion, Phase 3, Planning
and Construction
(Concordia)
Payable from General Obligation Bonds
Priority 2 $ 500,000
Priority 5 $ 4,500,000
Total $ 5,000,000
36/P02 CAMERON PARISH PORT HARBOR AND TERMINAL DISTRICT
(578767) Dock Restoration and Expansion, Planning and Construction
(Cameron)
Payable from General Obligation Bonds
Priority 5 $ 4,400,000
Payable from State General Fund (Direct) Non-Recurring
Revenues $ 500,000
Total $ 4,900,000
36/P03 GREATER BATON ROUGE PORT COMMISSION
(578891) Inland Rivers Marine Terminal Dock and Access Roadway
Construction Project, Planning and Construction
(East Baton Rouge)
Payable from General Obligation Bonds
Priority 5 $ 14,759,790
36/P04 CADDO/BOSSIER PARISH PORT
(578606) Caddo Bossier Parishes Port Commission Land Purchase,
Planning and Construction
(Caddo)
Payable from General Obligation Bonds
Priority 1 $ 8,000,000
36/P05 WEST CALCASIEU PORT
(578077) New Property Along Gulf Intracoastal Waterway, Planning
and Construction
(Calcasieu)
Payable from General Obligation Bonds
Priority 1 $ 500,000
Priority 5 $ 1,500,000
Total $ 2,000,000
(578078) Construct New Dredged Material Reception Area,
Planning and Construction
(Calcasieu)
Payable from General Obligation Bonds
Priority 5 $ 2,700,000
36/P10 GREATER LAFOURCHE PORT COMMISSION
(577564) Fourchon Bridge and Connector Road, Planning and
Construction
(Lafourche)
Payable from General Obligation Bonds
Priority 1 $ 4,447,500
Priority 5 $ 5,410,000
Total $ 9,857,500
Page 55 of 174

HB NO. 2 ENROLLED
(577565) Port Fourchon to Belle Pass Channel Deepening Project,
Planning and Construction
(Lafourche)
Payable from General Obligation Bonds
Priority 1 $ 2,000,000
Priority 5 $ 18,000,000
Total $ 20,000,000
36/P15 MORGAN CITY PORT
(576949) Dock Expansion - Bulkheading, State Drydock Repair, and
Related Dredging, Planning and Construction
(St. Mary)
Payable from General Obligation Bonds
Priority 1 $ 8,000,000
Priority 5 $ 27,000,000
Total $ 35,000,000
36/P16 IBERIA PORT
(578270) Road Repair, Replacement, and Improvements, Planning
and Construction
(Iberia)
Payable from General Obligation Bonds
Priority 1 $ 1,700,000
Priority 5 $ 13,000,000
Payable from State General Fund (Direct) Non-Recurring
Revenues $ 3,300,000
Total $ 18,000,000
(578272) Acadiana Gulf of Mexico Access Channel (AGMAC),
Port of Iberia, Planning, Design, Dredging Construction,
Rights-of-Way, Relocations and Utilities
(Iberia)
Payable from General Obligation Bonds
Priority 5 $ 5,000,000
36/P17 PORT OF NEW ORLEANS
(578166) Louisiana International Terminal Drainage, Site
Preparation, Mitigation, Roadway and Rail Improvements,
Planning and Construction
(St. Bernard)
Payable from General Obligation Bonds
Priority 5 $ 140,000,000
(578167) St. Claude Bridge Rehabilitation, Planning and Construction
(Orleans)
Payable from General Obligation Bonds
Priority 5 $ 27,500,000
(578168) St. Bernard Transportation Corridor, Planning and
Construction
(St. Bernard)
Payable from General Obligation Bonds
Priority 1 $ 2,000,000
Priority 5 $ 48,000,000
Total $ 50,000,000
Page 56 of 174

HB NO. 2 ENROLLED
36/P20 ST. BERNARD PORT
(578484) Arabi Terminal Roadway Improvements, Planning and
Construction
(St. Bernard)
Payable from General Obligation Bonds
Priority 1 $ 1,300,000
Priority 5 $ 1,300,000
Total $ 2,600,000
36/P21 PORT OF SOUTH LOUISIANA
(576953) Globalplex New Guard Station, Planning and Construction
(St. John the Baptist)
Payable from General Obligation Bonds
Priority 1 $ 1,580,000
(576954) Globalplex Rail Connector, Planning and Construction
(St. John the Baptist)
Payable from General Obligation Bonds
Priority 5 $ 3,640,000
(576955) Globalplex Terminal Building #71 and Other Globalplex
Terminal Building Upgrades, Planning and Construction
(St. John the Baptist)
Payable from General Obligation Bonds
Priority 1 $ 567,361
Priority 5 $ 1,000,000
Total $ 1,567,361
(576956) Globalplex Warehouse and Conveyance System, Planning
and Construction
(St. John the Baptist)
Payable from General Obligation Bonds
Priority 5 $ 24,385,000
(576960) Globalplex Roadway Improvements: Parking Area near
Building 60, Planning and Construction
(St. John the Baptist)
Payable from General Obligation Bonds
Priority 1 $ 743,152
(576962) Globalplex Dock Access Bridge and Equipment
Replacement/Repair, Planning and Construction
(St. John the Baptist)
Payable from General Obligation Bonds
Priority 1 $ 1,012,032
(576963) Globalplex Road Improvements and Drainage Between
Globalplex Buildings 71 and 76, Planning and Construction
(St. John the Baptist)
Payable from General Obligation Bonds
Priority 1 $ 437,188
(578881) Globalplex Roadway Improvements at Parking Area Near
Building 2, Planning and Construction
(St. John the Baptist)
Payable from General Obligation Bonds
Priority 1 $ 2,865,000
Page 57 of 174

HB NO. 2 ENROLLED
36/P23 TERREBONNE PORT COMMISSION
(577002) Maritime Manufacturing Facility, Planning and Construction
(Terrebonne)
Payable from General Obligation Bonds
Priority 1 $ 18,000,000
Priority 5 $ 26,000,000
Total $ 44,000,000
(577003) Slip Dredging, Houma Navigation Canal Dredging,
Planning and Construction
(Terrebonne)
Payable from General Obligation Bonds
Priority 5 $ 2,000,000
36/P26 PORT OF LAKE CHARLES
(576909) Berths 4, 5, and 6 Wharf and Shed Reconstruction at City
Docks, Planning and Construction
(Calcasieu)
Payable from General Obligation Bonds
Priority 1 $ 17,641,023
Priority 5 $ 33,900,000
Total $ 51,541,023
(578879) Two Mobile Harbor Cranes for BT-1, Planning and
Construction
(Calcasieu)
Payable from General Obligation Bonds
Priority 1 $ 574,501
36/P33 SOUTH TANGIPAHOA PARISH PORT
(577650) Building 2 Barge Dock Restoration and Improvements,
Planning and Construction
(Tangipahoa)
Payable from General Obligation Bonds
Priority 5 $ 1,000,000
36/P35 MERMENTAU RIVER HARBOR AND TERMINAL
DISTRICT
(578877) Slip Improvements, Planning and Construction
(Acadia)
Payable from General Obligation Bonds
Priority 1 $ 57,852
36/P36 CENTRAL LOUISIANA REGIONAL PORT
(577513) CLRP High Water Hardstand and Access Road, Planning
and Construction
(Rapides)
Payable from General Obligation Bonds
Priority 1 $ 97,989
Priority 5 $ 1,800,000
Payable from the Capital Outlay Savings Fund $ 800,000
Total $ 2,697,989
Page 58 of 174

HB NO. 2 ENROLLED
36/P41 JEFFERSON PARISH ECONOMIC DEVELOPMENT
AND PORT DISTRICT
(577350) Restore Rail Connection and Crossing to Avondale Marine,
Planning and Construction
(Jefferson)
Payable from General Obligation Bonds
Priority 1 $ 1,100,000
Priority 5 $ 2,700,000
Total $ 3,800,000
36/P43 COLUMBIA PORT COMMISSION
(576691) Railroad Spur, Planning and Construction
(Caldwell)
Payable from General Obligation Bonds
Priority 1 $ 94,380
Priority 5 $ 1,841,000
Total $ 1,935,380
36/P46 VINTON HARBOR AND TERMINAL DISTRICT
(577280) Barge Loading/Unloading Berth at Vinton Harbor and
Terminal District, Planning and Construction
(Calcasieu)
Payable from General Obligation Bonds
Priority 5 $ 1,980,637
MISCELLANEOUS NON-STATE
50/J01 ACADIA PARISH
(577693) Old Spanish Trail Roadway Improvements To Provide For
Freight Traffic Bypass of Dangerous Railroad Crossing,
Planning and Construction
(Acadia)
Payable from General Obligation Bonds
Priority 1 $ 684,921
(577694) Ye Olde Country Road and Muskrat Road Improvements,
Planning and Construction
(Acadia)
Payable from General Obligation Bonds
Priority 1 $ 210,000
Priority 5 $ 1,860,000
Total $ 2,070,000
50/J02 ALLEN PARISH
(577230) Road Rehabilitation, Planning and Construction
(Allen)
Payable from General Obligation Bonds
Priority 5 $ 1,550,000
(577231) Bridge Improvements, Planning and Construction
(Allen)
Payable from General Obligation Bonds
Priority 5 $ 3,050,000
Page 59 of 174

HB NO. 2 ENROLLED
50/J03 ASCENSION PARISH
(577391) Early Childhood Education Project, Planning and
Construction
(Ascension)
Payable from General Obligation Bonds
Priority 1 $ 2,700,000
(577395) LA 3127 Connector from Hwy. 70 to LA 1, Planning and
Construction
(Ascension)
Payable from General Obligation Bonds
Priority 5 $ 9,500,000
Payable from State General Fund (Direct) Non-Recurring
Revenues $ 2,500,000
Total $ 12,000,000
(578553) LA 431 at LA 931 Roundabout, Planning and Construction
(Ascension)
Payable from General Obligation Bonds
Priority 5 $ 1,000,000
Payable from the Capital Outlay Savings Fund $ 400,000
Total $ 1,400,000
(578556) LA 44 at LA 933/Parker Road Roundabout, Planning and
Construction
(Ascension)
Payable from General Obligation Bonds
Priority 5 $ 1,650,000
Payable from the Capital Outlay Savings Fund $ 500,000
Total $ 2,150,000
(578558) Upgrades and New Water Treatment Plant, Planning and
Construction
(Ascension)
Payable from General Obligation Bonds
Priority 5 $ 14,825,000
Payable from State General Fund (Direct) Non-Recurring
Revenues $ 1,150,000
Total $ 15,975,000
(578562) LA 73 at LA 30 Roundabout, Planning
and Construction
(Ascension)
Payable from General Obligation Bonds
Priority 5 $ 4,250,000
(578704) LA 73 at LA 429 (Cornerview Road), Planning
and Construction
(Ascension)
Payable from the balance of reappropriated State General
Fund (Direct) previously allocated under the authority of
Act 5 of 2024 for Ascension Parish, LA 73 at LA 30
Roundabout, Planning and Construction (Ascension) $ 3,750,000
Page 60 of 174

HB NO. 2 ENROLLED
50/J04 ASSUMPTION PARISH
(577674) Plattenville Drainage Improvements, Planning and
Construction
(Assumption)
Payable from General Obligation Bonds
Priority 1 $ 13,867
(577675) Assumption Parish Pumps and Drainage, Planning and
Construction
(Assumption)
Payable from General Obligation Bonds
Priority 1 $ 467,500
50/J05 AVOYELLES PARISH
(578017) Parishwide Roadway Improvements, Planning and
Construction
(Avoyelles)
Payable from General Obligation Bonds
Priority 1 $ 1,000,000
Priority 5 $ 1,000,000
Total $ 2,000,000
50/J06 BEAUREGARD PARISH
(578112) Camp Edgewood Road Improvements Phase 2, Planning
and Construction
(Beauregard)
Payable from General Obligation Bonds
Priority 5 $ 1,000,000
Payable from the Capital Outlay Savings Fund $ 290,000
Total $ 1,290,000
(578113) Greentown Road Improvements Phase 2,
Planning and Construction
(Beauregard)
Payable from General Obligation Bonds
Priority 2 $ 562,000
(578114) Lumus Road Rehabilitation, Planning and Construction
(Beauregard)
Payable from General Obligation Bonds
Priority 5 $ 562,500
(578115) H.B. Hickman Road Rehabilitation,
Planning and Construction
(Beauregard)
Payable from General Obligation Bonds
Priority 5 $ 765,000
(578116) Hoy Road Rehabilitation, Planning and Construction
(Beauregard)
Payable from General Obligation Bonds
Priority 5 $ 562,500
(578867) Longview Road Improvements, Beauregard Parish Police
Jury, Planning and Construction
(Beauregard)
Payable from General Obligation Bonds
Priority 1 $ 360,000
Page 61 of 174

HB NO. 2 ENROLLED
50/J07 BIENVILLE PARISH
(577716) Ridge Road Improvements, Planning and Construction
(Bienville)
Payable from General Obligation Bonds
Priority 1 $ 1,200,000
Priority 5 $ 6,250,000
Total $ 7,450,000
50/J08 BOSSIER PARISH
(578172) Improvements to LA Highway 3 (Benton Road) and I-220
Interchange, Planning and Construction
(Bossier)
Payable from General Obligation Bonds
Priority 1 $ 2,000,000
Priority 5 $ 4,700,000
Payable from the Capital Outlay Savings Fund $ 1,000,000
Total $ 7,700,000
(578174) Improvements to Highway 157, LA Highway 3227 to US
Highway 80, Planning and Construction
(Bossier)
Payable from General Obligation Bonds
Priority 1 $ 5,000,000
Priority 5 $ 5,200,000
Total $ 10,200,000
(578175) US Hwy. 71 Four Lane Extension/Colleen Drive
Improvements, Planning and Construction
(Bossier)
Payable from General Obligation Bonds
Priority 5 $ 4,600,000
Payable from the balance of State General Fund (Direct)
previously allocated under the authority of Act 5 of 2024
for the Division of Administration, Statewide Roofing
Asset Management Program and Waterproofing, Related
Repairs and Equipment Replacement Program
(Statewide) $ 2,000,000
Payable from the Capital Outlay Savings Fund $ 400,000
Total $ 7,000,000
50/J10 CALCASIEU PARISH
(577743) Calcasieu Police Jury Gravity Sewer Trunk Mains and
Pumping Station South Ward 3 and South Ward 4,
Planning and Construction
(Calcasieu)
Payable from General Obligation Bonds
Priority 1 $ 7,598,116
Priority 5 $ 4,500,000
Total $ 12,098,116
50/J11 CALDWELL PARISH
(578129) Swim Lake Road, Planning and Construction
(Caldwell)
Payable from General Obligation Bonds
Priority 1 $ 426,000
Page 62 of 174

HB NO. 2 ENROLLED
(578131) Wiles Road and Kountry Korner Road, Planning and
Construction
(Caldwell)
Payable from General Obligation Bonds
Priority 1 $ 477,500
50/J12 CAMERON PARISH
(577772) Parishwide Road Rehabilitation, Planning and Construction
(Cameron)
Payable from General Obligation Bonds
Priority 1 $ 500,000
Priority 5 $ 5,500,000
Payable from the Capital Outlay Savings Fund $ 300,000
Total $ 6,300,000
50/J13 CATAHOULA PARISH
(579012) Catahoula Parish Roadway Improvements, Planning and
Construction
(Catahoula)
Payable from General Obligation Bonds
Priority 5 $ 2,000,000
Payable from the Capital Outlay Savings Fund $ 1,000,000
Total $ 3,000,000
Pending approval of the capital outlay budget request pursuant to the provisions of R.S.
39:112.
50/J15 CONCORDIA PARISH
(577252) Roadway Reconstruction, Doty Road, Planning and
Construction
(Concordia)
Payable from State General Fund (Direct) Non-Recurring
Revenues $ 3,000,000
50/J16 DESOTO PARISH
(577006) DeSoto Parish Police Jury Five (5) Year Capital Road Plan,
Planning and Construction
(DeSoto)
Payable from General Obligation Bonds
Priority 5 $ 30,000,000
50/J17 EAST BATON ROUGE PARISH
(577934) East Baton Rouge Parish Flood Risk Reduction
Project- Expand, Repair, and Modify Drainage System
throughout East Baton Rouge Parish
(East Baton Rouge)
Payable from General Obligation Bonds
Priority 1 $ 8,391,389
Priority 5 $ 22,000,000
Total $ 30,391,389
Page 63 of 174

HB NO. 2 ENROLLED
50/J18 EAST CARROLL PARISH
(578614) East Carroll Parish Courthouse Assessment and Restoration,
Planning and Construction
(East Carroll)
Payable from General Obligation Bonds
Priority 5 $ 9,600,000
Payable from the Capital Outlay Savings Fund $ 500,000
Total $ 10,100,000
(578868) Spillway Structure Repairs for Lake Providence Lake and
Cleaning of Outfall Canal from the Lake Downstream,
Planning and Construction
(East Carroll)
Payable from General Obligation Bonds
Priority 1 $ 100,000
Priority 5 $ 300,000
Total $ 400,000
50/J21 FRANKLIN PARISH
(577641) Franklin Parish Activity Center, Planning and Construction
(Franklin)
Payable from General Obligation Bonds
Priority 1 $ 945,004
Priority 5 $ 1,800,000
Total $ 2,745,004
(577999) Riley Road Improvements, Planning and Construction
(Franklin)
Payable from General Obligation Bonds
Priority 1 $ 1,000,000
(578000) Erosion Control and Bank Stabilization at Big Creek Bridge
and Looney Canal, Planning and Construction
(Franklin)
Payable from State General Fund (Direct) Non-Recurring
Revenues $ 600,000
(578756) Franklin Medical Center Improvements, Planning and
Construction
(Franklin)
Payable from State General Fund (Direct) Non-Recurring
Revenues $ 500,000
50/J22 GRANT PARISH
(577870) Courthouse Renovations - Phase I, Planning and
Construction
(Grant)
Payable from State General Fund (Direct) Non-Recurring
Revenues $ 63,000
(577871) Landfill Road Improvements, Planning and Construction
(Grant)
Payable from General Obligation Bonds
Priority 1 $ 565,000
Page 64 of 174

HB NO. 2 ENROLLED
50/J23 IBERIA PARISH
(576914) Sewer Collection System Improvements
(Iberia)
Payable from General Obligation Bonds
Priority 1 $ 1,500,000
Priority 2 $ 1,000,000
Priority 5 $ 9,400,000
Payable from State General Fund (Direct) Non-Recurring
Revenues $ 1,500,000
Payable from the Capital Outlay Savings Fund $ 500,000
Total $ 13,900,000
(576926) Iberia Parish - Sewer Treatment Plant, Planning and
Construction
(Iberia)
Payable from General Obligation Bonds
Priority 1 $ 1,000,000
Priority 5 $ 9,000,000
Total $ 10,000,000
(576932) Parish Jail Improvements, Planning and Construction
(Iberia)
Payable from General Obligation Bonds
Priority 1 $ 840,000
(578858) Courthouse Elevators, Planning and Construction
(Iberia)
Payable from General Obligation Bonds
Priority 1 $ 171,900
50/J24 IBERVILLE PARISH
(576575) Choctaw Bayou Drainage and Ecological Improvements,
Planning and Construction
(Iberville)
Payable from General Obligation Bonds
Priority 5 $ 1,650,000
(577831) Water Line Improvements Highway 69 - Upgrade
2" Lines to 4" Lines and Add Customers,
Planning and Construction
(Iberville)
Payable from the Capital Outlay Savings Fund $ 600,000
(577905) Statewide Radio System Tower - Bayou Sorrel/Bayou Pigeon
Fire Department, Planning and Construction
(Iberville)
Payable from the Capital Outlay Savings Fund $ 500,000
50/J25 JACKSON PARISH
(578857) Lakeshore Drive Rehabilitation and Improvements,
Planning and Construction
(Jackson)
Payable from General Obligation Bonds
Priority 1 $ 1,455,903
Page 65 of 174

HB NO. 2 ENROLLED
50/J26 JEFFERSON PARISH
(576424) 11th Street Roadway Replacement and Upgrade of
Subsurface Drainage System between Queens and
Manhattan Boulevard, Planning and Construction
(Jefferson)
Payable from General Obligation Bonds
Priority 1 $ 137,656
Priority 5 $ 9,175,000
Total $ 9,312,656
(576425) 4th Street Shared-Use Path (Barataria Blvd. to Gretna City
Limits), Planning and Construction
(Jefferson)
Payable from General Obligation Bonds
Priority 1 $ 225,000
Priority 5 $ 4,146,600
Total $ 4,371,600
(576426) Airline Drive (US 61) at 17th Street Canal Drainage
Crossing and Railroad Bridge Replacement
(Jefferson)
Payable from General Obligation Bonds
Priority 1 $ 2,000,000
Priority 5 $ 14,090,000
Total $ 16,090,000
(576427) Bainbridge Canal Closure from Veterans Boulevard to
Terminal Drive, Planning and Construction
(Jefferson)
Payable from General Obligation Bonds
Priority 1 $ 516,194
Priority 2 $ 2,000,000
Priority 5 $ 11,800,000
Total $ 14,316,194
(576428) Barataria Blvd. (LA 45) Drainage Improvements (Merlin
Lane to Pritchard Road), Planning and Construction
(Jefferson)
Payable from General Obligation Bonds
Priority 5 $ 6,500,000
(576432) Bonnabel Canal Bank Stabilization (West Side) - Veterans
Blvd. to West Esplanade, Planning and Construction
(Jefferson)
Payable from General Obligation Bonds
Priority 1 $ 2,538,507
Priority 5 $ 4,700,000
Total $ 7,238,507
(576434) Bucktown Harbor Boardwalk and Kayak Launch, Planning
and Construction
(Jefferson)
Payable from General Obligation Bonds
Priority 5 $ 1,575,000
(576436) Bucktown Harbor Multi-Purpose Pavillion, Planning and
Construction
(Jefferson)
Payable from General Obligation Bonds
Priority 1 $ 3,500,000
Page 66 of 174

HB NO. 2 ENROLLED
(576443) East Bank Backup Generators East: Sewer Lift Station
Backup Generators (Clearview at W. Napoleon, Cleary at
W. Napoleon, Houma at W. Napoleon and Galleria Sewer
Station), Planning and Construction
(Jefferson)
Payable from General Obligation Bonds
Priority 1 $ 1,750,000
(576444) East Bank Backup Generators West: Sewer Lift Station
Backup Generators (Camp Plauche, Transcontinental at
West Metairie, and Transcontinental at Vineland)
(Jefferson)
Payable from General Obligation Bonds
Priority 5 $ 2,000,000
(576452) Gretna Government Complex Parking Lot, Planning and
Construction
(Jefferson)
Payable from General Obligation Bonds
Priority 1 $ 2,429,137
Priority 5 $ 7,671,600
Total $ 10,100,737
(576453) Hickory Avenue (LA 3154) Rehabilitation (River Road to
10th Street), Planning and Construction
(Jefferson)
Payable from General Obligation Bonds
Priority 1 $ 600,000
Priority 5 $ 6,270,000
Total $ 6,870,000
(576454) Hope Haven Natatorium, Planning and Construction
(Jefferson)
Payable from General Obligation Bonds
Priority 5 $ 15,000,000
(576455) Huey P. Long Bridge Lighting
(Jefferson)
Payable from General Obligation Bonds
Priority 5 $ 4,075,000
(576456) Jefferson Park Sport Field Renovation, Planning and
Construction
(Jefferson)
Payable from General Obligation Bonds
Priority 1 $ 2,000,000
Priority 5 $ 4,840,000
Total $ 6,840,000
(576472) Metairie Road Drainage Improvements (Causeway Blvd.
to Focis St.), Planning and Construction
(Jefferson)
Payable from General Obligation Bonds
Priority 1 $ 7,100,000
Priority 5 $ 6,460,000
Total $ 13,560,000
Page 67 of 174

HB NO. 2 ENROLLED
(576474) New Access Road in the Churchill Technology and
Business Park for Delgado's Advanced Manufacturing
and River City Campus, Planning and Construction
(Jefferson)
Payable from General Obligation Bonds
Priority 1 $ 1,550,000
(576478) Preservation and Restoration of Historic Structures for
Hope Haven/Madonna Manor Campus, Planning and
Construction
(Jefferson)
Payable from General Obligation Bonds
Priority 1 $ 5,628,748
Priority 5 $ 2,000,000
Payable from the Capital Outlay Savings Fund $ 500,000
Total $ 8,128,748
(576484) Sewer Lift Station Backup Generators - North, Planning and
Construction
(Jefferson)
Payable from General Obligation Bonds
Priority 1 $ 26,921
(576486) Shrewsbury Road at Jefferson Highway Culvert
Replacement, Planning and Construction
(Jefferson)
Payable from General Obligation Bonds
Priority 5 $ 2,000,000
(576493) West Esplanade Pump Station, Planning and Construction
(Jefferson)
Payable from General Obligation Bonds
Priority 5 $ 3,700,000
(576495) Woodlake Estates Drainage Improvements, Planning and
Construction
(Jefferson)
Payable from General Obligation Bonds
Priority 1 $ 356,750
Priority 5 $ 2,000,000
Total $ 2,356,750
(576496) Woodland West Drainage Improvements, Planning and
Construction
(Jefferson)
Payable from General Obligation Bonds
Priority 1 $ 344,655
Priority 5 $ 1,000,000
Total $ 1,344,655
(576498) Woodmere Playground Improvements, Planning and
Construction
(Jefferson)
Payable from General Obligation Bonds
Priority 1 $ 2,150,962
Priority 5 $ 1,000,000
Total $ 3,150,962
Page 68 of 174

HB NO. 2 ENROLLED
(576500) Woodmere Youth Center, Planning and Construction
(Jefferson)
Payable from General Obligation Bonds
Priority 1 $ 50,500
(576501) Asian American Cultural and Service Center, Planning and
Construction
(Jefferson)
Payable from General Obligation Bonds
Priority 5 $ 3,550,000
(578569) Estelle Recreation Complex, Planning
and Construction
(Jefferson)
Payable from the balance of State General Fund (Direct)
previously allocated under the authority of Act 465 of
2023 for Jefferson Parish, Vietnamese American Cultural
and Service Center, Planning and Construction
(Jefferson) $ 400,000
Payable from the balance of State General Fund (Direct)
previously allocated under the authority of Act 5 of 2024
for the Division of Administration, Statewide Roofing
Asset Management Program and Waterproofing, Related
Repairs and Equipment Replacement Program
(Statewide) $ 600,000
Total $ 1,000,000
(578582) Fat City Leisure Park and Annex
(Jefferson)
Payable from State General Fund (Direct) Non-Recurring
Revenues $ 3,000,000
Payable from the Capital Outlay Savings Fund $ 2,375,000
Total $ 5,375,000
(578800) PARD Playground Field Improvements,
Planning and Construction
(Jefferson)
Payable from the balance of State General Fund (Direct)
previously allocated under the authority of Act 465 of
2023 for Jefferson Parish, Vietnamese American Cultural
and Service Center, Planning and Construction
(Jefferson) $ 600,000
(578854) Brown Avenue Canal Improvements between the Westbank
Expressway and Harold Street, Planning and Construction
(Jefferson)
Payable from General Obligation Bonds
Priority 1 $ 1,802,898
50/J27 JEFFERSON DAVIS PARISH
(578035) Parish Wide Road and Bridge Improvement Project,
Planning and Construction
Payable from General Obligation Bonds
Priority 2 $ 380,000
Priority 5 $ 3,445,000
Total $ 3,825,000
Page 69 of 174

HB NO. 2 ENROLLED
(578037) Wastewater Collection, Transfer and Treatment Systems,
Planning and Construction
(Jefferson Davis)
Payable from General Obligation Bonds
Priority 5 $ 2,000,000
50/J28 LAFAYETTE PARISH
(576522) E Broussard Roundabout, Planning and Construction
(Lafayette)
Payable from General Obligation Bonds
Priority 5 $ 3,000,000
(576523) Cue Road Extension, Planning and Construction
(Lafayette)
Payable from General Obligation Bonds
Priority 5 $ 4,000,000
(576526) Parish Road Overlay, Planning and Construction
(Lafayette)
Payable from General Obligation Bonds
Priority 5 $ 7,000,000
(576527) Rue Du Belier Widening, Planning and Construction
(Lafayette)
Payable from General Obligation Bonds
Priority 1 $ 2,000,000
Priority 5 $ 5,000,000
Total $ 7,000,000
(576528) Parish Government Complex, Jail, New Design, Planning
and Construction
(Lafayette)
Payable from General Obligation Bonds
Priority 5 $ 35,000,000
(576533) State Interchange Improvements, Planning and Construction
(Lafayette)
Payable from General Obligation Bonds
Priority 5 $ 11,325,000
(576534) Bayou Vermilion Flood Control, Planning and Construction
(Lafayette)
Payable from General Obligation Bonds
Priority 1 $ 9,492,500
Priority 5 $ 22,000,000
Total $ 31,492,500
(576535) Parish Government Complex, Parish Courthouse, Planning
and Construction
(Lafayette)
Payable from General Obligation Bonds
Priority 1 $ 1,149,500
(576538) Ingress and Egress Interchange Improvements, Planning
and Construction
(Lafayette)
Payable from General Obligation Bonds
Priority 5 $ 10,000,000
Page 70 of 174

HB NO. 2 ENROLLED
(576539) Heymann Park Improvements Project, Planning and
Construction
(Lafayette)
Payable from General Obligation Bonds
Priority 1 $ 1,925,000
Priority 5 $ 5,700,000
Payable from the Capital Outlay Savings Fund $ 1,000,000
Total $ 8,625,000
(576540) University Avenue Corridor Improvements, Planning,
Construction and Acquisition
(Lafayette)
Payable from General Obligation Bonds
Priority 1 $ 13,000,000
(578855) Isaac Verot Coulee - Main Channel Hardening, Planning
and Construction
(Lafayette)
Payable from General Obligation Bonds
Priority 5 $ 11,000,000
50/J29 LAFOURCHE PARISH
(577922) Hero's Park Recreation Center and Head Start in
Thibodaux, Planning and Construction
(Lafourche)
Payable from General Obligation Bonds
Priority 1 $ 500,000
Priority 5 $ 3,700,000
Payable from the Capital Outlay Savings Fund $ 300,000
Total $ 4,500,000
(578159) Butch Hill Pump Station Replacement, Planning and
Construction
(Lafourche)
Payable from General Obligation Bonds
Priority 1 $ 646,000
Priority 5 $ 17,300,000
Total $ 17,946,000
(578856) South Lafourche Airport Corridor Project
(Lafourche)
Payable from General Obligation Bonds
Priority 1 $ 5,281,009
50/J31 LINCOLN PARISH
(578208) Bridge Replacements on Mitchell and Shady Grove Roads,
Planning and Construction
(Lincoln)
Payable from General Obligation Bonds
Priority 1 $ 380,000
50/J32 LIVINGSTON PARISH
(577438) Juban Road North Extension between US 190 (Florida
Blvd.) and LA 1026 (Lockhart Road), Planning and
Construction
(Livingston)
Payable from General Obligation Bonds
Priority 5 $ 6,005,000
Page 71 of 174

HB NO. 2 ENROLLED
(577883) Amite River Boat Launch, Planning and Construction
(Livingston)
Payable from General Obligation Bonds
Priority 5 $ 6,700,000
Payable from the Capital Outlay Savings Fund $ 700,000
Total $ 7,400,000
(578160) Cook Road Extension Economic Development Corridor
(Pete's Highway Frontage Road)
(Livingston)
Payable from General Obligation Bonds
Priority 1 $ 1,073,907
(578979) Livingston Parish Emergency Response and
Evacuation Center, Planning and Construction
(Livingston)
Payable from General Obligation Bonds
Priority 1 $ 2,889,899
Priority 2 $ 2,000,000
Priority 5 $ 41,920,000
Total $ 46,809,899
50/J34 MOREHOUSE PARISH
(577801) Public Works Center, Planning and Construction
(Morehouse)
Payable from General Obligation Bonds
Priority 1 $ 128,299
50/J35 NATCHITOCHES PARISH
(577436) Courthouse Security Improvements, Planning and
Construction
(Natchitoches)
Payable from General Obligation Bonds
Priority 1 $ 391,522
(578210) Resurfacing of Goldonna Road, Planning and Construction
(Natchitoches)
Payable from General Obligation Bonds
Priority 1 $ 3,560,000
50/J37 OUACHITA PARISH
(577938) Force Main Replacement for Lift Station N, Planning,
Right-of-Way, and Construction
(Ouachita)
Payable from General Obligation Bonds
Priority 1 $ 1,000,000
(577939) Steep Bayou/Tupawek Bayou Sewer, Planning,
Construction, and Right-of-Way Acquisition
(Ouachita)
Payable from General Obligation Bonds
Priority 1 $ 354,137
Priority 5 $ 3,580,000
Total $ 3,934,137
Page 72 of 174

HB NO. 2 ENROLLED
(577944) Bayou Mouchoir Drainage Improvements
(Ouachita)
Payable from General Obligation Bonds
Priority 1 $ 477,500
(577945) Cheniere Lake Area 1 Improvements, Planning and
Construction
(Ouachita)
Payable from General Obligation Bonds
Priority 1 $ 846,430
(578143) Millhaven Estates Drainage and Roadway
Improvements, Planning, Right-of-Way,
and Construction
(Ouachita)
Payable from General Obligation Bonds
Priority 2 $ 845,000
Priority 5 $ 1,265,000
Total $ 2,110,000
50/J38 PLAQUEMINES PARISH
(577452) Water Tower Repairs, Planning and Construction
(Plaquemines)
Payable from General Obligation Bonds
Priority 1 $ 250,000
Priority 5 $ 6,000,000
Payable from the Capital Outlay Savings Fund $ 450,000
Total $ 6,700,000
(577453) Renovation of Building on Government Complex
to house Clerk of Court, Assessor, and Judges Offices,
Planning and Construction
(Plaquemines)
Payable from General Obligation Bonds
Priority 5 $ 7,000,000
Payable from the Capital Outlay Savings Fund $ 1,000,000
Total $ 8,000,000
(577454) Belle Chasse Water Treatment Facility Increase Capacity
Project, Planning and Construction
(Plaquemines)
Payable from General Obligation Bonds
Priority 1 $ 250,000
Priority 5 $ 21,950,000
Total $ 22,200,000
(577457) Empire Bridge Lighting, Planning and Construction
(Plaquemines)
Payable from General Obligation Bonds
Priority 5 $ 1,680,000
(577586) Plaquemines Parish Training Center, Planning and
Construction
(Plaquemines)
Payable from General Obligation Bonds
Priority 5 $ 23,000,000
Page 73 of 174

HB NO. 2 ENROLLED
(577634) Hwy. 11 Sewer Collection System, Planning and
Construction
(Plaquemines)
Payable from General Obligation Bonds
Priority 5 $ 3,600,000
(577923) Redesign and Rebuilding of the Nov-13 Flood Gate
Project, Planning and Construction
(Plaquemines)
Payable from General Obligation Bonds
Priority 5 $ 1,800,000
(578792) Plaquemines Parish Public Safety Answering Point (PSAP),
Construction and Equipment
(Plaquemines)
Payable from General Obligation Bonds
Priority 5 $ 2,000,000
Payable from the Capital Outlay Savings Fund $ 2,000,000
Total $ 4,000,000
50/J39 POINTE COUPEE PARISH
(577605) Courthouse Restoration - Phase 2, Planning and
Construction
(Pointe Coupee)
Payable from General Obligation Bonds
Priority 1 $ 82,689
(577970) Portage Canal Drainage Project, Planning and Construction
(Pointe Coupee)
Payable from General Obligation Bonds
Priority 5 $ 3,000,000
Payable from the Capital Outlay Savings Fund $ 250,000
Total $ 3,250,000
(577971) Roy O Martin/Crestwood Subdivision, Planning and
Construction
(Pointe Coupee)
Payable from General Obligation Bonds
Priority 5 $ 900,000
(577974) Watershed Drainage Improvements Bayou Grosse Tete,
Bayou Cholpe, Bayou Choctaw, False River Outfall
Channel, and Johnson Bayou, Planning and Construction
(Pointe Coupee)
Payable from General Obligation Bonds
Priority 1 $ 1,843,620
(578020) Electronic Water and Gas Meter System,
Planning and Construction
(Pointe Coupee)
Payable from General Obligation Bonds
Priority 2 $ 700,000
Priority 5 $ 6,300,000
Total $ 7,000,000
Page 74 of 174

HB NO. 2 ENROLLED
(578496) False River Ecosystem Restoration Project, Including
Bulkhead Replacement, Planning and Construction
(Pointe Coupee)
Payable from General Obligation Bonds
Priority 1 $ 1,000
Priority 5 $ 5,250,000
Total $ 5,251,000
50/J40 RAPIDES PARISH
(578042) Hickory Hill Road Overlay, Planning and
Construction
(Rapides)
Payable from General Obligation Bonds
Priority 5 $ 805,000
(578043) Gunter Road/Barron Chapel Road Street Improvements,
Planning and Construction
(Rapides)
Payable from General Obligation Bonds
Priority 1 $ 441,639
(578044) Philadelphia Road Street Improvements, Planning and
Construction
(Rapides)
Payable from General Obligation Bonds
Priority 1 $ 500,000
(578379) Tioga Road Overlay, Planning and Construction
(Rapides)
Payable from General Obligation Bonds
Priority 5 $ 630,000
(578382) New Fire Station at LSU Alexandria Serving Rapides
Parish - Fire District 18, Planning and Construction
(Rapides)
Payable from General Obligation Bonds
Priority 1 $ 1,300,000
Priority 5 $ 1,500,000
Total $ 2,800,000
(578793) Surfacing the Shoulder of Trinity Church Road
to Accommodate Staging of School Traffic,
Planning and Construction
(Rapides)
Payable from the Capital Outlay Savings Fund $ 355,000
50/J41 RED RIVER PARISH
(578312) E911, Sheriff Station, and Administrative Offices,
Planning and Construction
(Red River)
Payable from General Obligation Bonds
Priority 2 $ 500,000
Payable from the Capital Outlay Savings Fund $ 500,000
Total $ 1,000,000
Page 75 of 174

HB NO. 2 ENROLLED
50/J42 RICHLAND PARISH
(577901) Richland Parish Road Improvements for Christian Drive,
Planning and Construction
(Richland)
Payable from General Obligation Bonds
Priority 2 $ 1,200,000
Priority 5 $ 1,200,000
Total $ 2,400,000
50/J44 ST. BERNARD PARISH
(577372) St. Bernard Parish Fire Station #10, Planning and
Construction
(St. Bernard)
Payable from the Capital Outlay Savings Fund $ 4,200,000
(577373) St. Bernard Parish Jail Renovations, Planning and
Construction
(St. Bernard)
Payable from General Obligation Bonds
Priority 1 $ 2,535,411
Priority 5 $ 3,200,000
Total $ 5,735,411
(577548) St. Bernard 40 Arpent Trail Bridge over LA 47, Planning
and Construction
(St. Bernard)
Payable from General Obligation Bonds
Priority 5 $ 2,400,000
(577638) St. Bernard Parish Daniel Drive Sewer Main Repairs
Project, Planning and Construction
(St. Bernard)
Payable from General Obligation Bonds
Priority 5 $ 2,700,000
(577639) St. Bernard Parish St. Claude Avenue Culvert
Improvements Project, Planning and Construction
(St. Bernard)
Payable from General Obligation Bonds
Priority 5 $ 3,500,000
(577685) St. Bernard Parish Canal Project (Hebert/Creely/Bluebird),
Planning and Construction
(St. Bernard)
Payable from General Obligation Bonds
Priority 5 $ 11,000,000
50/J45 ST. CHARLES PARISH
(577278) Primrose Canal Sheet Pile, Planning and Construction
(St. Charles)
Payable from General Obligation Bonds
Priority 5 $ 3,250,000
Page 76 of 174

HB NO. 2 ENROLLED
(577293) Fifth Street Drainage Improvements, Planning and
Construction
(St. Charles)
Payable from General Obligation Bonds
Priority 5 $ 4,000,000
Payable from State General Fund (Direct) Non-Recurring
Revenues $ 450,000
Payable from the Capital Outlay Savings Fund $ 500,000
Total $ 4,950,000
(577296) West Bank Water Treatment Plant, E Plant Construction,
Planning and Construction
(St. Charles)
Payable from General Obligation Bonds
Priority 5 $ 33,000,000
(577351) Des Allemands Bulkhead - Phase 1, Planning and
Construction
(St. Charles)
Payable from General Obligation Bonds
Priority 2 $ 1,000,000
Priority 5 $ 2,622,500
Payable from the Capital Outlay Savings Fund $ 500,000
Total $ 4,122,500
(577353) Paul Fredrick Street and Kinler Street Demolition and
Reconstruction
(St. Charles)
Payable from General Obligation Bonds
Priority 5 $ 2,825,000
50/J46 ST. HELENA PARISH
(577914) Audubon Library, Planning and Construction
(St. Helena)
Payable from General Obligation Bonds
Priority 1 $ 1,863,600
50/J47 ST. JAMES PARISH
(577377) Parishwide Road Rehabilitation, Planning and Construction
(St. James)
Payable from General Obligation Bonds
Priority 1 $ 745,362
Payable from State General Fund (Direct) Non-Recurring
Revenues $ 1,000,000
Total $ 1,745,362
(577378) West Shore Risk Reduction Connector Levee
(St. James)
Payable from General Obligation Bonds
Priority 1 $ 3,514,698
Priority 5 $ 16,650,000
Total $ 20,164,698
Page 77 of 174

HB NO. 2 ENROLLED
(577379) LA 3127 Widening (LA 20 to LA 3213), Planning and
Construction
(St. James)
Payable from General Obligation Bonds
Priority 1 $ 3,563,747
Priority 5 $ 21,400,000
Total $ 24,963,747
(577782) South Nobile Drainage Improvements,
Planning and Construction
(St. James)
Payable from General Obligation Bonds
Priority 5 $ 905,000
Payable from State General Fund (Direct) Non-Recurring
Revenues $ 85,000
Total $ 990,000
(577812) Bayou Chevreuil Boat Launch, Planning
and Construction
(St. James)
Payable from General Obligation Bonds
Priority 5 $ 400,000
Payable from State General Fund (Direct) Non-Recurring
Revenues $ 500,000
Total $ 900,000
(577813) Above Ground Water Storage Tank,
Planning and Construction
(St. James)
Payable from General Obligation Bonds
Priority 5 $ 1,800,000
50/J48 ST. JOHN THE BAPTIST PARISH
(576657) Parallel Woodland Canal Excavation and Airline Hwy.
Culvert Improvement, Planning and Construction
(St. John the Baptist)
Payable from General Obligation Bonds
Priority 2 $ 523,000
Priority 5 $ 5,235,000
Total $ 5,758,000
(577485) Big Belle Terre Lift Station Rehabilitation Project,
Planning and Construction
(St. John the Baptist)
Payable from General Obligation Bonds
Priority 2 $ 170,000
Priority 5 $ 1,530,000
Total $ 1,700,000
50/J49 ST. LANDRY PARISH
(577925) District Attorney Building Chiller Replacement,
Planning and Construction
(St. Landry)
Payable from General Obligation Bonds
Priority 2 $ 500,000
Payable from the Capital Outlay Savings Fund $ 500,000
Total $ 1,000,000
Page 78 of 174

HB NO. 2 ENROLLED
(578299) Parish Wide Road Program, Planning and Construction
(St. Landry)
Payable from General Obligation Bonds
Priority 1 $ 2,500,000
Payable from State General Fund (Direct) Non-Recurring
Revenues $ 2,400,000
Total $ 4,900,000
(578345) Opelousas General Hospital Water Wells - Main
and South Campuses, Planning and Construction
(St. Landry)
Payable from General Obligation Bonds
Priority 2 $ 435,000
Priority 5 $ 3,915,000
Total $ 4,350,000
(578844) Courthouse Renovations, Planning and Construction
(St. Landry)
Payable from General Obligation Bonds
Priority 1 $ 21,440
50/J50 ST. MARTIN PARISH
(577441) St. Martin Parish- Theobold Road Improvements,
Planning and Construction
(St. Martin)
Payable from the balance of State General Fund (Direct)
Revenues previously allocated under the authority of Act
28 of 2007 for I-10 Frontage Road, LA 328 to LA 347,
Planning and Construction
(St. Martin) $ 235,000
(577661) Milhomme Bridge Improvements, Planning
and Construction
(St. Martin)
Payable from General Obligation Bonds
Priority 5 $ 1,000,000
(577684) St. Martin- Parc Hardy Improvements, Planning and
Construction
(St. Martin)
Payable from the balance of State General Fund (Direct)
Non-Recurring Revenues previously allocated under the
authority of Act 20 of 2009 for I-10 Frontage Road, LA
328 to LA 347, Planning and Construction
(St. Martin) $ 450,000
(578818) Spanish Trail Industrial Park Access Road, Planning and
Construction
(St. Martin)
Payable from General Obligation Bonds
Priority 1 $ 1,343,268
(578829) I-10 Frontage Road, LA 328 to LA 347, Planning and
Construction
(St. Martin)
Payable from General Obligation Bonds
Priority 5 $ 1,000,000
Page 79 of 174

HB NO. 2 ENROLLED
(578843) Joe Daigre Canal Drainage Improvements, Planning and
Construction
(St. Martin)
Payable from General Obligation Bonds
Priority 1 $ 672,999
Priority 5 $ 550,000
Total $ 1,222,999
50/J51 ST. MARY PARISH
(577470) New Central Fire Station for St. Mary Parish
Fire Protection District No. 11 in the Four
Corners Community, Planning and Construction
(St. Mary)
Payable from General Obligation Bonds
Priority 5 $ 150,000
Payable from State General Fund (Direct) $ 150,000
Total $ 300,000
(577479) Emergency Power Improvements at St. Mary Parish
Courthouse, Planning and Construction
(St. Mary)
Payable from General Obligation Bonds
Priority 1 $ 165,409
(578819) Reconstruction of Martin Luther King Roadway in
Charenton for St. Mary Parish Government, within
Existing Right-of-Way, Planning and Construction
(St. Mary)
Payable from General Obligation Bonds
Priority 1 $ 47,245
50/J52 ST. TAMMANY PARISH
(578535) Hwy 1088/I-12 AML Corridor Initiative, Planning and
Construction
(St. Tammany)
Payable from General Obligation Bonds
Priority 1 $ 1,000,000
Priority 2 $ 2,000,000
Priority 5 $ 11,625,000
Total $ 14,625,000
(578536) Castine Wastewater Treatment Plant Expansion - AML
Phase 2, Planning and Construction
(St. Tammany)
Payable from the Capital Outlay Savings Fund $ 500,000
(578538) Safe Haven Campus for Behavioral and Mental Health,
Planning, Construction and Renovation for Triage
(St. Tammany)
Payable from General Obligation Bonds
Priority 1 $ 3,027,703
Priority 5 $ 8,350,000
Total $ 11,377,703
(578539) University Square Learning Center Facilities, Planning and
Construction
(St. Tammany)
Payable from General Obligation Bonds
Priority 5 $ 9,378,000
Page 80 of 174

HB NO. 2 ENROLLED
(578540) South Slidell Levee Protection Rehabilitation: (USACE
533d Report or Planning, Land Acquisition, and
Construction of Levees West and East of Interstate 10)
(St. Tammany)
Payable from General Obligation Bonds
Priority 5 $ 9,108,000
(579023) Ben Thomas - Stone Road to Powell Drive, Design,
Planning, and Construction
(St. Tammany)
Payable from General Obligation Bonds
Priority 1 $ 1,500,000
Priority 5 $ 3,615,000
Total $ 5,115,000
(578542) Harrison Avenue Widening, Planning and Construction
(St. Tammany)
Payable from General Obligation Bonds
Priority 5 $ 13,300,000
(578543) Emerald Forrest Boulevard to LA 59, Design, Planning and
Construction
(St. Tammany)
Payable from General Obligation Bonds
Priority 5 $ 13,000,000
(578544) Sharp Road Improvements and Sidewalk, Planning and
Construction
(St. Tammany)
Payable from General Obligation Bonds
Priority 5 $ 6,125,000
(578820) Highway 11 - Opportunity Zone, Sewer & Water
Improvements, Planning and Construction
(St. Tammany)
Payable from General Obligation Bonds
Priority 5 $ 28,000,000
(578821) Fabourg Coquille Water Quality Improvements, Planning
and Construction
(St. Tammany)
Payable from General Obligation Bonds
Priority 5 $ 6,050,000
(578822) LA 1077 Widening, Design, Right of Way, Planning and
Construction
(St. Tammany)
Payable from General Obligation Bonds
Priority 1 $ 20,000
Priority 5 $ 20,000,000
Total $ 20,020,000
(578823) Hwy 11 Regional Water Consolidation Design, Planning
and Construction
(St. Tammany)
Payable from General Obligation Bonds
Priority 5 $ 20,000,000
Page 81 of 174

HB NO. 2 ENROLLED
(578957) East St. Tammany Regional Sewer Consolidation Design,
Planning and Construction
(St. Tammany)
Payable from General Obligation Bonds
Priority 5 $ 30,000,000
(578966) Safe Haven Behavioral Health Campus Roads, Design,
Planning and Construction
(St. Tammany)
Payable from General Obligation Bonds
Priority 5 $ 2,250,000
50/J53 TANGIPAHOA PARISH
(577140) South Airport Road, North Hoover Road Improvements,
Planning and Construction
(Tangipahoa)
Payable from General Obligation Bonds
Priority 1 $ 2,186,727
(577141) North Hoover Road Improvements Phase 2, Planning and
Construction
(Tangipahoa)
Payable from General Obligation Bonds
Priority 1 $ 2,720,500
Priority 5 $ 6,000,000
Total $ 8,720,500
(577142) Region 9 Emergency Distribution Center & Public Works,
Planning and Construction
(Tangipahoa)
Payable from General Obligation Bonds
Priority 5 $ 4,000,000
(578990) Airport Road Roundabouts, Planning and
Construction
(Tangipahoa)
Payable from General Obligation Bonds
Priority 5 $ 5,000,000
50/J54 TENSAS PARISH
(576694) Tensas Parish/Port Priority Site Plan, Planning and
Construction
(Tensas)
Payable from General Obligation Bonds
Priority 1 $ 170,550
(576697) Recreation Facility, Planning and Construction
(Tensas)
Payable from General Obligation Bonds
Priority 1 $ 193,929
Priority 5 $ 7,370,000
Payable from the Capital Outlay Savings Fund $ 1,000,000
Total $ 8,563,929
Page 82 of 174

HB NO. 2 ENROLLED
50/J55 TERREBONNE PARISH
(577841) Westside/Alma Street Drainage, Planning and Construction
(Terrebonne)
Payable from General Obligation Bonds
Priority 1 $ 101,868
(577842) Terrebonne Sports Complex, Planning and Construction
(Terrebonne)
Payable from General Obligation Bonds
Priority 1 $ 1,055,239
(577917) Replacement of D-18 Pump Station Falgout Canal, Theriot,
La., Planning and Construction
(Terrebonne)
Payable from General Obligation Bonds
Priority 5 $ 2,125,000
(577921) Replacement of Brady Road Bridge, Planning and
Construction
(Terrebonne)
Payable from General Obligation Bonds
Priority 1 $ 5,266,000
Priority 5 $ 580,000
Payable from the Capital Outlay Savings Fund $ 2,000,000
Total $ 7,846,000
(577990) Bayou LaCarpe Watershed Project, Location C, Design and
Construction
(Terrebonne)
Payable from General Obligation Bonds
Priority 1 $ 314,308
Priority 5 $ 9,000,000
Total $ 9,314,308
(577993) Valhi Extension (Savanne to LA 311), Planning and
Construction
(Terrebonne)
Payable from General Obligation Bonds
Priority 5 $ 32,000,000
(577995) Company Canal Miter Gate in Bourg, Planning and
Construction
(Terrebonne)
Payable from General Obligation Bonds
Priority 5 $ 9,000,000
(577996) Bayou Terrebonne Miter Gate, Twin Span Location,
Planning and Construction
(Terrebonne)
Payable from General Obligation Bonds
Priority 5 $ 9,000,000
(578239) Planning, Design, Land Purchase, and Construction of
Neuro Medical Facility, Planning and Construction
(Terrebonne)
Payable from General Obligation Bonds
Priority 5 $ 12,500,000
Page 83 of 174

HB NO. 2 ENROLLED
(578315) South Louisiana Wetland Discovery Center - Phase 2 -
Bayou Country Institute, Planning and Construction
(Terrebonne)
Payable from General Obligation Bonds
Priority 1 $ 387,931
50/J56 UNION PARISH
(578691) Courthouse Renovations, Planning and Construction
(Union)
Payable from State General Fund (Direct) $ 200,000
Payable from the Capital Outlay Savings Fund $ 200,000
Total $ 400,000
50/J57 VERMILION PARISH
(577352) Parish Wide Road Improvements, Planning and
Construction
(Vermilion)
Payable from General Obligation Bonds
Priority 5 $ 4,600,000
50/J58 VERNON PARISH
(578065) Vernon Parish Historic Courthouse Renovations,
Planning and Construction
(Vernon)
Payable from the Capital Outlay Savings Fund $ 150,000
(578066) Bailey Road Improvements, Planning and Construction
(Vernon)
Payable from General Obligation Bonds
Priority 1 $ 1,500,000
Priority 2 $ 2,000,000
Priority 5 $ 1,780,000
Total $ 5,280,000
(578067) Section Line Road Improvements,
Planning and Construction
(Vernon)
Payable from General Obligation Bonds
Priority 5 $ 900,000
(578825) Vernon/Fort Johnson formerly Fort Polk Thoroughfare
Electrical Power Extension, and Utilities Including
Generators
(Vernon)
Payable from General Obligation Bonds
Priority 1 $ 298,557
50/J59 WASHINGTON PARISH
(578234) Pearl River Navigational Canal, Planning, Construction,
and Acquisition
(Washington)
Payable from General Obligation Bonds
Priority 1 $ 500,000
Page 84 of 174

HB NO. 2 ENROLLED
50/J64 WINN PARISH
(578337) Roadway Reconstruction, Eugene Garrett Road, Planning
and Construction
(Winn)
Payable from General Obligation Bonds
Priority 1 $ 367,675
(578347) Roadway Reconstruction, Frank White Road, Planning and
Construction
(Winn)
Payable from General Obligation Bonds
Priority 1 $ 15,092
50/M01 ABBEVILLE
(578275) Electrical Distribution Improvements,
Planning and Construction
(Vermilion)
Payable from the Capital Outlay Savings Fund $ 250,000
50/M02 ABITA SPRINGS
(578219) Water System Improvements,
Planning and Construction
(St. Tammany)
Payable from General Obligation Bonds
Priority 5 $ 2,000,000
(578220) Wastewater Treatment System Improvements,
Planning and Construction
(St. Tammany)
Payable from General Obligation Bonds
Priority 5 $ 2,700,000
Payable from the Capital Outlay Savings Fund $ 300,000
Total $ 3,000,000
50/M05 ALEXANDRIA
(577768) Sugarhouse Road/Eddie Williams Boulevard to LA
Highway 1, Phase I and II, Planning and Construction
($5,000,000 Local Match)
(Rapides)
Payable from General Obligation Bonds
Priority 5 $ 4,620,000
50/M06 AMITE
(578074) Regional Wastewater Treatment and Transmission Facilities,
Planning and Construction
(Tangipahoa)
Payable from General Obligation Bonds
Priority 1 $ 20,700,000
Priority 5 $ 12,050,000
Total $ 32,750,000
Page 85 of 174

HB NO. 2 ENROLLED
(578826) Amite Governmental Complex, Planning and Construction
(Tangipahoa)
Payable from General Obligation Bonds
Priority 1 $ 195,799
Priority 5 $ 2,600,000
Total $ 2,795,799
50/M07 ANACOCO
(578196) Anacoco Street Rehabilitation and Water Line
Replacement - Port Arthur Ave., Planning and Construction
(Vernon)
Payable from General Obligation Bonds
Priority 2 $ 540,000
50/M09 ARCADIA
(578739) Water Facilities Improvements, Planning
and Construction
(Bienville)
Payable from General Obligation Bonds
Priority 5 $ 2,025,000
50/M14 BAKER
(578445) Drainage Improvements and Upgrades, Planning and Construction
(East Baton Rouge)
Payable from General Obligation Bonds
Priority 5 $ 2,600,000
Payable from the Capital Outlay Savings Fund $ 500,000
Total $ 3,100,000
(578446) Sidewalk Construction for Underdeveloped Streets and
Culverts, Planning and Construction
(East Baton Rouge)
Payable from General Obligation Bonds
Priority 5 $ 1,875,000
50/M15 BALDWIN
(577532) Potable Water System Improvements, Planning and
Construction
(St. Mary)
Payable from General Obligation Bonds
Priority 1 $ 53,796
Priority 5 $ 700,000
Total $ 753,796
(577533) Wastewater System Repair and Improvements, Planning
and Construction
(St. Mary)
Payable from General Obligation Bonds
Priority 5 $ 1,000,000
50/M17 BASILE
(578181) Gas System and Drainage System Improvements,
Planning and Construction
(Evangeline)
Payable from General Obligation Bonds
Priority 5 $ 878,000
Page 86 of 174

HB NO. 2 ENROLLED
50/M19 BASTROP
(578522) Sewer Treatment Facility and Improvements,
Planning and Construction
(Morehouse)
Payable from General Obligation Bonds
Priority 5 $ 675,000
Payable from the Capital Outlay Savings Fund $ 75,000
Total $ 750,000
50/M20 BATON ROUGE
(577926) Raising Cane's River Center, Planning,
Design and Renovation
(East Baton Rouge)
Payable from General Obligation Bonds
Priority 5 $ 18,000,000
Payable from the Capital Outlay Savings Fund $ 750,000
Total $ 18,750,000
(577928) Chaneyville Fire District No. 7 Reames Road Fire Station,
Planning and Construction
(East Baton Rouge)
Payable from General Obligation Bonds
Priority 1 $ 300,000
(577929) Hooper Road Widening and Sewer Improvements
(Blackwater Bayou to Sullivan Road) Planning,
Engineering, Utilities and Construction
(East Baton Rouge)
Payable from General Obligation Bonds
Priority 1 $ 1,500,000
Priority 5 $ 8,000,000
Total $ 9,500,000
(577930) Old Hammond Hwy. (LA 426) Roadway Improvements
from Blvd. De Province to Millerville Road, Planning and
Construction
(East Baton Rouge)
Payable from General Obligation Bonds
Priority 1 $ 1,450,000
Priority 5 $ 8,250,000
Total $ 9,700,000
50/M22 BENTON
(578022) Wastewater Collection Improvements (Courthouse
Subbasin), Planning and Construction
(Bossier)
Payable from General Obligation Bonds
Priority 1 $ 1,700,000
Priority 5 $ 1,700,000
Total $ 3,400,000
Page 87 of 174

HB NO. 2 ENROLLED
50/M26 BLANCHARD
(576897) Water Distribution System Improvements
(State Line Rd. Area), Planning and Construction
(Caddo)
Payable from General Obligation Bonds
Priority 2 $ 900,000
Priority 5 $ 1,000,000
Total $ 1,900,000
(578827) Wastewater Facilities Improvements, Planning and
Construction
(Caddo)
Payable from General Obligation Bonds
Priority 5 $ 2,000,000
50/M27 BOGALUSA
(578828) Community Center and Emergency Shelter, Planning and
Construction
(Washington)
Payable from General Obligation Bonds
Priority 1 $ 399,725
(578878) Davenport Avenue Bridge, Servitude Street Emergency
Replacement and Repair, Planning and Construction
(Washington)
Payable from General Obligation Bonds
Priority 5 $ 565,000
50/M29 BOSSIER CITY
(578490) Water Treatment Improvements - Nanofiltration System,
Planning and Construction
(Bossier)
Payable from General Obligation Bonds
Priority 1 $ 2,000,000
Priority 5 $ 21,000,000
Total $ 23,000,000
(578491) Swan Lake/Deen Point Waterline Extension, Planning and
Construction
(Bossier)
Payable from General Obligation Bonds
Priority 5 $ 6,120,000
50/M32 BROUSSARD
(576937) Water System Groundwater Storage Tank, Planning and
Construction
(Lafayette)
Payable from General Obligation Bonds
Priority 1 $ 125,000
Priority 5 $ 1,000,000
Total $ 1,125,000
Page 88 of 174

HB NO. 2 ENROLLED
(576938) Marteau Road Water Well, Planning and Construction
(Lafayette)
Payable from General Obligation Bonds
Priority 1 $ 390,000
Priority 5 $ 4,200,000
Total $ 4,590,000
(576939) Albertson Parkway Water Well and Ground Storage Tank,
Planning and Construction
(Lafayette)
Payable from General Obligation Bonds
Priority 1 $ 1,890,000
Priority 5 $ 2,716,000
Total $ 4,606,000
(576940) Highway 89 Improvements, Planning and Construction
(Lafayette)
Payable from General Obligation Bonds
Priority 1 $ 3,635,748
Priority 5 $ 4,000,000
Total $ 7,635,748
(578880) Reconstruct South Bernard Road from LA Hwy 182 to US
Hwy 90, Planning and Construction
(Lafayette)
Payable from General Obligation Bonds
Priority 1 $ 199,927
50/M38 CANKTON
(576916) Water System Upgrades, Planning and Construction
(St. Landry)
Payable from General Obligation Bonds
Priority 5 $ 250,000
50/M39 CARENCRO
(577951) City Wide Water Main Rehabilitation Project, Planning and
Construction
(Lafayette)
Payable from General Obligation Bonds
Priority 5 $ 4,500,000
Payable from State General Fund (Direct) Non-Recurring
Revenues $ 1,500,000
Payable from State General Fund (Direct) $ 600,000
Total $ 6,600,000
(578893) I-49 to Gloria Switch Coulee Project, Planning and
Construction
(Lafayette)
Payable from General Obligation Bonds
Priority 1 $ 203,058
50/M45 CHURCH POINT
(577897) Sewer System Improvements, Planning and
Construction
(Acadia)
Payable from General Obligation Bonds
Priority 5 $ 3,900,000
Page 89 of 174

HB NO. 2 ENROLLED
(577899) Street and Drainage Improvements, Planning
and Construction
(Acadia)
Payable from General Obligation Bonds
Priority 5 $ 5,300,000
50/M48 CLAYTON
(577781) Clayton Street Improvements, Planning and Construction
(Concordia)
Payable from General Obligation Bonds
Priority 5 $ 3,500,000
50/M50 COLFAX
(578895) Street Improvements, Planning and Construction
(Grant)
Payable from General Obligation Bonds
Priority 1 $ 131,157
Priority 5 $ 1,250,000
Total $ 1,381,157
50/M54 COTTON VALLEY
(578897) Sewerage System Improvements, Planning and Construction
(Webster)
Payable from General Obligation Bonds
Priority 1 $ 1,189,000
50/M57 COVINGTON
(578046) LA 21 and Tyler Street Roundabout, Planning and
Construction
(St. Tammany)
Payable from General Obligation Bonds
Priority 5 $ 2,700,000
(578047) Downtown Historic District Overlays, Planning and
Construction
(St. Tammany)
Payable from General Obligation Bonds
Priority 1 $ 28,473
Priority 5 $ 640,000
Total $ 668,473
(578274) Wastewater Collection System Rehabilitation
Improvements, Planning and Construction
(St. Tammany)
Payable from the Capital Outlay Savings Fund $ 1,000,000
50/M58 CROWLEY
(577745) Oddfellows Road Improvements, Planning and
Construction
(Acadia)
Payable from General Obligation Bonds
Priority 5 $ 6,040,000
(577762) Sewer System Upgrade, Planning and Construction
(Acadia)
Payable from the Capital Outlay Savings Fund $ 350,000
Page 90 of 174

HB NO. 2 ENROLLED
50/M60 DELCAMBRE
(577774) Street and Drainage Improvements,
Planning and Construction
(Vermilion)
Payable from the Capital Outlay Savings Fund $ 250,000
50/M63 DENHAM SPRINGS
(577253) Home Depot Road Improvements (LA 3003 to LA 3002),
Planning and Construction
(Livingston)
Payable from General Obligation Bonds
Priority 5 $ 2,770,000
(577254) DEMCO Drive/Convention Drive,
Planning and Construction
(Livingston)
Payable from General Obligation Bonds
Priority 5 $ 5,000,000
Payable from the Capital Outlay Savings Fund $ 1,100,000
Total $ 6,100,000
50/M64 DEQUINCY
(577309) Street Rehabilitation, Planning and Construction
(Calcasieu)
Payable from General Obligation Bonds
Priority 5 $ 2,000,000
Payable from the Capital Outlay Savings Fund $ 100,000
Total $ 2,100,000
50/M65 DERIDDER
(577298) Street Rehabilitation, Planning and Construction
(Beauregard)
Payable from General Obligation Bonds
Priority 5 $ 750,000
Payable from the Capital Outlay Savings Fund $ 100,000
Total $ 850,000
(577740) Water Line Improvements, Planning and Construction
(Beauregard)
Payable from General Obligation Bonds
Priority 5 $ 450,000
(577742) P.W. West Drainage Improvements,
Planning and Construction
(Beauregard)
Payable from General Obligation Bonds
Priority 5 $ 517,500

50/M68 DONALDSONVILLE
(578171) Lala Regira Field Renovations, Planning and Construction
(Ascension)
Payable from General Obligation Bonds
Priority 1 $ 286,500
Page 91 of 174

HB NO. 2 ENROLLED
(578180) Natural Gas System Infrastructure Improvement Phase III,
Planning and Construction
(Ascension)
Payable from General Obligation Bonds
Priority 1 $ 1,006,204
(578637) Septage Receiving Station, Planning and
Construction
(Ascension)
Payable from General Obligation Bonds
Priority 5 $ 1,260,000
Payable from the balance of reappropriated State General
Fund (Direct) previously allocated under the authority of
Act 5 of 2024 for Ascension Parish, LA 73 at LA 30
Roundabout, Planning and Construction (Ascension) $ 400,000
Total $ 1,660,000
(578641) LA 3089 Railroad Crossing, Planning and
Construction
(Ascension)
Payable from General Obligation Bonds
Priority 5 $ 2,150,000
Payable from the balance of reappropriated State General
Fund (Direct) previously allocated under the authority of
Act 5 of 2024 for Ascension Parish, LA 73 at LA 30
Roundabout, Planning and Construction (Ascension) $ 100,000
Total $ 2,250,000
(578665) Stormwater Resilience Project, Planning and Construction
(Ascension)
Payable from General Obligation Bonds
Priority 1 $ 120,000
Priority 5 $ 1,102,500
Total $ 1,222,500
50/M74 DUSON
(577307) LA Highway 95 Roundabout, Planning and Construction
(Acadia)
Payable from General Obligation Bonds
Priority 1 $ 2,542,129
50/M83 EUNICE
(577839) Street Improvements, Planning and Construction
(St. Landry)
Payable from General Obligation Bonds
Priority 5 $ 3,780,000
(578611) Renovations to City Hall/Police Department,
Planning and Construction
(St. Landry)
Payable from General Obligation Bonds
Priority 5 $ 990,000
50/M84 EVERGREEN
(578901) Evergreen Water System Improvements
(Avoyelles)
Payable from General Obligation Bonds
Priority 1 $ 4,055
Page 92 of 174

HB NO. 2 ENROLLED
50/M85 FARMERVILLE
(578070) Lake D'Arbonne Mega Ramp, Planning and Construction
(Union)
Payable from General Obligation Bonds
Priority 1 $ 2,000,000
Priority 5 $ 2,185,000
Total $ 4,185,000
50/M87 FERRIDAY
(576695) Water Renovations, Planning and Construction
(Concordia)
Payable from General Obligation Bonds
Priority 1 $ 298,987
Priority 2 $ 1,500,000
Priority 5 $ 3,000,000
Payable from the Capital Outlay Savings Fund $ 1,500,000
Total $ 6,298,987
(576696) Town of Ferriday Municipal Complex and Wastewater
Collection and Treatment Improvements, Planning and
Construction
(Concordia)
Payable from General Obligation Bonds
Priority 1 $ 700,000
Priority 5 $ 18,400,000
Total $ 19,100,000
50/M91 FORDOCHE
(577095) Water Distribution System Improvements, Planning and
Construction
(Pointe Coupee)
Payable from General Obligation Bonds
Priority 1 $ 2,822,475
Priority 5 $ 500,000
Total $ 3,322,475
50/MA3 GOLDEN MEADOW
(577486) Armand/Alcide Area Drainage, Planning and
Construction
Payable from State General Fund (Direct) Non-Recurring
Revenues $ 1,010,000
(578902) Upgrade to North Sewerage Treatment Plant, Planning and
Construction
(Lafourche)
Payable from General Obligation Bonds
Priority 1 $ 4,065
50/MA5 GONZALES
(578471) Roadway Improvements, Planning, Design,
and Construction
(Ascension)
Payable from General Obligation Bonds
Priority 2 $ 37,000
Priority 5 $ 2,705,000
Total $ 2,742,000
Page 93 of 174

HB NO. 2 ENROLLED
(578903) Connector Road for City of Gonzales Hospital District,
Planning and Construction
(Ascension)
Payable from General Obligation Bonds
Priority 1 $ 37,208
50/MA6 GRAMBLING
(578214) Water Distribution System Replacement, Planning and
Construction
(Lincoln)
Payable from General Obligation Bonds
Priority 5 $ 1,920,000
(578216) Wastewater System Expansion, Planning and Construction
(Lincoln)
Payable from General Obligation Bonds
Priority 5 $ 2,000,000
50/MB2 GRAYSON
(578064) Water Treatment Plant, Planning and Construction
(Caldwell)
Payable from General Obligation Bonds
Priority 5 $ 3,650,000
Payable from the Capital Outlay Savings Fund $ 300,000
Total $ 3,950,000
50/MB5 GRETNA
(578747) City Hall Exterior and Interior Renovation
(Jefferson)
Payable from General Obligation Bonds
Priority 1 $ 383,347
Priority 5 $ 1,500,000
Total $ 1,883,347
50/MB7 GUEYDAN
(577139) Police and Fire Station Reconstruction,
Planning and Construction
(Vermilion)
Payable from General Obligation Bonds
Priority 5 $ 1,687,500
50/MB8 HALL SUMMIT
( ) Park Redevelopment and Community Center,
Planning and Construction
(Red River)
Payable from General Obligation Bonds
Priority 5 $ 2,790,000
Payable from the Capital Outlay Savings Fund $ 310,000
Total $ 3,100,000
Pending submittal of a capital outlay budget request pursuant to the provisions of R.S.
39:112.
Page 94 of 174

HB NO. 2 ENROLLED
( ) Hall Summit Roadway Rehabilitation for Various Streets,
Planning and Construction
(Red River)
Payable from General Obligation Bonds
Priority 2 $ 300,000
Priority 5 $ 2,700,000
Total $ 3,000,000
Pending submittal of a capital outlay budget request pursuant to the provisions of R.S.
39:112.
50/MC1 HARAHAN
(577445) Jefferson Highway Safety Street Lighting Project,
Planning and Construction
(Jefferson)
Payable from General Obligation Bonds
Priority 5 $ 675,000
(577630) Halsey Drive Neighborhood Drainage Installation, Planning
and Construction
(Jefferson)
Payable from General Obligation Bonds
Priority 5 $ 783,880
Payable from the Capital Outlay Savings Fund $ 300,000
Total $ 1,083,880
(577783) Cover Eroding Ditch at Colonial Club Entrance,
Planning and Construction
(Jefferson)
Payable from the Capital Outlay Savings Fund $ 300,000
(577804) Glenwood Park Subdivision Emergency Drainage,
Planning and Construction
(Jefferson)
Payable from General Obligation Bonds
Priority 2 $ 100,000
Priority 5 $ 900,000
Total $ 1,000,000
(578904) Emergency Sewer Collection and Treatment System
Overhaul, Planning and Construction
(Jefferson)
Payable from General Obligation Bonds
Priority 5 $ 1,000,000
(578998) Emergency Road Repair and Replacement, Planning
and Construction
(Jefferson)
Payable from the balance of the Capital Outlay Savings
Fund previously allocated under the authority of Act 5
of 2024 for Harahan, Emergency Road Replacement, Monroe
Street, and Resor Avenue, Planning and Construction
(Jefferson) and Act 5 of 2024 for Harahan, Emergency Road
Repair/Replacement, Ok Avenue and Elfer Street, Planning
and Construction (Jefferson) $ 1,500,000
Page 95 of 174

HB NO. 2 ENROLLED
50/MC3 HAUGHTON
(578586) I-20 Water & Sewer Force Main Crossing & Lift Station
(Bossier)
Payable from General Obligation Bonds
Priority 5 $ 4,200,000
Payable from State General Fund (Direct) Non-Recurring
Revenues $ 500,000
Total $ 4,700,000
(578588) LA 157 Widening from I-20 to Railroad South of
W. McKinley Ave., Planning and Construction
(Bossier)
Payable from General Obligation Bonds
Priority 2 $ 500,000
Priority 5 $ 5,000,000
Payable from the Capital Outlay Savings Fund $ 550,000
Total $ 6,050,000
(578590) Communications Tower for Public Safety & Utilities,
Planning and Construction
(Bossier)
Payable from the Balance of State General
Fund (Direct) Non-Recurring previously allocated
under the authority of Act 5 of 2024 for Fletcher
Technical Community College, Precision Agriculture
Training Facility, Planning and Construction
(Terrebonne) $ 450,000
50/MC4 HAYNESVILLE
(578018) Water Distribution System Improvements (Phase II),
Planning and Construction
(Claiborne)
Payable from General Obligation Bonds
Priority 5 $ 1,000,000
(578958) Water Distribution System Improvements, Planning and
Construction
(Claiborne)
Payable from General Obligation Bonds
Priority 1 $ 855,000
Payable from the Capital Outlay Savings Fund $ 150,000
Total $ 1,005,000
50/MC6 HENDERSON
(576946) Sewer System Improvements, Planning and Construction
(St. Martin)
Payable from General Obligation Bonds
Priority 1 $ 3,000,000
Priority 5 $ 2,670,000
Total $ 5,670,000
Page 96 of 174

HB NO. 2 ENROLLED
50/MC7 HESSMER
(578649) Village-Wide Street Improvements, Planning
and Construction
(Avoyelles)
Payable from General Obligation Bonds
Priority 2 $ 115,000
Priority 5 $ 920,000
Total $ 1,035,000
50/MC9 HOMER
(578244) Wastewater Treatment Plant Upgrades, Planning
and Construction
(Claiborne)
Payable from General Obligation Bonds
Priority 5 $ 775,000
Payable from the Capital Outlay Savings Fund $ 100,000
Total $ 875,000
(578905) Town Hall Renovations, Planning and Construction
(Claiborne)
Payable from General Obligation Bonds
Priority 5 $ 796,404
(578906) Street Improvement Project, Planning and Construction
(Claiborne)
Payable from General Obligation Bonds
Priority 5 $ 600,000
50/MD1 HORNBECK
(577305) Road Rehabilitation, Planning and Construction
(Vernon)
Payable from General Obligation Bonds
Priority 5 $ 600,000
Payable from the Capital Outlay Savings Fund $ 100,000
Total $ 700,000
(578909) West Side Water System Expansion, Planning and
Construction
(Sabine, Vernon)
Payable from General Obligation Bonds
Priority 1 $ 74,903
50/MD2 HOSSTON
(578500) Water System Improvements, Water Well, Water Main,
SCADA, Generator, and Miscellaneous Equipment,
Planning and Construction
(Caddo)
Payable from General Obligation Bonds
Priority 5 $ 600,000
Payable from the balance of General
Obligation Bond proceeds previously
allocated under the authority of Act 485
of 2021 for Carencro, I-49 to Gloria Switch
Coulee Project, Planning and Construction
(Lafayette) $ 203,058
Total $ 803,058
Page 97 of 174

HB NO. 2 ENROLLED
50/MD4 IDA
(578503) Water System Improvements, Water Wells, Tanks, and
Booster Stations Construction, Planning and Construction
(Caddo)
Payable from General Obligation Bonds
Priority 1 $ 1,092,435
(578524) Water System Improvements - Water Main
Replacements, Phase 1, Planning and
Construction
(Caddo)
Payable from General Obligation Bonds
Priority 5 $ 2,700,000
50/MD6 IOTA
(577697) Street Improvements, Planning and Construction
(Acadia)
Payable from General Obligation Bonds
Priority 5 $ 1,625,000
(577698) Belt Press System for Sanitary Sewerage Sludge
Treatment, Planning and Construction
(Acadia)
Payable from General Obligation Bonds
Priority 5 $ 1,260,000
50/ME1 JEAN LAFITTE
(578654) Amphitheater Stage, Planning and Construction
(Jefferson)
Payable from General Obligation Bonds
Priority 1 $ 400,000
50/ME2 JEANERETTE
(578276) Sewer System Improvements, Planning and Construction
(Iberia)
Payable from General Obligation Bonds
Priority 5 $ 3,320,000
(578277) Water System Improvements, Planning and Construction
(Iberia)
Payable from General Obligation Bonds
Priority 5 $ 575,000
(578278) City Hall Renovations, Planning and Construction
(Iberia)
Payable from General Obligation Bonds
Priority 5 $ 370,000
50/ME4 JENNINGS
(577902) Fred and Ruth Zigler Memorial Dr. Extension, Planning and
Construction
(Jefferson Davis)
Payable from General Obligation Bonds
Priority 5 $ 7,955,000
Payable from the Capital Outlay Savings Fund $ 200,000
Total $ 8,155,000
Page 98 of 174

HB NO. 2 ENROLLED
50/ME6 JONESVILLE
(578407) Glenn Ditch Pump Station, Planning and Construction
(Catahoula)
Payable from General Obligation Bonds
Priority 5 $ 325,000
Payable from the Capital Outlay Savings Fund $ 325,000
Total $ 650,000
50/ME8 KAPLAN
(576965) Street and Drainage Improvements, Planning and
Construction
(Vermilion)
Payable from General Obligation Bonds
Priority 5 $ 850,000
50/MF1 KENNER
(577014) Lincoln Manor Drainage Phase 2, Planning and Construction
(Jefferson)
Payable from General Obligation Bonds
Priority 1 $ 500,000
Priority 5 $ 750,000
Payable from the Capital Outlay Savings Fund $ 100,000
Total $ 1,350,000
(577015) Roosevelt Boulevard Improvements (Airline Drive to West
Metairie Ave.), Planning and Construction
(Jefferson)
Payable from General Obligation Bonds
Priority 5 $ 4,730,000
Payable from the Capital Outlay Savings Fund $ 500,000
Total $ 5,230,000
(577018) Kenner Fire Department Facility Replacement - New Fire
Station, Planning and Construction
(Jefferson)
Payable from General Obligation Bonds
Priority 5 $ 1,000,000
Payable from the Capital Outlay Savings Fund $ 1,000,000
Total $ 2,000,000
(577037) Pump to the River Pump Station Phase I, Planning and
Construction
(Jefferson)
Payable from General Obligation Bonds
Priority 1 $ 1,421,379
Priority 5 $ 15,050,000
Total $ 16,471,379
(578912) Lincoln Manor Subdivision Drainage Improvement,
including 30th Street Roadway and Drainage Improvements
from Loyola Drive to Ohio Street, Planning and Construction
(Jefferson)
Payable from General Obligation Bonds
Priority 1 $ 119,998
Page 99 of 174

HB NO. 2 ENROLLED
50/MF6 KROTZ SPRINGS
(578936) Water System Infrastructure Improvements, Planning and
Construction
(St. Landry)
Payable from General Obligation Bonds
Priority 1 $ 70,000
Priority 5 $ 630,000
Total $ 700,000
50/MF7 LAFAYETTE
(576531) Johnston Street Infrastructure Improvements,
Planning and Construction
(Lafayette)
Payable from General Obligation Bonds
Priority 1 $ 2,500,000
Priority 5 $ 22,500,000
Total $ 25,000,000
(577005) Downtown/Freetown/UL Drainage Improvements,
Planning and Construction
(Lafayette)
Payable from General Obligation Bonds
Priority 2 $ 2,000,000
Priority 5 $ 10,000,000
Total $ 12,000,000
50/MF8 LAKE ARTHUR
(577818) Wastewater Treatment Facility Improvements, Planning and
Construction
(Jefferson Davis)
Payable from General Obligation Bonds
Priority 5 $ 1,050,000
(577819) Wastewater Collection System Improvements, Planning and
Construction
(Jefferson Davis)
Payable from General Obligation Bonds
Priority 5 $ 990,000
Payable from the Capital Outlay Savings Fund $ 100,000
Total $ 1,090,000
(577820) Water System Improvements, Planning and Construction
(Jefferson Davis)
Payable from General Obligation Bonds
Priority 5 $ 990,000
Payable from the Capital Outlay Savings Fund $ 900,000
Total $ 1,890,000
50/MF9 LAKE CHARLES
(578189) Lakefront Development
(Calcasieu)
Payable from General Obligation Bonds
Priority 1 $ 221,222
Priority 2 $ 500,000
Priority 5 $ 2,000,000
Payable from the Capital Outlay Savings Fund $ 1,000,000
Total $ 3,721,222
Page 100 of 174

HB NO. 2 ENROLLED
(578190) Relocation of Public Works Campus, Planning and
Construction
(Calcasieu)
Payable from General Obligation Bonds
Priority 1 $ 3,642,453
Priority 2 $ 1,000,000
Priority 5 $ 6,000,000
Total $ 10,642,453
(578191) Enterprise Boulevard Extension, Planning and
Construction
(Calcasieu)
Payable from General Obligation Bonds
Priority 5 $ 5,000,000
(578194) Downtown Parking Garage Rehabilitation, Planning
and Construction
(Calcasieu)
Payable from General Obligation Bonds
Priority 5 $ 1,500,000
(578917) Sallier Street Rehabilitation, Planning and Construction
(Calcasieu)
Payable from General Obligation Bonds
Priority 1 $ 1,000,000
Priority 5 $ 2,000,000
Total $ 3,000,000
50/MG1 LAKE PROVIDENCE
(577723) Town of Lake Providence Sewer System Improvements,
Planning and Construction
(East Carroll)
Payable from General Obligation Bonds
Priority 5 $ 1,740,000
50/MG3 LEESVILLE
(577846) Street Rehabilitation and Extension, Planning and
Construction
(Vernon)
Payable from General Obligation Bonds
Priority 1 $ 3,433
Priority 5 $ 750,000
Total $ 753,433
(577847) Drainage Improvements, Planning and Construction
(Vernon)
Payable from the Capital Outlay Savings Fund $ 300,000
(577849) City of Leesville, Sanitary Sewer Extension for Fort Johnson
formerly Fort Polk Entrance Road, Planning and
Construction
(Vernon)
Payable from General Obligation Bonds
Priority 1 $ 2,356,294
Priority 5 $ 2,000,000
Total $ 4,356,294
Page 101 of 174

HB NO. 2 ENROLLED
50/MG7 LIVINGSTON
(578352) Old Courthouse Renovations, Planning and Construction
(Livingston)
Payable from General Obligation Bonds
Priority 5 $ 3,000,000
50/MG8 LIVONIA
(577098) Water Well, Planning and Construction
(Pointe Coupee)
Payable from General Obligation Bonds
Priority 1 $ 988,425
Payable from State General Fund (Direct) $ 150,000
Total $ 1,138,425
50/MH5 LUTCHER
(578921) Roadway Improvements, Planning and Construction
(St. James)
Payable from General Obligation Bonds
Priority 2 $ 500,000
Priority 5 $ 1,000,000
Total $ 1,500,000
50/MH6 MADISONVILLE
(577123) Road Improvements, Planning and Construction
(St. Tammany)
Payable from General Obligation Bonds
Priority 5 $ 1,000,000
Payable from the Capital Outlay Savings Fund $ 100,000
Total $ 1,100,000
(577126) Water Main Improvements, Planning and Construction
(St. Tammany)
Payable from the Capital Outlay Savings Fund $ 500,000
50/MH8 MANDEVILLE
(577264) Police Department Building, Planning and Construction
(St. Tammany)
Payable from General Obligation Bonds
Priority 1 $ 1,000,000
Priority 2 $ 1,000,000
Total $ 2,000,000
50/MH9 MANGHAM
(578922) Mangham Recreation Complex, Planning and Construction
(Richland)
Payable from General Obligation Bonds
Priority 1 $ 28,879
50/MI3 MANY
(577666) Water Treatment Plant Improvements, Acquisition, Planning
and Construction
(Sabine)
Payable from General Obligation Bonds
Priority 5 $ 1,500,000
Page 102 of 174

HB NO. 2 ENROLLED
50/MI5 MARION
(578413) Municipal Complex, Planning and Construction
(Union)
Payable from General Obligation Bonds
Priority 5 $ 700,000
50/MI6 MARKSVILLE
(578045) Airport Road and West Waddil Street Improvements,
Planning and Construction
(Avoyelles)
Payable from General Obligation Bonds
Priority 5 $ 740,000
Payable from State General Fund (Direct) Non-Recurring
Revenues $ 70,000
Total $ 810,000
50/MI8 MAURICE
(577241) New Village Hall, Planning and Construction
(Vermilion)
Payable from General Obligation Bonds
Priority 1 $ 1,365,000
(578051) Sewer Treatment Plant Extension, Planning and
Construction
(Vermilion)
Payable from General Obligation Bonds
Priority 5 $ 6,100,000
Payable from State General Fund (Direct) Non-Recurring
Revenues $ 400,000
Total $ 6,500,000
50/MJ1 MELVILLE
(578001) Improvements to Multiple Streets in Melville, Planning and
Construction
(St. Landry)
Payable from General Obligation Bonds
Priority 1 $ 120,000
Priority 5 $ 1,200,000
Total $ 1,320,000
50/MJ2 MERMENTAU
(577699) Street Improvements, Planning and Construction
(Acadia)
Payable from General Obligation Bonds
Priority 5 $ 435,000
50/MJ5 MINDEN
(578182) Potable Water Ground Storage Tank, Planning and
Construction
(Webster)
Payable from General Obligation Bonds
Priority 1 $ 546,684
Page 103 of 174

HB NO. 2 ENROLLED
(578184) Robertson Lift Station Improvements, Planning and
Construction
(Webster)
Payable from General Obligation Bonds
Priority 5 $ 890,000
Payable from the balance of State General Fund (Direct)
previously allocated under the authority of Act 5 of 2024
for the Division of Administration, Statewide Roofing
AssetManagement Program and Waterproofing, Related
Repairs and Equipment Replacement Program
(Statewide) $ 890,000
Total $ 1,780,000
(578520) Fire Station, Planning and Construction
(Webster)
Payable from General Obligation Bonds
Priority 2 $ 594,500
Priority 5 $ 2,205,500
Total $ 2,800,000
50/MJ6 MONROE
(578317) I-20 Interchange Improvement and Kansas Garrett
Connector, Kansas Lane Connector, Planning and
Construction
($1,000,000 Local and $6,000,000 Federal Match)
(Ouachita)
Payable from General Obligation Bonds
Priority 1 $ 12,513,983
Priority 5 $ 15,468,121
Total $ 27,982,104
(578318) Booker T. Washington Stormwater System Evaluation and
Upgrades, Planning and Construction
(Ouachita)
Payable from General Obligation Bonds
Priority 2 $ 2,000,000
Priority 5 $ 3,030,000
Total $ 5,030,000
(578319) Young's Bayou Watershed Enhancement of Channel
Capacity, Planning and Construction
(Ouachita)
Payable from General Obligation Bonds
Priority 1 $ 500,000
Priority 5 $ 10,900,000
Total $ 11,400,000
(578320) Georgia Street Pump Station, Including Generator and
Auxiliary Pumps, Planning, Engineering, Right-of-Way,
Utilities and Construction
(Ouachita)
Payable from General Obligation Bonds
Priority 1 $ 6,000,000
Priority 5 $ 5,640,000
Total $ 11,640,000
Page 104 of 174

HB NO. 2 ENROLLED
(578323) Calypso Street Pump Station Rehabilitation, Planning,
Engineering, Design, Right-of-Way, Utilities, and
Construction
(Ouachita)
Payable from General Obligation Bonds
Priority 2 $ 1,000,000
Priority 5 $ 1,030,000
Total $ 2,030,000
50/MJ9 MOORINGSPORT
(576739) Caddo Lakeside Lodge Project, Planning and Construction
(Caddo)
Payable from the Capital Outlay Savings Fund $ 280,000
50/MK4 MORSE
(577701) Wastewater Treatment Facility, Planning and Construction
(Acadia)
Payable from General Obligation Bonds
Priority 5 $ 1,610,000
(578923) Water Tower Improvements, Planning and Construction
(Acadia)
Payable from General Obligation Bonds
Priority 1 $ 29,585
50/MK9 NATCHITOCHES
(577573) Second Street and Touline Street Concrete Pavement and
Replacement, Planning and Construction
(Natchitoches)
Payable from General Obligation Bonds
Priority 1 $ 2,000,000
Payable from State General Fund (Direct) Non-Recurring
Revenues $ 280,000
Total $ 2,280,000
50/ML1 NEW IBERIA
(577028) New Iberia- Street Improvements, Planning and
Construction
(Iberia)
Payable from General Obligation Bonds
Priority 5 $ 4,500,000
Payable from the Capital Outlay Savings Fund $ 1,000,000
Total $ 5,500,000
(577029) New Iberia - Drainage Improvements, Planning and
Construction
(Iberia)
Payable from General Obligation Bonds
Priority 5 $ 4,200,000
Payable from State General Fund (Direct) $ 1,000,000
Total $ 5,200,000
Page 105 of 174

HB NO. 2 ENROLLED
(577031) Improvements to Buildings in City Parks, Planning and
Construction
(Iberia)
Payable from General Obligation Bonds
Priority 1 $ 3,142,000
Priority 5 $ 5,000,000
Total $ 8,142,000
(578924) Frontage Road Improvements, Planning and Construction
(Iberia)
Payable from General Obligation Bonds
Priority 1 $ 1,000,000
50/ML2 NEW LLANO
(578613) Maintenance Building Improvements,
Planning and Construction
(Vernon)
Payable from the Capital Outlay Savings Fund $ 260,000
50/ML3 NEW ORLEANS
(577423) Monticello Canal Culverts at Airline Highway
(Orleans)
Payable from General Obligation Bonds
Priority 1 $ 750,000
Priority 5 $ 8,250,000
Total $ 9,000,000
(577425) West Bank Ferry Terminal Renovations, Planning and
Construction
(Orleans)
Payable from General Obligation Bonds
Priority 1 $ 300,000
Priority 5 $ 300,000
Total $ 600,000
(577426) Dryades Kitchen Incubator, Planning and Construction
(Orleans)
Payable from General Obligation Bonds
Priority 5 $ 350,000
(577427) Richard Lee Playground, Planning and Construction
(Orleans)
Payable from General Obligation Bonds
Priority 1 $ 133,699
Priority 5 $ 3,000,000
Total $ 3,133,699
(577429) Lincoln Beach Redevelopment, Planning and Construction
(Orleans)
Payable from General Obligation Bonds
Priority 5 $ 5,500,000
(577430) Old New Orleans VA Building Rehabilitation
(Orleans)
Payable from General Obligation Bonds
Priority 1 $ 313,546
Page 106 of 174

HB NO. 2 ENROLLED
(577431) New Sewerage and Water Board Power Plant, Planning and
Construction
(Orleans)
Payable from General Obligation Bonds
Priority 1 $ 3,000,000
Priority 5 $ 26,000,000
Total $ 29,000,000
(578004) New City Hall, Planning and Construction
(Orleans)
Payable from General Obligation Bonds
Priority 5 $ 1,000,000
Payable from the balance of State General Funds (Direct)
previously allocated under the authority of Act 5 of 2024
for the Division of Administration, Statewide Roofing
Asset Management Program and Waterproofing, Related
Repairs and Equipment Replacement Program
(Statewide) $ 1,000,000
Total $ 2,000,000
(578006) New Consolidated Westbank Fire Station,
Planning and Construction
(Orleans)
Payable from General Obligation Bonds
Priority 2 $ 1,750,000
Priority 5 $ 5,000,000
Total $ 6,750,000
(578048) Municipal Auditorium Stabilization/Armstrong Park
Redevelopment, Planning and Construction
(Orleans)
Payable from General Obligation Bonds
Priority 2 $ 1,000,000
Priority 5 $ 15,000,000
Total $ 16,000,000
(578466) Sewerage and Water Board Water Treatment
Modernization, 5 Year Capital Improvement
Plan, Planning and Construction
(Orleans)
Payable from General Obligation Bonds
Priority 2 $ 9,500,000
Priority 5 $ 4,500,000
Total $ 14,000,000
50/ML4 NEW ROADS
(578442) Industrial Park Development Project, Including
Underground Electrical System Upgrades, Planning and
Construction
(Pointe Coupee)
Payable from State General Fund (Direct) Non-Recurring
Revenues $ 988,000
Page 107 of 174

HB NO. 2 ENROLLED
50/ML8 NORWOOD
(576923) Sewer Collection and Treatment System Improvements,
Planning and Construction
(East Feliciana)
Payable from General Obligation Bonds
Priority 5 $ 872,000
Payable from the Capital Outlay Savings Fund $ 100,000
Total $ 972,000
50/MM2 OAKDALE
(577977) Citywide Sewer Improvements, Planning and Construction
(Allen)
Payable from General Obligation Bonds
Priority 5 $ 3,400,000
Payable from the Capital Outlay Savings Fund $ 750,000
Total $ 4,150,000
50/MM4 OIL CITY
(578368) Wastewater Collection and Treatment Improvements,
Planning and Construction
(Caddo)
Payable from General Obligation Bonds
Priority 5 $ 1,000,000
Payable from the Capital Outlay Savings Fund $ 900,000
Total $ 1,900,000
50/MM6 OPELOUSAS
(577407) Opelousas Street and Drainage Improvements
(St. Landry)
Payable from General Obligation Bonds
Priority 1 $ 1,000,000
Payable from State General Fund (Direct) Non-Recurring
Revenues $ 2,250,000
Total $ 3,250,000
(578925) Water Meter Replacement and Upgrades, Planning and
Construction
(St. Landry)
Payable from General Obligation Bonds
Priority 1 $ 40,705
50/MM9 PATTERSON
(578628) Replacement of Water and Gas Meters in Patterson,
Planning and Construction
(St. Mary)
Payable from General Obligation Bonds
Priority 1 $ 439,300
50/MN1 PEARL RIVER
(577158) Drainage Improvements, Planning and Construction
(St. Tammany)
Payable from General Obligation Bonds
Priority 5 $ 1,440,000
Payable from the Capital Outlay Savings Fund $ 100,000
Total $ 1,540,000
Page 108 of 174

HB NO. 2 ENROLLED
(577961) Roadway Improvements, Planning and Construction
(St. Tammany)
Payable from the Capital Outlay Savings Fund $ 500,000
50/MN3 PINEVILLE
(578926) Cedar Lake Pump Station Reconstruction, Design, Planning
and Construction
(Rapides)
Payable from General Obligation Bonds
Priority 5 $ 585,000
(578965) New Police Complex and City Court Additions and
Improvements, Planning and Construction
(Rapides)
Payable from General Obligation Bonds
Priority 1 $ 140,000
Priority 5 $ 8,965,000
Payable from State General Fund (Direct) Non-Recurring
Revenues $ 1,985,000
Total $ 11,090,000
50/MO1 PONCHATOULA
(578830) Fire Station Complex US 51 - Veterans Avenue, Land
Acquisition, Planning and Construction
(Tangipahoa)
Payable from General Obligation Bonds
Priority 1 $ 648,375
Priority 5 $ 800,000
Total $ 1,448,375
50/MO6 PROVENCAL
(577963) New Water Well and Emergency Water Connection,
Planning and Construction
(Natchitoches)
Payable from General Obligation Bonds
Priority 1 $ 600,000
50/MO8 RAYNE
( ) Water Tower Repairs, Planning and Construction
(Acadia)
Payable from the Capital Outlay Savings Fund $ 350,000
50/MO9 RAYVILLE
(578529) Water Service Facilities for Economic Development,
Planning and Construction
(Richland)
Payable from General Obligation Bonds
Priority 5 $ 8,022,300
(578530) Rayville Road Improvements for Economic Development,
Planning and Construction
(Richland)
Payable from General Obligation Bonds
Priority 5 $ 2,550,000
Page 109 of 174

HB NO. 2 ENROLLED
(578674) Municipal Complex, Planning and Construction
(Richland)
Payable from General Obligation Bonds
Priority 5 $ 5,000,000
(578675) Wastewater Transport and Treatment Facilities for
Economic Development
(Richland)
Payable from General Obligation Bonds
Priority 5 $ 3,500,000
50/MP9 ROSELAND
(578629) Sewer System Improvements, Planning and Construction
(Tangipahoa)
Payable from General Obligation Bonds
Priority 2 $ 1,179,207
Payable from the Capital Outlay Savings Fund $ 50,000
Total $ 1,229,207
50/MQ1 ROSEPINE
(577828) Rehabilitation of Main Street, Planning and Construction
(Vernon)
Payable from General Obligation Bonds
Priority 1 $ 450,000
50/MQ2 RUSTON
(578287) East Kentucky/Cedar Creek Road Intersection
Improvements, Planning and Construction
(West Feliciana)
Payable from General Obligation Bonds
Priority 5 $ 478,200
(578288) New Road from Highway 150 to I-20 South Frontage
Road, Planning and Construction
(Lincoln)
Payable from General Obligation Bonds
Priority 1 $ 815,718
Priority 5 $ 1,740,000
Payable from the Capital Outlay Savings Fund $ 1,600,000
Total $ 4,155,718
50/MQ3 ST. FRANCISVILLE
(577161) Emergency Erosion Repairs, Planning and Construction
(West Feliciana)
Payable from General Obligation Bonds
Priority 1 $ 3,204,647
(577162) Commerce Street Improvements and Utilities Relocation,
Planning and Construction
(West Feliciana)
Payable from General Obligation Bonds
Priority 1 $ 1,100,000
Priority 5 $ 2,100,000
Total $ 3,200,000
Page 110 of 174

HB NO. 2 ENROLLED
50/MQ4 ST. JOSEPH
(578831) St. Joseph's Community House, Planning and Construction
(Tensas)
Payable from General Obligation Bonds
Priority 5 $ 690,000
50/MQ5 ST. MARTINVILLE
(577943) Main Street Enhancement Project, Planning and
Construction
(St. Martin)
Payable from General Obligation Bonds
Priority 1 $ 1,450,000
(578003) Public Works Buildings Renovation, Planning
and Construction
(St. Martin)
Payable from State General Fund (Direct) Non-Recurring
Revenues $ 660,000
(578005) Water Drainage Project, Planning and Construction
(St. Martin)
Payable from General Obligation Bonds
Priority 1 $ 200,000
Priority 5 $ 660,000
Payable from State General Fund (Direct) Non-Recurring
Revenues $ 1,340,000
Total $ 2,200,000
(578009) SLCC Sewer Extension, Planning and Construction
(St. Martin)
Payable from General Obligation Bonds
Priority 5 $ 1,650,000
(578146) Rehab Existing Sidewalks and Installation of
New Sidewalks, Planning and Construction
(St. Martin)
Payable from General Obligation Bonds
Priority 5 $ 1,400,000
50/MQ8 SCOTT
(576677) LA 93 Roadway Improvements- I-10 Ramp to Renaud
Drive, Planning, Construction, and Land Acquisition
(Lafayette)
Payable from General Obligation Bonds
Priority 1 $ 2,800,000
Priority 5 $ 5,845,000
Payable from State General Fund (Direct) Non-Recurring
Revenues $ 1,500,000
Payable from State General Fund (Direct) $ 1,500,000
Total $ 11,645,000
(576678) Eraste Landry Road Extension, Planning and Construction
(Lafayette)
Payable from General Obligation Bonds
Priority 1 $ 1,015,000
Priority 5 $ 7,992,000
Total $ 9,007,000
Page 111 of 174

HB NO. 2 ENROLLED
(576679) Bridge Replacement and Overlay, Planning and
Construction
(Lafayette)
Payable from General Obligation Bonds
Priority 5 $ 1,200,000
Payable from State General Fund (Direct) Non-Recurring
Revenues $ 1,300,000
Total $ 2,500,000
(578832) Water and Sewer Line Installation along Apollo Road
Extension, including Utilities, Planning and Construction
(Lafayette)
Payable from General Obligation Bonds
Priority 1 $ 3,128,750
50/MQA ST. GEORGE
(577981) Manchac- Fountain Regional Detention and Preservation,
Planning and Construction
(East Baton Rouge)
Payable from General Obligation Bonds
Priority 5 $ 36,000,000
Payable from the Capital Outlay Savings Fund $ 1,000,000
Total $ 37,000,000
(577985) Jefferson Highway Safety Widening and Drainage
Improvements, Planning and Construction
(East Baton Rouge)
Payable from General Obligation Bonds
Priority 5 $ 8,400,000
Payable from the Capital Outlay Savings Fund $ 500,000
Total $ 8,900,000
(577989) St. George Regional Drainage Improvements, Planning
and Construction
(East Baton Rouge)
Payable from State General Fund (Direct) Non-Recurring
Revenues $ 996,000
50/MR1 SHREVEPORT
(577747) Shreveport Regional Airport Expansion and Improvements,
Planning and Construction
(Caddo)
Payable from General Obligation Bonds
Priority 5 $ 50,000,000
(577749) Shreveport Healthcare and Development Corridor, Planning
and Construction
(Caddo)
Payable from General Obligation Bonds
Priority 1 $ 1,500,000
Priority 5 $ 40,000,000
Total $ 41,500,000
(577750) District 3 Road Rehabilitation, Planning and Construction
(Caddo)
Payable from General Obligation Bonds
Priority 5 $ 500,000
Page 112 of 174

HB NO. 2 ENROLLED
(577751) Bayou Pierre Drainage and Recreation, Planning and
Construction
(Caddo)
Payable from General Obligation Bonds
Priority 2 $ 4,000,000
Priority 5 $ 20,000,000
Payable from the Capital Outlay Savings Fund $ 3,000,000
Total $ 27,000,000
(577752) Amtrak Platform and Facility, Planning and Construction
(Caddo)
Payable from General Obligation Bonds
Priority 5 $ 10,000,000
(577753) University Park Subdivision Improvements, Planning and
Construction
(Caddo)
Payable from General Obligation Bonds
Priority 5 $ 6,000,000
(577754) C.C. Antoine Museum and Art Center,
Planning and Construction
(Caddo)
Payable from the Capital Outlay Savings Fund $ 100,000
(577760) Hirsch Coliseum Improvements, Planning and Construction
(Caddo)
Payable from General Obligation Bonds
Priority 5 $ 9,000,000
(577763) Thomas L. Amiss Water Treatment Plant Improvements
Planning and Construction
(Caddo)
Payable from General Obligation Bonds
Priority 5 $ 13,000,000
(578835) Greenwood Road Extension, (Greenwood Industrial Park
Road - Asphalt Road), Planning and Construction
(Caddo)
Payable from General Obligation Bonds
Priority 1 $ 69,600
Priority 5 $ 2,000,000
Total $ 2,069,600
(578836) C.C. Antoine Park, Planning and Construction
(Caddo)
Payable from General Obligation Bonds
Priority 5 $ 350,000
50/MR5 SIMMESPORT
(577982) Water System Improvements, Planning and
Construction
(Avoyelles)
Payable from State General Fund (Direct) Non-Recurring
Revenues $ 365,000
Page 113 of 174

HB NO. 2 ENROLLED
50/MR6 SIMPSON
(577947) Standpipe Tank Refurbishment, Planning and Construction
(Vernon)
Payable from the Capital Outlay Savings Fund $ 100,000
50/MR8 SLAUGHTER
(576786) Water System Improvements, Planning and Construction
(East Feliciana)
Payable from General Obligation Bonds
Priority 1 $ 2,500,000
(576788) Road Rehabilitations, Planning and Construction
(East Feliciana)
Payable from the Capital Outlay Savings Fund $ 100,000
(577058) Drainage Improvements, Planning and Construction
(East Feliciana)
Payable from General Obligation Bonds
Priority 2 $ 400,000
50/MR9 SLIDELL
(578260) Pedestrian Crosswalks on US 11 at Kostmayer Avenue,
Westchester Place, Pennsylvania Ave., and West Hall Street,
Planning and Construction
(St. Tammany)
Payable from General Obligation Bonds
Priority 2 $ 250,000
Priority 5 $ 2,000,000
Total $ 2,250,000
50/MS4 SPRINGFIELD
(577167) Recreational Park, Planning and Construction
(Livingston)
Payable from the balance of State General Fund (Direct)
previously allocated under the authority of Act 465 of 2023
for Springfield Roadway Rehabilitation, Planning and
Construction (Livingston) $ 655,000
(577168) Water System Improvements and Upgrades, Planning and
Construction
(Livingston)
Payable from General Obligation Bonds
Priority 1 $ 3,847,400
50/MS5 SPRINGHILL
(577208) Water System Improvements - Phase 3, Planning and
Construction
(Webster)
Payable from General Obligation Bonds
Priority 1 $ 2,377,200
Priority 5 $ 4,100,000
Total $ 6,477,200
Page 114 of 174

HB NO. 2 ENROLLED
50/MS7 STERLINGTON
(578750) Sewer Collection System Improvements,
Planning and Construction
(Ouachita)
Payable from General Obligation Bonds
Priority 2 $ 400,000
Priority 5 $ 4,600,000
Total $ 5,000,000
50/MS9 SULPHUR
(577578) Installation of Water Meters
(Calcasieu)
Payable from General Obligation Bonds
Priority 5 $ 2,000,000
(577579) Maplewood Drive Rehabilitation
(Calcasieu)
Payable from General Obligation Bonds
Priority 1 $ 4,474,454
Priority 5 $ 5,137,500
Payable from State General Fund (Direct) Non-Recurring
Revenues $ 1,200,000
Total $ 10,811,954
(577580) City of Sulphur, Phase 3 Wastewater Treatment Facility
Improvements, Planning and Construction
(Calcasieu)
Payable from General Obligation Bonds
Priority 5 $ 1,300,000
(577581) Maplewood Pump Station, Planning and Construction
(Calcasieu)
Payable from General Obligation Bonds
Priority 1 $ 1,075,000
50/MT1 SUN
(578837) Roof Replacement of Town Hall Building
(St. Tammany)
Payable from General Obligation Bonds
Priority 1 $ 200,000
50/MT2 SUNSET
(577464) City Hall Renovations and New Addition,
Planning and Construction
(St. Landry)
Payable from General Obligation Bonds
Priority 5 $ 1,470,000
Payable from the Capital Outlay Savings Fund $ 150,000
Total $ 1,620,000
50/MT3 TALLULAH
(578838) Emergency Water Production, Transmission and Treatment,
Acquisition, Planning and Construction
(Madison)
Payable from General Obligation Bonds
Priority 1 $ 62,125
Page 115 of 174

HB NO. 2 ENROLLED
50/MT5 THIBODAUX
(577912) LA 648/Acadia Road Intersection Improvements Project,
Planning and Construction
(Lafourche)
Payable from General Obligation Bonds
Priority 5 $ 3,000,000
(577913) Replacement of Canal Boulevard Bridges and Construction
of Menard Pedestrian Bike Trail, Planning and Construction
(Lafourche)
Payable from General Obligation Bonds
Priority 1 $ 5,929,963
(578810) Emergency Operations Center, Planning and
Construction
(Lafourche)
Payable from General Obligation Bonds
Priority 5 $ 2,470,000
Payable from State General Fund (Direct) $ 400,000
Total $ 2,870,000
50/MU2 VIDALIA
(576918) Utility System Upgrade, Planning, Acquisition,
Construction and Equipment
(Concordia)
Payable from General Obligation Bonds
Priority 1 $ 3,943,913
Priority 5 $ 7,000,000
Total $ 10,943,913
(576919) Development of a Slackwater Port on the Mississippi River,
Planning and Construction
(Concordia)
Payable from General Obligation Bonds
Priority 1 $ 364,616
50/MU4 VILLE PLATTE
(578469) Wastewater Treatment Facility Rehabilitation, Planning and
Construction
(Evangeline)
Payable from General Obligation Bonds
Priority 5 $ 12,481,000
50/MU5 VINTON
(577553) Water Plant Improvements, Planning and Construction
(Calcasieu)
Payable from General Obligation Bonds
Priority 5 $ 1,800,000
(577555) Street Rehabilitation, Planning and Construction
(Calcasieu)
Payable from General Obligation Bonds
Priority 1 $ 100,000
Priority 5 $ 500,000
Total $ 600,000
Page 116 of 174

HB NO. 2 ENROLLED
50/MU6 VIVIAN
(576899) Streets and Drainage Improvements (Phase II),
Planning and Construction
(Caddo)
Payable from General Obligation Bonds
Priority 2 $ 200,000
Priority 5 $ 408,850
Total $ 608,850
(578839) Water and Wastewater System Improvements and
Extension, Planning and Construction
(Caddo)
Payable from General Obligation Bonds
Priority 1 $ 94,523
50/MU7 WALKER
(577688) Gas System Upgrades, Planning and Construction
(Livingston)
Payable from General Obligation Bonds
Priority 5 $ 3,600,000
Payable from the Capital Outlay Savings Fund $ 400,000
Total $ 4,000,000
(577689) Wastewater Treatment Plant Upgrades,
Planning and Construction
(Livingston)
Payable from General Obligation Bonds
Priority 2 $ 200,000
Priority 5 $ 1,800,000
Total $ 2,000,000
50/MV1 WELSH
(577986) Frontage Road Extension, Planning and Construction
(Jefferson Davis)
Payable from General Obligation Bonds
Priority 1 $ 1,000,000
Priority 2 $ 2,000,000
Priority 5 $ 1,145,000
Total $ 4,145,000
(577987) Replacement of Water Meters, Planning and Construction
(Jefferson Davis)
Payable from General Obligation Bonds
Priority 5 $ 675,000
(577988) Street Rehabilitation, Planning and Construction
(Jefferson Davis)
Payable from General Obligation Bonds
Priority 5 $ 675,000
Page 117 of 174

HB NO. 2 ENROLLED
50/MV2 WEST MONROE
(577517) Downtown Utilities Hardening and Improvements,
Phase 1, Planning and Construction
(Ouachita)
Payable from General Obligation Bonds
Priority 5 $ 555,000
Payable from the Capital Outlay Savings Fund $ 300,000
Total $ 855,000
(577518) Cotton Street Improvements and Sidewalks, Planning and
Construction
(Ouachita)
Payable from General Obligation Bonds
Priority 1 $ 350,000
Priority 5 $ 550,000
Total $ 900,000
(577520) Jersey Street Improvements, Planning and Construction
(Ouachita)
Payable from General Obligation Bonds
Priority 1 $ 350,000
(577712) Mid-City Drainage Improvements, Planning and
Construction
(Ouachita)
Payable from General Obligation Bonds
Priority 5 $ 3,300,000
50/MV3 WESTLAKE
(577615) Sewer Transport System Improvements, Planning and
Construction
(Calcasieu)
Payable from General Obligation Bonds
Priority 5 $ 3,300,000
(577618) City of Westlake Street Rehabilitation, Planning and
Construction
(Calcasieu)
Payable from General Obligation Bonds
Priority 5 $ 960,000
50/MV4 WESTWEGO
(577255) Water Tower, Line and Improvements, Water Meter
Replacement, Planning and Construction
(Jefferson)
Payable from General Obligation Bonds
Priority 2 $ 1,000,000
Priority 5 $ 1,000,000
Total $ 2,000,000
(577319) Riverboat Landing Phase III, Planning and Construction
(Jefferson)
Payable from General Obligation Bonds
Priority 2 $ 476,000
Priority 5 $ 4,000,000
Total $ 4,476,000
Page 118 of 174

HB NO. 2 ENROLLED
(577320) Wastewater Treatment Plant Improvements, Planning and
Construction
(Jefferson)
Payable from General Obligation Bonds
Priority 2 $ 1,000,000
Priority 5 $ 4,503,500
Total $ 5,503,500
(577322) Park Land and Improvements, Including Improvements to
Existing Parks and Land Acquisition, Planning and
Construction
(Jefferson)
Payable from General Obligation Bonds
Priority 1 $ 336,038
Priority 5 $ 1,000,000
Payable from the Balance of State General Fund (Direct)
Non-Recurring previously allocated under the authority
of Act 5 of 2024 for Fletcher Technical Community
College, Precision Agriculture Training Facility, Planning
and Construction
(Terrebonne) $ 1,000,000
Total $ 2,336,038
(577324) Sala Avenue Street and Infrastructure Improvements
(Jefferson)
Payable from General Obligation Bonds
Priority 1 $ 184,400
Priority 5 $ 850,000
Total $ 1,034,400
(577325) The WHARF, Planning, Construction, and Site Preparation
(Jefferson)
Payable from General Obligation Bonds
Priority 1 $ 2,502,867
Priority 5 $ 2,200,000
Total $ 4,702,867
(577326) Emergency Preparedness Building, Planning and
Construction
(Jefferson)
Payable from General Obligation Bonds
Priority 1 $ 24,975
50/MV5 WHITE CASTLE
(577796) Street and Drainage Improvements, Planning and
Construction
(Iberville)
Payable from General Obligation Bonds
Priority 5 $ 2,700,000
(578840) Training and Learning Center, Planning and Construction
(Iberville)
Payable from General Obligation Bonds
Priority 5 $ 1,000,000
Payable from the Capital Outlay Savings Fund $ 500,000
Total $ 1,500,000
Page 119 of 174

HB NO. 2 ENROLLED
50/MV7 WINNFIELD
(578207) South Winnfield Drainage Improvements - Phase 1,
Planning and Construction
(Winn)
Payable from General Obligation Bonds
Priority 1 $ 60,375
Priority 5 $ 600,000
Total $ 660,375
50/MV9 WISNER
(578437) Wastewater Treatment Plant Rehabilitation, Planning and
Construction
(Franklin)
Payable from General Obligation Bonds
Priority 1 $ 200,000
Priority 5 $ 1,250,000
Total $ 1,450,000
50/MW2 YOUNGSVILLE
(577210) Langlinais Road Extension, Planning and Construction
(Lafayette)
Payable from General Obligation Bonds
Priority 5 $ 5,580,000
(577212) Fortune Road Extension, Planning and Construction
(Lafayette)
Payable from General Obligation Bonds
Priority 1 $ 2,811,038
(577213) Highway 89 Improvements, Planning and Construction
(Lafayette)
Payable from General Obligation Bonds
Priority 1 $ 5,978,531
Priority 5 $ 12,945,515
Total $ 18,924,046
(577214) Highway 92 Improvements, Planning and Construction
(Lafayette)
Payable from General Obligation Bonds
Priority 5 $ 5,405,000
(577215) Highway 92/Prescott Boulevard Roundabout, Design,
Planning, and Construction
(Lafayette)
Payable from General Obligation Bonds
Priority 5 $ 2,614,000
(577216) Wastewater System Improvements, Planning and
Construction
(Lafayette)
Payable from General Obligation Bonds
Priority 5 $ 4,500,000
(578841) New Fire Station, Planning and Construction
(Lafayette)
Payable from General Obligation Bonds
Priority 5 $ 3,250,000
Page 120 of 174

HB NO. 2 ENROLLED
50/MW3 ZACHARY
(577199) New Fire Station, Planning and Construction
(East Baton Rouge)
Payable from General Obligation Bonds
Priority 5 $ 1,600,000
50/MW6 ST. GABRIEL
(578846) City Council Chambers - New Construction
(Iberville)
Payable from General Obligation Bonds
Priority 1 $ 496,214
50/MW8 CENTRAL
(577121) Wax Road, LA 3034, Extension, Planning and Construction
(East Baton Rouge)
Payable from General Obligation Bonds
Priority 2 $ 1,600,000
Priority 5 $ 1,600,000
Total $ 3,200,000
(578847) Administration Building
(East Baton Rouge)
Payable from General Obligation Bonds
Priority 1 $ 16,943
50/N03 AUDUBON NATURE INSTITUTE, INC.
(577439) Audubon Facility Renovations and Improvements: Audubon
Zoo, Planning and Construction
(Orleans)
Payable from General Obligation Bonds
Priority 1 $ 19,000,000
(578811) Aububon Facility Renovations and Improvements
Riverfront for All, Planning and Construction
(Orleans)
Payable from General Obligation Bonds
Priority 5 $ 23,800,000
50/N04 NEW ORLEANS MUSEUM OF ART
(578204) Future NOMA, Planning and Construction
(Orleans)
Payable from General Obligation Bonds
Priority 1 $ 500,000
Priority 5 $ 3,500,000
Total $ 4,000,000
50/N05 NEW ORLEANS EXHIBITION HALL AUTHORITY
(576996) Property Development Project
(Orleans)
Payable from General Obligation Bonds
Priority 1 $ 4,500,000
Priority 5 $ 21,000,000
Total $ 25,500,000
Page 121 of 174

HB NO. 2 ENROLLED
50/N13 CHENNAULT INTERNATIONAL AIRPORT
AUTHORITY
(577856) Firewater Pumphouse #3 and Infrastructure, Planning and
Construction
(Calcasieu)
Payable from General Obligation Bonds
Priority 5 $ 6,000,000
50/N18 IBERIA PARISH AIRPORT AUTHORITY
(577557) Acadiana Regional Airport Improvements, Planning and
Construction
(Iberia)
Payable from General Obligation Bonds
Priority 1 $ 17,372,651
Priority 5 $ 23,000,000
Total $ 40,372,651
50/N19 PAUL S. MORTON SCHOLARSHIP FOUNDATION
(577434) Paul S. Morton Scholarship Foundation Greater Works
Family Life Center, Planning and Construction
(Orleans)
Payable from General Obligation Bonds
Priority 5 $ 6,200,000
50/N33 ENGLAND ECONOMIC & INDUSTRIAL
DEVELOPMENT DISTRICT
(578387) High Bay Aircraft Maintenance Hangar, Planning and
Construction
(Rapides)
Payable from General Obligation Bonds
Priority 1 $ 1,713,915
Priority 5 $ 15,425,000
Total $ 17,138,915
50/N34 ODYSSEY HOUSE LOUISIANA, INC.
(577686) Odyssey House Louisiana Gambling Treatment Center,
Acquisition and Renovation
(Orleans)
Payable from General Obligation Bonds
Priority 5 $ 7,000,000
(577859) Odyssey House Louisiana Renovation Project, Planning and
Construction
(Orleans)
Payable from General Obligation Bonds
Priority 1 $ 4,871,958
Priority 5 $ 2,000,000
Total $ 6,871,958
Page 122 of 174

HB NO. 2 ENROLLED
50/N40 LAFAYETTE ECONOMIC DEVELOPMENT
AUTHORITY
(577863) Lafayette Innovation Center, Planning and Construction
(Lafayette)
Payable from General Obligation Bonds
Priority 1 $ 3,661,342
Priority 5 $ 5,000,000
Total $ 8,661,342
50/N41 BATON ROUGE METROPOLITAN AIRPORT
(578023) Airport Aviation Business Park, Planning and Construction
(East Baton Rouge)
Payable from General Obligation Bonds
Priority 1 $ 1,686,902
Priority 5 $ 4,750,000
Total $ 6,436,902
(578024) Relocation of LA 67 at LA 408 due to Airport
Improvements
(East Baton Rouge)
Payable from General Obligation Bonds
Priority 5 $ 80,000,000
50/N52 LAFAYETTE PARISH SHERIFF'S OFFICE
(577332) Law Enforcement Center, Planning and Construction
(Lafayette)
Payable from General Obligation Bonds
Priority 5 $ 46,500,000
(577333) Range Upgrades, Planning and Construction
(Lafayette)
Payable from General Obligation Bonds
Priority 5 $ 8,363,000
(577334) Crime Scene and Evidence Storage/Fitness Center, Planning
and Construction
(Lafayette)
Payable from General Obligation Bonds
Priority 1 $ 2,010,000
50/N53 ORLEANS PARISH COMMUNICATIONS DISTRICT
(577221) Orleans Parish Communications District Expansion Project,
Planning and Construction
(Orleans)
Payable from General Obligation Bonds
Priority 5 $ 33,600,000
50/N71 NORTH LAFOURCHE CONSERVATION LEVEE AND
DRAINAGE DISTRICT
(578028) Jessee Dufrene/Homeplace FDA, Phase II,
Levee Improvements, Planning and Construction
(Lafourche)
Payable from General Obligation Bonds
Priority 5 $ 5,500,000
Payable from the Capital Outlay Savings Fund $ 200,000
Total $ 5,700,000
Page 123 of 174

HB NO. 2 ENROLLED
(578029) Raceland Prairie Levee Improvements,
Planning and Construction
(Lafourche)
Payable from General Obligation Bonds
Priority 5 $ 4,975,000
Payable from the Capital Outlay Savings Fund $ 1,000,000
Total $ 5,975,000
50/N72 RIVER ROAD AFRICAN AMERICAN MUSEUM
(578726) River Road African American Museum, Planning and
Construction
(Ascension)
Payable from General Obligation Bonds
Priority 5 $ 1,500,000
Payable from the Capital Outlay Savings Fund $ 500,000
Total $ 2,000,000
50/N74 NATIONAL WORLD WAR II MUSEUM, INC.
(577514) Eight Projects under FP&C Management Plus Liberation
Pavilion: Bricks and Mortar, Exhibit Fabrication, Media
Production, Planning and Construction
(Orleans)
Payable from General Obligation Bonds
Priority 1 $ 10,255,333
Priority 5 $ 8,000,000
Total $ 18,255,333
50/N79 TANGIPAHOA PARISH FIRE DISTRICT 1
(578848) Bruce Cutrer Regional Fire Training Facility of Tangipahoa
Parish, Planning and Construction
(Tangipahoa)
Payable from General Obligation Bonds
Priority 1 $ 2,122,710
50/N93 NORTHEAST LOUISIANA RAILROAD
DEVELOPMENT DISTRICT
(576693) Northeast Louisiana Railroad Development District,
Planning and Construction
(Tensas)
Payable from General Obligation Bonds
Priority 1 $ 1,000,000
Priority 5 $ 9,000,000
Total $ 10,000,000
50/N99 AMITE RIVER BASIN COMMISSION
(577935) Upper Amite River Flood Risk Reduction and Restoration,
Planning and Construction
(East Baton Rouge, East Feliciana, Livingston, St. Helena)
Payable from General Obligation Bonds
Priority 1 $ 4,000,000
Priority 5 $ 63,000,000
Total $ 67,000,000
Page 124 of 174

HB NO. 2 ENROLLED
50/NA3 AVOYELLES PARISH AIRPORT AUTHORITY
(578670) Runway Extension Marksville Municipal Airport, Planning
and Construction
(Avoyelles)
Payable from General Obligation Bonds
Priority 5 $ 2,200,000
Payable from State General Fund (Direct) Non-Recurring
Revenues $ 240,000
Total $ 2,440,000
50/NAA POINTE COUPEE COUNCIL ON AGING
(577222) Senior Center, Planning and Construction
(Pointe Coupee)
Payable from General Obligation Bonds
Priority 1 $ 2,153,013
Priority 5 $ 1,000,000
Payable from State General Fund (Direct) Non-Recurring
Revenues $ 130,000
Total $ 3,283,013
50/NAD MU ZETA FOUNDATION, INC.
(578849) Expansion Project, Planning and Construction
(East Baton Rouge)
Payable from General Obligation Bonds
Priority 1 $ 175,769
50/NAJ EFFORTS OF GRACE, INC.
(578850) Ashe Too, Planning and Construction
(Orleans)
Payable from General Obligation Bonds
Priority 1 $ 45,000
50/NAV MADE IN AMERICA, INC.
(578803) Construction of a Small Business Incubator, Community
Health Clinic, and Workforce Training Center, Planning
and Construction
(Caddo)
Payable from General Obligation Bonds
Priority 1 $ 999,595
Priority 5 $ 9,000,000
Total $ 9,999,595
50/NAY OGDEN MUSUEM OF SOUTHERN ART
(578676) Ogden Museum of Southern Art Renovation, Planning
and Construction
(Orleans)
Payable from General Obligation Bonds
Priority 5 $ 21,315,000
Payable from State General Fund (Direct) Non-Recurring
Revenues $ 1,461,000
Total $ 22,776,000
Page 125 of 174

HB NO. 2 ENROLLED
50/NAZ HOSPICE OF ACADIANA FOUNDATION, INC.
(578851) Calcutta House, Planning and Construction
(Lafayette)
Payable from General Obligation Bonds
Priority 5 $ 600,000
50/NB1 CENTER FOR INNOVATIVE TRAINING OF YOUTH
(578763) STEM NOLA's Innovation Hub, Planning and Construction
(Orleans)
Payable from General Obligation Bonds
Priority 1 $ 500,000
Priority 5 $ 7,300,000
Total $ 7,800,000
50/NB3 MCKINLEY HIGH SCHOOL ALUMNI ASSOCIATION
(578620) McKinley Alumni Center in Baton Rouge- Major safety
repairs, system replacements, facility upgrades and
renovations, Planning and Construction
(East Baton Rouge)
Payable from the Capital Outlay Savings Fund $ 362,000
50/NB8 LEWISBURG BELLEVUE WATER SYSTEM
(577577) Community Water Distribution and Safety Infrastructure
Improvements Project, Planning and Construction
(St. Landry)
Payable from General Obligation Bonds
Priority 5 $ 1,680,000
(578852) Water System Meters Water Tower Refurbishment
Infrastructure, Planning and Construction
(St. Landry)
Payable from General Obligation Bonds
Priority 1 $ 950,000
50/NBF COMMUNITY RECEIVING HOME, INC.
(578853) Rapides Parish Juvenile Justice Complex, Planning and
Construction
(Rapides)
Payable from General Obligation Bonds
Priority 5 $ 25,300,000
50/NBJ JONESVILLE FIRE DISTRICT
(578715) New Fire Station at U.S. Hwy 84 and 3rd Street, Planning
and Construction
(Catahoula)
Payable from General Obligation Bonds
Priority 1 $ 800,000
Page 126 of 174

HB NO. 2 ENROLLED
50/NC2 BATON ROUGE RECREATION AND PARKS
COMMISSION
(577107) Baton Rouge Gallery, Contemporary Art Center at City
Park, Planning and Construction
(East Baton Rouge)
Payable from General Obligation Bonds
Priority 5 $ 10,000,000
50/NC3 ST. TAMMANY PARISH SHERIFF
(578585) Training Facility, Planning and Construction
(St. Tammany)
Payable from General Obligation Bonds
Priority 5 $ 18,000,000
50/NC4 BERWICK/BAYOU VISTA WATERWORKS
(579031) Renovations to Berwick/Bayou Vista Joint Water
Treatment Facility, Planning and Construction
(St. Mary)
Payable from General Obligation Bonds
Priority 2 $ 30,000
Priority 5 $ 270,000
Payable from the Capital Outlay Saving Fund $ 100,000
Total $ 400,000
50/NCF TECHE ACTION BOARD, INC.
(578475) Construction and Completion of New Health Center
Facility for Teche Action Clinic at Gramercy in Gramercy,
LA, Planning and Construction
(St. James)
Payable from General Obligation Bonds
Priority 5 $ 3,700,000
50/NCM FIFTH WARD RECREATION DISTRICT OF ST.
HELENA PARISH
(578256) Recreation District Baseball Fields, Planning and
Construction
(St. Helena)
Payable from General Obligation Bonds
Priority 1 $ 950,417
Priority 5 $ 1,000,000
Total $ 1,950,417
50/NCR LAFAYETTE PARISH WATERWORKS DISTRICT-
NORTH
(577463) Water Filtration Plant Construction
(Lafayette)
Payable from General Obligation Bonds
Priority 5 $ 6,475,000
Page 127 of 174

HB NO. 2 ENROLLED
50/ND3 ORLEANS PARISH SHERIFF'S OFFICE
(578806) OJC Plumbing Replacement, Planning and
Construction
(Orleans)
Payable from General Obligation Bonds
Priority 2 $ 500,000
50/ND5 LAFOURCHE PARISH WATER DISTRICT
(578941) Kraemer Water Line Upgrades, Planning and Construction
(Lafourche)
Payable from General Obligation Bonds
Priority 5 $ 1,500,000
50/ND8 BOSSIER PARISH SHERIFF
(578738) Regional Response Vehicle Driving Track,
Planning and Construction
(Bossier)
Payable from General Obligation Bonds
Priority 2 $ 594,500
Priority 5 $ 2,805,500
Total $ 3,400,000
50/ND9 NORTHEAST LOUISIANA CHILDREN'S MUSEUM
(578118) Northeast Louisiana Children's Museum Relocation,
Land Acquisition, Real Estate, Planning and Construction
(Ouachita)
Payable from General Obligation Bonds
Priority 5 $ 2,500,000
(578910) Northeast Louisiana Children's Museum, Planning and
Construction
(Ouachita)
Payable from General Obligation Bonds
Priority 5 $ 7,500,000
Payable from the Capital Outlay Savings Fund $ 500,000
Total $ 8,000,000
50/NDN OPPORTUNITIES INDUSTRIALIZATION CENTER
INCORPORATED OF OUACHITA
(578861) New Education Building, Planning and Construction
(Ouachita)
Payable from General Obligation Bonds
Priority 1 $ 1,231,775
50/NDQ TANGIPAHOA AFRICAN AMERICAN HERITAGE
MUSEUM AND VETERANS' ARCHIVES
(578862) Tangipahoa African American Heritage Museum Roof
Replacement, Planning and Construction
(Tangipahoa)
Payable from General Obligation Bonds
Priority 5 $ 540,000
Page 128 of 174

HB NO. 2 ENROLLED
50/NDX NEW ORLEANS COUNCIL ON AGING, INC.
(576701) New Orleans Council on Aging Office and Senior
Community Center, Planning, Purchase, and Renovation
of a Building and/or Acquire Land and Construct a New
Building
(Orleans)
Payable from General Obligation Bonds
Priority 1 $ 2,850,000
Payable from the Capital Outlay Savings Fund $ 500,000
Total $ 3,350,000
50/NDY JEFFERSON DAVIS WATER AND SEWER
DISTRICT COMMISSION #1
(577815) Water System Improvements, Planning and Construction
(Jefferson Davis)
Payable from General Obligation Bonds
Priority 1 $ 2,000,000
Priority 5 $ 4,200,000
Total $ 6,200,000
50/NE4 JEFFERSON PARISH CORONER'S OFFICE
(578612) Advanced Forensic Center Project, Planning and
Construction
(Jefferson)
Payable from General Obligation Bonds
Priority 5 $ 6,000,000
50/NEE BIOMEDICAL RESEARCH AND INNOVATION PARK
(577506) Biomedical Research and Innovation Park Building, Planning
and Construction
(Ouachita)
Payable from General Obligation Bonds
Priority 1 $ 8,290,798
Priority 2 $ 7,000,000
Priority 5 $ 9,900,000
Total $ 25,190,798
50/NER ST. HELENA PARISH HOSPITAL SERVICE
DISTRICT NO. 1
(577776) Hospital Renovation, Expansion, and Equipment
Replacement, Planning and Construction
(St. Helena)
Payable from General Obligation Bonds
Priority 1 $ 3,647,583
50/NEV HOSPITAL SERVICE DISTRICT 1 TERREBONNE
PARISH
(578942) Emergency Power System Replacement and Upgrade,
Planning and Construction
(Terrebonne)
Payable from General Obligation Bonds
Priority 5 $ 15,000,000
Payable from the Capital Outlay Savings Fund $ 800,000
Total $ 15,800,000
Page 129 of 174

HB NO. 2 ENROLLED
50/NEY ORLEANS PARISH HOSPITAL SERVICE
DISTRICT A
(578550) Parish Hospital Service District for the Parish of Orleans -
District A - Behavioral Health Service Line Expansion,
Planning and Construction
(Orleans)
Payable from General Obligation Bonds
Priority 1 $ 3,200,000
50/NF6 ST. MARTIN PARISH SHERIFF
(578699) Training Barracks and Records Retention Facility,
Planning and Construction
(St. Martin)
Payable from General Obligation Bonds
Priority 5 $ 3,300,000
50/NF7 ST. MARTIN SEWER AND WATER
(579032) Belle River Wastewater Treatment Plant,
Planning and Construction
(St. Martin)
Payable from General Obligation Bonds
Priority 2 $ 50,000
Priority 5 $ 450,000
Payable from the Capital Outlay Savings Fund $ 400,000
Total $ 900,000
50/NFE CAJUNDOME
(577522) Cajundome and Convention Center Indoor Air Quality
Improvements, Planning and Construction
(Lafayette)
Payable from General Obligation Bonds
Priority 1 $ 6,364,182
Provided, however, that $500,000 of the Priority 1 appropriation shall be used to fund the
Louisiana Basketball Coaches Association historical memorabilia project at the Cajundome.
50/NFJ H/A ALLIANCE
(579024) Open Health Care Clinic, Renovations to Airline
Hwy. Clinic Location, Planning and Construction
(East Baton Rouge)
Payable from General Obligation Bonds
Priority 2 $ 250,000
Priority 5 $ 2,750,000
Total $ 3,000,000
50/NFQ ALGIERS DEVELOPMENT DISTRICT
( ) West Bank Park Improvements Including New Soccer
and Recreational Facilities, Planning and Construction
(Orleans)
Payable from General Obligation Bonds
Priority 1 $ 2,678,389
Priority 5 $ 11,225,400
Total $ 13,903,789
Pending submittal and approval of a capital outlay budget request pursuant to the provisions
of R.S. 39:112.
Page 130 of 174

HB NO. 2 ENROLLED
50/NFX THE O.W. DILLON TRAINING AND COMMUNITY
DEVELOPMENT CENTER, INC.
(577949) The O.W. Dillon Training and Community Development
Center Building, Planning and Construction
(Tangipahoa)
Payable from General Obligation Bonds
Priority 1 $ 1,179,207
Priority 5 $ 4,500,000
Total $ 5,679,207
50/NFZ OUR LADY OF LOURDES REGIONAL MEDICAL
CENTER
(578687) Our Lady of Lourdes Regional Medical Center, Planning
and Construction
(Lafayette)
Payable from General Obligation Bonds
Priority 1 $ 4,500,000
Priority 5 $ 8,500,000
Total $ 13,000,000
50/NGG YWCA OF GREATER NEW ORLEANS
(579017) Construction Project, Planning and Construction
(Orleans)
Payable from General Obligation Bonds
Priority 5 $ 6,750,000
50/NGM NEW ORLEANS AFRICAN AMERICAN MUSEUM
OF ART, CULTURE AND HISTORY
(578943) New Orleans African American Museum of Art, Culture
and History: Renovation and New Construction
(Orleans)
Payable from General Obligation Bonds
Priority 1 $ 343,299
Priority 5 $ 4,000,000
Total $ 4,343,299
50/NGN LOUISIANA CHAMBER OF COMMERCE
FOUNDATION, INC.
(578972) Louisiana Chamber of Commerce's Business Innovation
Center, Planning and Construction
(Calcasieu)
Payable from General Obligation Bonds
Priority 1 $ 1,644,795
50/NGO MARY BIRD PERKINS CANCER CENTER
(578989) Securing the Future of Cancer Center in Ascension
Parish, Planning and Construction
(Ascension)
Payable from General Obligation Bonds
Priority 2 $ 500,000
Priority 5 $ 3,000,000
Total $ 3,500,000
Page 131 of 174

HB NO. 2 ENROLLED
50/NGQ THE STRAND THEATRE OF SHREVEPORT
CORPORATION
(577246) Repair and Renovation to the Strand Theatre of Shreveport
(Caddo)
Payable from General Obligation Bonds
Priority 5 $ 984,000
50/NH7 CEMETERY MAINTENANCE ZACHARY
(578864) Public Cemetery Maintenance, Planning and Construction
(East Baton Rouge)
Payable from General Obligation Bonds
Priority 5 $ 3,750,000
50/NHE ST. JAMES PARISH HOSPITAL
(578579) West Bank Health Clinic, Planning and Construction
(St. James)
Payable from General Obligation Bonds
Priority 1 $ 2,789,295
Priority 5 $ 7,900,000
Total $ 10,689,295
50/NHG LAFAYETTE CENTRE DEVELOPMENT DISTRICT
(578525) Downtown Lafayette Public Infrastructure Improvements and
Upgrades, Planning and Construction
(Lafayette)
Payable from General Obligation Bonds
Priority 1 $ 400,099
50/NI7 HOSPITAL SERVICE DISTRICT 1 IBERIA PARISH
DBA IBERIA MEDICAL CENTER
(578757) Addition of Medical, Surgical, and Psychiatric Inpatient
Rooms, Planning, Construction, and Equipment
(Iberia)
Payable from General Obligation Bonds
Priority 1 $ 7,149,828
50/NI9 ASCENSION-ST. JAMES AIRPORT AND
TRANSPORTATION AUTHORITY
(578031) Commercial Hangar Complex - Louisiana Regional
Airport, Gonzales, LA, Planning and Construction
(Ascension)
Payable from General Obligation Bonds
Priority 5 $ 1,000,000
(578865) Drinking Water, Fire Suppression, and ADA Compliance -
Louisiana Regional Airport, Gonzales, LA, Planning and
Construction
(Ascension)
Payable from General Obligation Bonds
Priority 1 $ 131,378
Page 132 of 174

HB NO. 2 ENROLLED
50/NJ1 NEW ORLEANS MILITARY AND MARITIME
ACADEMY
(576513) Campus Expansion Phase I - Development, Planning and
Construction
(Orleans)
Payable from General Obligation Bonds
Priority 5 $ 22,400,000
50/NJ6 WIL REACH ONE FOUNDATION
(578866) Center for High-Quality Early Learning in New Orleans,
Planning and Construction
(Orleans)
Payable from General Obligation Bonds
Priority 5 $ 1,000,000
Payable from the Capital Outlay Savings Fund $ 750,000
Total $ 1,750,000
50/NJL BASTION COMMUNITY OF RESILIENCE
(578869) Veterans Wellness Facility in New Orleans, Planning and
Construction
(Orleans)
Payable from General Obligation Bonds
Priority 1 $ 263,257
50/NKA ABBEVILLE GENERAL HOSPITAL
(578132) Expansion and Modernization of the Ambulatory Surgery
and Obstetrics/Delivery Departments, Planning and
Construction
(Vermilion)
Payable from General Obligation Bonds
Priority 1 $ 3,200,000
50/NKQ THIBODAUX REGIONAL HEALTH SYSTEM
(577225) Emergency Power System Replacement and Upgrade,
Planning and Construction
(Lafourche)
Payable from General Obligation Bonds
Priority 2 $ 4,300,000
Priority 5 $ 15,800,000
Total $ 20,100,000
50/NL1 BEAUREGARD PARISH WATER WORKS
DISTRICT #2
(577267) Booster Station Upgrades, Planning and Construction
(Beauregard)
Payable from General Obligation Bonds
Priority 1 $ 250,000
Priority 5 $ 830,000
Total $ 1,080,000
Page 133 of 174

HB NO. 2 ENROLLED
50/NLO OUR LADY OF THE ANGELS HOSPITAL
(577119) Medical Office Building, Planning and Construction
(Washington)
Payable from General Obligation Bonds
Priority 5 $ 4,400,000
50/NLT ST. TAMMANY PARISH HOSPITAL SERVICE DISTRICT
NO. 1 DBA ST. TAMMANY HEALTH SYSTEM
(577734) Parking Garage and Helipad, Planning and Construction
(St. Tammany)
Payable from General Obligation Bonds
Priority 5 $ 10,000,000
(578090) Exterior Hospital Building Hardening, Planning and
Construction
(St. Tammany)
Payable from General Obligation Bonds
Priority 5 $ 210,000
(578091) Roof and HVAC Replacements, Planning and
Construction
(St. Tammany)
Payable from General Obligation Bonds
Priority 5 $ 320,000
50/NLX LAKE CHARLES MEMORIAL HOSPITAL
(578700) Main Campus Mechanical Upgrades,
Planning and Construction
(Calcasieu)
Payable from General Obligation Bonds
Priority 2 $ 250,000
Priority 5 $ 750,000
Total $ 1,000,000
50/NM9 ANTIOCH BAPTIST CHURCH
(578284) Historic Restoration Project, Planning and Construction
(Caddo)
Payable from General Obligation Bonds
Priority 5 $ 2,000,000
50/NMB CALCASIEU PARISH WATER WORKS DISTRICT 1
(577287) Water Wells for Plants A and B, Planning and Construction
(Calcasieu)
Payable from General Obligation Bonds
Priority 5 $ 2,500,000
50/NMW BEAUREGARD PARISH SHERIFF
(577261) Emergency Operations Center, Planning and Construction
(Beauregard)
Payable from the Capital Outlay Savings Fund $ 600,000
Page 134 of 174

HB NO. 2 ENROLLED
50/NNK PIERRE PART BELLE RIVER MUSEUM
(577062) Pierre Part Belle River Museum, Planning and Construction
(Assumption)
Payable from General Obligation Bonds
Priority 5 $ 2,000,000
Payable from the Capital Outlay Savings Fund $ 250,000
Total $ 2,250,000
50/NNN CONSOLIDATED GRAVITY DRAINAGE DISTRICT NO. 1
(577284) Lateral W-3 Improvements, Planning and Construction
(Calcasieu)
Payable from General Obligation Bonds
Priority 5 $ 2,250,000
50/NNW BEAUREGARD PARISH WATERWORKS DISTRICT 3
(577270) Texas Eastern Road Water Line Replacement,
Planning and Construction
(Beauregard)
Payable from General Obligation Bonds
Priority 5 $ 1,060,000
Payable from the Capital Outlay Savings Fund $ 200,000
Total $ 1,260,000
50/NNX PLAQUEMINES PARISH SHERIFFS OFFICE
(579013) Detention Center Security Upgrade,
Planning and Construction
(Plaquemines)
Payable from the Capital Outlay Savings Fund $ 1,750,000
Pending submittal of a capital outlay budget request pursuant to the provisions of R.S.
39:112.
50/NP1 ACADIANA CRIMINALISTICS LABORATORY
DISTRICT
(577611) New Crime Laboratory, Planning, Design, Construction,
and Equipment
(Iberia)
Payable from General Obligation Bonds
Priority 1 $ 75,371
50/NPB FRIENDS OF CROWVILLE
(576997) Community Center Improvements, Planning and
Construction
(Franklin)
Payable from General Obligation Bonds
Priority 5 $ 565,000
Payable from State General Fund (Direct) Non-Recurring
Revenues $ 100,000
Payable from the Capital Outlay Savings Fund $ 1,235,000
Total $ 1,900,000
Page 135 of 174

HB NO. 2 ENROLLED
50/NPD IBERIA ECONOMIC DEVELOPMENT AUTHORITY
(577447) Progress Point Business Park and Airport Gateway, Land
Acquisition, Planning and Construction
(Iberia)
Payable from General Obligation Bonds
Priority 1 $ 5,003,402
Priority 2 $ 1,200,000
Priority 5 $ 1,600,000
Total $ 7,803,402
50/NPE THE LOUISIANA MUSIC AND HERITAGE
EXPERIENCE, INC.
(578441) The Louisiana Music and Heritage Experience, Inc.,
Planning and Construction
(Orleans)
Payable from General Obligation Bonds
Priority 5 $ 25,000,000
50/NQ2 GRAVITY DRAINAGE DISTRICT 6 CALCASIEU
PARISH
(577285) Buxton Creek Drainage Improvements, Planning and
Construction
(Calcasieu)
Payable from General Obligation Bonds
Priority 1 $ 4,100,000
Priority 5 $ 2,000,000
Total $ 6,100,000
50/NQG LAFAYETTE METROPOLITAN EXPRESSWAY
COMMISSION
(576584) Lafayette Loop Project, Planning and Construction
(Lafayette)
Payable from General Obligation Bonds
Priority 5 $ 2,500,000
50/NQN LSU REAL ESTATE AND FACILITIES FOUNDATION
(578734) University Lakes Restoration Project to Address Flood
Control, Environmental, Safety, Health and Other Issues
(Matching Funds)
(East Baton Rouge)
Payable from General Obligation Bonds
Priority 1 $ 18,292,437
Priority 5 $ 5,000,000
Payable from State General Fund (Direct) Non-Recurring
Revenues $ 2,000,000
Total $ 25,292,437
50/NQV BEAUREGARD WATERWORKS DISTRICT #6
(577282) Water System Improvements, Planning and Construction
(Beauregard)
Payable from General Obligation Bonds
Priority 5 $ 1,000,000
Page 136 of 174

HB NO. 2 ENROLLED
50/NR7 COMMCARE CORPORATION
(577093) Wynhoven Health Care Expansion, including St. Andrew's
Village, Planning and Construction
(Jefferson)
Payable from General Obligation Bonds
Priority 1 $ 5,427,716
Priority 5 $ 3,999,500
Total $ 9,427,216
50/NRD SOUTH BEAUREGARD RECREATION DISTRICT NO. 2 OF WARDS
4 AND 6
(577790) Multi-Purpose Recreation Facilities Improvements,
Planning and Construction
(Beauregard)
Payable from General Obligation Bonds
Priority 5 $ 1,800,000
50/NRU EAST BATON ROUGE COUNCIL ON AGING
(578527) Lotus Village at the Lakes Senior Community, Planning,
Development and Construction
(East Baton Rouge)
Payable from General Obligation Bonds
Priority 2 $ 1,000,000
Priority 5 $ 7,684,000
Total $ 8,684,000
(578643) Lotus Village Phase II (Acquisition, Planning,
Rehabilitation, and Construction)
(East Baton Rouge)
Payable from General Obligation Bonds
Priority 2 $ 1,550,000
Priority 5 $ 1,550,000
Total $ 3,100,000
50/NS7 HABITAT NOLA
(578686) Rising Oaks - Infrastructure for Housing Phase II and III,
Planning and Construction
(Jefferson)
Payable from General Obligation Bonds
Priority 2 $ 500,000
Priority 5 $ 2,500,000
Total $ 3,000,000
50/NSP EDEN HOUSE
(577102) Emergency Housing and Services for Human Trafficking
Survivors
(Orleans)
Payable from General Obligation Bonds
Priority 5 $ 11,000,000
Payable from State General Fund (Direct) Non-Recurring
Revenues $ 3,000,000
Total $ 14,000,000
Page 137 of 174

HB NO. 2 ENROLLED
(578870) New Orleans Emergency Shelter, Planning and Construction
(Orleans)
Payable from General Obligation Bonds
Priority 1 $ 850,000
50/NST DOWNTOWN DEVELOPMENT DISTRICT NEW
ORLEANS
(578945) Harmony Circle, Planning and Construction
(Orleans)
Payable from General Obligation Bonds
Priority 5 $ 4,000,000
50/NT7 CITIZENS MEDICAL CENTER
(577294) Expansion of Emergency Department, ICU, and Imaging,
Planning, Design, and Construction
(Caldwell)
Payable from General Obligation Bonds
Priority 1 $ 2,500,000
Priority 2 $ 2,000,000
Priority 5 $ 11,900,000
Payable from the Capital Outlay Savings Fund $ 2,000,000
Total $ 18,400,000
50/NTA EAST CARROLL PARISH SHERIFF'S OFFICE
(578128) Training and Recreation Center, Planning and Construction
(East Carroll)
Payable from General Obligation Bonds
Priority 1 $ 3,000,000
Priority 5 $ 9,000,000
Total $ 12,000,000
50/NU2 LOUISIANA ENDOWMENT FOR THE HUMANITIES
(577733) Critical Repairs and Restoration of Historic Turners Hall,
Planning and Construction
(Orleans)
Payable from General Obligation Bonds
Priority 5 $ 2,000,000
50/NU9 9TH WARD STADIUM, INC.
(578871) Multi-Sport Venue in Eastern New Orleans and Lower
Ninth Ward, Planning and Construction
(Orleans)
Payable from General Obligation Bonds
Priority 1 $ 3,314,617
Priority 2 $ 700,000
Total $ 4,014,617
50/NUQ LOUISIANA HIBERNIAN CHARITY
(578872) Four Acre Irish Heritage Park in the Lakeview
Neighborhood, Planning and Construction
(Orleans)
Payable from General Obligation Bonds
Priority 1 $ 183,522
Page 138 of 174

HB NO. 2 ENROLLED
50/NV1 POLLOCK AREA WATER SYSTEM, INC.
(578467) Water Production System Improvements, Planning
and Construction
(Grant)
Payable from General Obligation Bonds
Priority 5 $ 510,000
Payable from the balance of the Capital Outlay Savings
Fund previously allocated under the authority of Act 465
of 2023 for South Grant Water Corporation, Water
Production System Improvements, East Well #2,
Planning and Construction (Grant) $ 390,000
Total $ 900,000
50/NVK UNION GENERAL HOSPITAL
(577631) CT Scanner Replacement and Diagnostic Image
Enhancement Project, Planning and Construction
(Union)
Payable from the Capital Outlay Savings Fund $ 500,000
50/NVY WASHINGTON PARISH HOSPITAL SERVICE
DISTRICT NO. 1
(577755) Emergency Upgrades including Power Generation System
Upgrade, Mechanical Systems, and Roofing, Planning and
Construction
(Washington)
Payable from General Obligation Bonds
Priority 1 $ 347,498
Priority 5 $ 3,100,000
Payable from the Capital Outlay Savings Fund $ 500,000
Total $ 3,947,498
50/NWG CHILDREN'S ADVOCACY NETWORK, INC.
(578388) Children's Advocacy Network Campus, Planning and
Construction
(Rapides)
Payable from General Obligation Bonds
Priority 5 $ 2,000,000
50/NWO AIRPORT DISTRICT 1 OF CALCASIEU PARISH
(578414) Airport Entrance and Access Road Improvements and
Marquee, Planning and Construction
(Calcasieu)
Payable from General Obligation Bonds
Priority 1 $ 1,000,000
50/NWR LOUISIANA SWAMP BASE, INC.
(577226) Camp Atchafalaya Swamp Base, Planning, Design, and
Construction
(St. Martin)
Payable from General Obligation Bonds
Priority 1 $ 470,858
Priority 5 $ 9,000,000
Total $ 9,470,858
Page 139 of 174

HB NO. 2 ENROLLED
50/NWS LAFAYETTE CENTRAL PARK, INC.
(577227) Lafayette Central Park Improvements, Planning and
Construction
(Lafayette)
Payable from General Obligation Bonds
Priority 1 $ 500,000
Priority 5 $ 5,137,000
Total $ 5,637,000
50/NWT CENTRAL ST. LANDRY ECONOMIC DEVELOPMENT
DISTRICT
(577836) Harry Guilbeau Road (LA 3233) Wastewater Improvements-
Central St. Landry Economic Development District
(CSLEDD), Planning and Construction
(St. Landry)
Payable from General Obligation Bonds
Priority 5 $ 9,000,000
50/NXI HEBERT WATER SYSTEM, INC.
(577621) Water System Improvements, Planning and Construction
(Caldwell)
Payable from General Obligation Bonds
Priority 1 $ 1,213,583
Priority 5 $ 1,500,000
Payable from State General Fund (Direct) Non-Recurring
Revenues $ 1,000,000
Total $ 3,713,583
50/NXS BATON ROUGE GENERAL MEDICAL CENTER
(577538) EmPATH Unit Implementation at Baton Rouge General
Mid City, Planning and Construction
(East Baton Rouge)
Payable from General Obligation Bonds
Priority 5 $ 1,200,000
Payable from the Capital Outlay Savings Fund $ 1,000,000
Total $ 2,200,000
50/NXT THE 18TH WARD
(578596) Hollygrove Community Center Renovation, Planning and
Construction
(Orleans)
Payable from State General Fund (Direct) Non-Recurring
Revenues $ 65,000
Payable from the Capital Outlay Savings Fund $ 30,000
Total $ 95,000
50/NYJ ALLEN PARISH HOSPITAL
(578498) Allen Parish Hospital - Phase 1 Build Out, Planning
and Construction
(Allen)
Payable from General Obligation Bonds
Priority 5 $ 5,200,000
Payable from the Capital Outlay Savings Fund $ 200,000
Total $ 5,400,000
Page 140 of 174

HB NO. 2 ENROLLED
50/NYP SECOND HARVEST FOOD BANK OF GREATER
NEW ORLEANS AND ACADIANA
(578873) Roof Replacement and HVAC Installation, Planning and
Construction
(Jefferson)
Payable from General Obligation Bonds
Priority 1 $ 352,888
50/NYS HOLY ROSARY REDEVELOPMENT
(578664) Holy Rosary Institute, Planning, Construction, and
Restoration
(Lafayette)
Payable from General Obligation Bonds
Priority 1 $ 3,518,859
Priority 2 $ 1,000,000
Priority 5 $ 4,200,000
Total $ 8,718,859
50/NZ3 BEAUREGARD MEMORIAL HOSPITAL
(578874) Emergency Department Addition and Renovation and
Women's Center Renovation, Planning and Construction
(Beauregard)
Payable from General Obligation Bonds
Priority 5 $ 2,700,000
50/NZB LIVINGSTON PARISH AIRPORT DISTRICT
(578448) Livingston Executive Airport, Planning and Construction
(Livingston)
Payable from General Obligation Bonds
Priority 1 $ 5,678,820
Priority 5 $ 4,650,000
Total $ 10,328,820
50/NZX WEST CALCASIEU CAMERON HOSPITAL
(578768) West Calcasieu Cameron Hospital Medical Office Building,
Planning and Construction
(Calcasieu)
Payable from General Obligation Bonds
Priority 1 $ 264,063
Priority 5 $ 4,022,000
Total $ 4,286,063
50/R05 INDUSTRIAL DEVELOPMENT BOARD OF
LAFOURCHE
(577880) Lockport Marine Manufacturing Electrical Utility
Modernization Project, Planning and Construction
(Lafourche)
Payable from General Obligation Bonds
Priority 1 $ 13,000,000
Page 141 of 174

HB NO. 2 ENROLLED
50/R11 TANGIPAHOA PARISH SHERIFF
(578722) Multipurpose Facility, Planning and Construction
(Tangipahoa)
Payable from the balance of General
Obligation Bond Proceeds previously allocated
under the authority of Act 465 of 2023 for
St. James Parish, Storm Damage Repair to Dock
on Blind River, Planning and Construction
(St. James) $ 248,989
Payable from the balance of General
Obligation Bond Proceeds previously allocated
under the authority of Act 2 of 2020 for
Cajundome HVAC Pneumatic Systems,
Renovations and Replacements
(Lafayette) $ 52,733
Payable from the Capital Outlay
Savings Fund $ 1,000,000
Total $ 1,301,722
50/R12 WATSON MEMORIAL SPIRIT TEMPLE
(578630) Watt Algiers Memorial Spirit Temple,
Planning and Construction
(Orleans)
Payable from General Obligation Bonds
Priority 5 $ 5,850,000
Payable from the Capital Outlay Savings Fund $ 650,000
Total $ 6,500,000
50/R21 SMILEY XTREME MEASURES, INC.
(578485) Reconstruction of a Building for Mixed Use,
Commercial and Housing Rental, Planning and Construction
(Caddo)
Payable from the Capital Outlay Savings Fund $ 217,000
50/R26 HIGHLAND CENTER CORPORATION
(578706) Community Center Accessibility, Planning and Construction
(Caddo)
Payable from the Capital Outlay Savings Fund $ 100,000
50/R27 KEMPER AND LEILA WILLIAMS FOUNDATION
(578420) The Historic New Orleans Collection Emergency
Readiness and Facility Repairs, Planning
and Construction
(Orleans)
Payable from General Obligation Bonds
Priority 2 $ 250,000
Priority 5 $ 4,250,000
Total $ 4,500,000
Page 142 of 174

HB NO. 2 ENROLLED
50/R28 AVOYELLES PARISH WATERWORKS DISTRICT 1
(577737) Water Distribution System, Planning and Construction
(Avoyelles)
Payable from General Obligation Bonds
Priority 5 $ 1,750,000
Payable from State General Fund (Direct) $ 400,000
Total $ 2,150,000
50/R31 NORTHSHORE CHARTER SCHOOLS
(578377) New School Campus Project, Planning and Construction
(Washington)
Payable from General Obligation Bonds
Priority 5 $ 12,500,000
Payable from the Capital Outlay Savings Fund $ 500,000
Total $ 13,000,000
50/R36 JEFFERSON DAVIS WATER DISTRICT 4
(577903) Potable Water Supply Improvements, Planning and
Construction
(Jefferson Davis)
Payable from General Obligation Bonds
Priority 5 $ 1,640,000
Payable from the Capital Outlay Savings Fund $ 100,000
Total $ 1,740,000
50/R37 PEOPLE'S HOUSING + INC.
(578751) LaSalle Street Resilience Hub, Planning and Construction
(Orleans)
Payable from General Obligation Bonds
Priority 2 $ 100,000
Priority 5 $ 900,000
Total $ 1,000,000
50/R49 A GOOD DEED FOUNDATION
(577881) North Baton Rouge Food Access and Community
Development, Planning and Construction
(East Baton Rouge)
Payable from General Obligation Bonds
Priority 2 $ 1,000,000
Priority 5 $ 16,200,000
Payable from the Capital Outlay Savings Fund $ 800,000
Total $ 18,000,000
50/R54 HOSPITAL SERVICE DISTRICT NO. 1 EAST BATON ROUGE
(578597) Da Vinci 5 Surgical Robot System,
Planning and Construction
(East Baton Rouge)
Payable from General Obligation Bonds
Priority 2 $ 625,000
Priority 5 $ 1,875,000
Total $ 2,500,000
Page 143 of 174

HB NO. 2 ENROLLED
(578599) Behavioral Health Outpatient Clinic,
Planning and Construction
(East Baton Rouge)
Payable from General Obligation Bonds
Priority 2 $ 250,000
Priority 5 $ 750,000
Total $ 1,000,000
(578601) Obstetrics - Gynecology Clinic Major Renovation
and Expansion, Planning and Construction
(East Baton Rouge)
Payable from General Obligation Bonds
Priority 2 $ 170,000
Priority 5 $ 1,530,000
Total $ 1,700,000
50/R56 WASHINGTON PARISH SHERIFF'S OFFICE
(578666) Emergency Operations Center and Jail,
Planning and Construction
(Washington)
Payable from General Obligation Bonds
Priority 5 $ 27,000,000
Payable from the Capital Outlay Savings Fund $ 500,000
Total $ 27,500,000
50/R57 ULL ECONOMIC DEVELOPMENT
(577528) LA Hub Complex Development, Planning
and Construction
(Lafayette)
Payable from General Obligation Bonds
Priority 5 $ 10,000,000
50/R58 HARBOR CENTER DISTRICT
(578468) Replacement of HVAC Duct Work and Exterior
Doors/Frame Extensive Repair to Exterior EIFS
Wall and Framing, and Purchase of Chairs for
Newly Built Meeting/Event Space,
Planning and Construction
(St. Tammany)
Payable from the Capital Outlay Savings Fund $ 500,000
50/R66 GIVING HOPE, INC.
(578364) Food Pantry and Resource Center
of Jefferson Parish, Planning and Construction
(Jefferson)
Payable from General Obligation Bonds
Priority 5 $ 3,775,000
Payable from the Capital Outlay Savings Fund $ 425,000
Total $ 4,200,000
Page 144 of 174

HB NO. 2 ENROLLED
50/R72 NATCHITOCHES PARISH HOSPITAL SERVICE DISTRICT 1
(578644) Healthcare Infrastructure Investment: NRMC
Ambulatory Tower, Planning and Construction
(Natchitoches)
Payable from General Obligation Bonds
Priority 5 $ 16,600,000
Payable from State General Fund (Direct) $ 1,000,000
Payable from the Capital Outlay Savings Fund $ 2,000,000
Total $ 19,600,000
50/R75 CAMERON GRAVITY DRAINAGE DISTRICT #9
(578111) Schoolhouse Marsh Control Structure,
Planning and Construction
(Cameron)
Payable from General Obligation Bonds
Priority 2 $ 250,000
Priority 5 $ 1,615,160
Payable from the Capital Outlay Savings Fund $ 50,000
Total $ 1,915,160
50/R78 PROJECT 70805, INC
(578765) Ghost Kitchen Redevelopment at Former Ace
Cleaners (2504 Scenic Highway) including
Planning, Land Acquisition, Brownfield
Remediation, Design Development, Permitting,
Construction and Equipment
(East Baton Rouge)
Payable from General Obligation Bonds
Priority 5 $ 2,000,000
50/R80 COMMUNITY POWER SOUTH
(578355) Williams Memorial CME Temple - Resilience Hub,
Planning and Construction
(Caddo)
Payable from the Capital Outlay Savings Fund $ 225,000
(578356) Cedar Grove Friendship House - Resilience Hub,
Planning and Construction
(Caddo)
Payable from the Capital Outlay Savings Fund $ 250,000
(578360) Mt. Olive Baptist Church Resilience Hub,
Planning and Construction
(Calcasieu)
Payable from Capital Outlay Savings Fund $ 200,000
50/R87 LAFAYETTE PARISH WATERWORKS DISTRICT SOUTH
(578608) Water System Improvements, Planning and
Construction
(Lafayette)
Payable from General Obligation Bonds
Priority 5 $ 1,100,000
Payable from the Capital Outlay Savings Fund $ 500,000
Total $ 1,600,000
Page 145 of 174

HB NO. 2 ENROLLED
50/R92 START CORPORATION
(578731) Community Health Center French Quarter Parking,
Planning and Construction
(Orleans)
Payable from General Obligation Bonds
Priority 5 $ 3,000,000
Payable from the Capital Outlay Savings Fund $ 500,000
Total $ 3,500,000
50/RA7 MAGNOLIA COMMUNITY SERVICES
(578974) Whitehall Renovation and Upgrades - Magnolia
Community Services, Planning and Construction
(Jefferson)
Payable from the Capital Outlay Savings Fund $ 2,390,000
Pending submittal and approval of a capital outlay budget request pursuant to the provisions
of R.S. 39:112.
50/RA9 WATT VILLAS
(578994) Watt Villas, Planning and Construction
(Orleans)
Payable from General Obligation Bonds
Priority 1 $ 300,000
Priority 5 $ 2,700,000
Total $ 3,000,000
50/RB1 VOLUNTEERS OF AMERICA OF SOUTHEAST LOUISIANA
(579019) Integrated Health Care Hub Adjacent to
BioDistrict New Orleans, Planning and Construction
(Orleans)
Payable from General Obligation Bonds
Priority 2 $ 550,000
Priority 5 $ 6,000,000
Total $ 6,550,000
50/S10 CALCASIEU PARISH SCHOOL BOARD
(578372) Moss Bluff Elementary - Student Carpool Improvements-
Calcasieu Parish School Board, Planning and
Construction
(Calcasieu)
Payable from the Capital Outlay Savings Fund $ 900,000
(578761) Renovations to Lake Charles Boston Stadium, Planning and
Construction
(Calcasieu)
Payable from General Obligation Bonds
Priority 1 $ 167,000
Priority 5 $ 823,000
Total $ 990,000
Page 146 of 174

HB NO. 2 ENROLLED
50/S16 DESOTO PARISH SCHOOL BOARD
(578714) DeSoto Parish School Board - North DeSoto Turning Lane,
Planning and Construction
(DeSoto)
Payable from State General Fund (Direct) Non-Recurring
Revenues $ 113,000
Payable from the Capital Outlay Savings Fund $ 900,000
Total $ 1,013,000
50/S26 JEFFERSON PARISH SCHOOL BOARD
(578528) Bridge/Crossing to Access Airline Highway (Bunche
Elementary Airline Crossing), Planning and Construction
(Jefferson)
Payable from the Capital Outlay Savings Fund $ 200,000
50/S32 LIVINGSTON PARISH SCHOOL BOARD
(578678) Arts and Multipurpose Facility, Planning and Construction
(Livingston)
Payable from General Obligation Bonds
Priority 2 $ 735,000
50/S39 POINTE COUPEE PARISH SCHOOL BOARD
(578875) Pointe Coupee Parish School Board Office Relocation,
to be Located at 8777 Morganza Highway, Formerly
Labarre Elementary School Site, Due to Flooding Caused
by Hurricane Gustav, Planning and Construction
(Pointe Coupee)
Payable from General Obligation Bonds
Priority 1 $ 4,153,560
Priority 5 $ 2,000,000
Total $ 6,153,560
50/S59 WASHINGTON PARISH SCHOOL BOARD
(577539) Thomas Elementary School Cafeteria Expansion and
Classroom Building, Planning and Construction
(Washington)
Payable from General Obligation Bonds
Priority 5 $ 6,000,000
Payable from the Capital Outlay Savings Fund $ 500,000
Total $ 6,500,000
50/S63 WEST FELICIANA PARISH SCHOOL BOARD
(578876) Julius Freyhan Cultural/Conference Center, Planning and
Construction
(West Feliciana)
Payable from General Obligation Bonds
Priority 1 $ 20,139
Page 147 of 174

HB NO. 2 ENROLLED
50/S67 CENTRAL COMMUNITY SCHOOL SYSTEM
(578049) Central City Community Sports Complex Infrastructure,
and School Board Administration Building and Meeting
Room, Planning and Construction
(East Baton Rouge)
Payable from General Obligation Bonds
Priority 5 $ 2,000,000
( ) Central Community School System Multi-Use
Activity Center, Recreational Facility, Planning
and Construction
(East Baton Rouge)
Payable from General Obligation Bonds
Priority 2 $ 3,600,000
Priority 5 $ 9,800,000
Payable from the Capital Outlay Savings Fund $ 1,200,000
Total $ 14,600,000
Pending submittal of a capital outlay budget request pursuant to the provisions of R.S.
39:112.
(B) Notwithstanding the provisions of R.S. 39:101, 102, and 112(C), projects
included in Section 1(A) of this Act which did not submit a capital outlay application by
November 1, 2025, in compliance with the provisions of R.S. 39:101 and 102 and which
have not received late approval as required by R.S. 39:112(C) are hereby deemed to have
until June 5, 2026, to submit a capital outlay budget request application pursuant to R.S.
39:101(A), and if the application is submitted by that date, the project is deemed to have
complied with the late approval requirements of R.S. 39:112(C). Additionally, the capital
outlay budget requests together with supporting information and documents for these
projects shall constitute the feasibility study required by Article VII, Section 11(C) of the
Constitution of Louisiana.
(C) Appropriated Debt Projects. The projects in this Section are to be funded
through the sale of bonds and secured by or payable from state appropriation.
01/107 DIVISION OF ADMINISTRATION
(578324) Purchase and Renovation of Buildings Statewide
(Statewide)
Payable from Revenue Bonds $ 125,000,000
Notwithstanding anything contained in this Capital Outlay Act, or any previous
Capital Outlay Act to the contrary, or any other provision of law, the Division of
Administration may finance the design, construction, furnishing and equipping of facilities
through the issuance of revenue bonds by the Office Facilities Corporation to be secured by
Page 148 of 174

HB NO. 2 ENROLLED
and payable from State appropriations. The issuance of such revenue bonds shall require the
approval of the State Bond Commission.
Section 2. The expenditure of funds appropriated in this Act shall be in
conformity to all existing statutes relative to public bidding, contractual review, and R.S.
39:101 through 128 and any other statutes affecting the capital outlay program for state
government, state institutions, and political entities.
Section 3. Payment for projects specified in this Act must be made by warrant
submitted to the division of administration, Department of Transportation and Development,
the state treasurer or other administering agency as provided in Section 8, whichever is
appropriate, only to the extent of funds required for immediate payment. Copies of invoices
or other supporting documentation shall be submitted with warrants. In the event that any
equipment included in this Act, is procured pursuant to the provisions of the State Lease-
Purchase Act, R.S. 39:1761 et seq., the amounts included in this Act for each such piece of
equipment shall not be appropriated. The provisions of R.S. 39:1771 which require
equipment to be leased under the State Lease-Purchase Act to be included in the executive
budget and approved by the legislature through inclusion in the General Appropriation Act
shall be considered waived upon the inclusion of such equipment in this Act. Projects
contained in this Act may, at the direction of the division of administration and with the
approval of the State Bond Commission, alternatively be funded through financing programs
heretofore or hereafter provided by a public trust and public corporation duly organized
pursuant to R.S. 9:2341 et seq., having for its beneficiary the state and the Louisiana Local
Government Environmental Facilities and Community Development Authority, pursuant to
R.S. 33:4548.1 et seq.
Section 4. If at any time during the Fiscal Year 2026-2027, the governor should
find, or the Joint Legislative Committee on the Budget or the commissioner of
administration should report to the governor, that the receipts of the treasury are falling short
or appear likely to fall short of the revenue estimates for the fiscal year and that a cash
deficit is likely to be incurred, the governor shall take such steps as deemed necessary to
prevent the occurrence of a cash deficit. In the event that a capital outlay project funded in
this Act falls under an agency which is abolished or for which funds are not appropriated in
the 2026-2027 General Appropriation Act, then the funds appropriated in this Act for such
Page 149 of 174

HB NO. 2 ENROLLED
capital outlay projects shall not be expended unless deemed necessary by the governor to
protect life or property. In the event that legislation is enacted which transfers facilities or
programs for which projects are funded in this Act, on behalf of one agency, institution,
department, or management board to another agency, institution, department, or management
board, then the projects in this Act shall be deemed transferred also.
Section 5. All monies appropriated by this Act and any applicable funds of a
prior capital outlay budget act adopted by the legislature shall be deposited by the state
treasurer in the Comprehensive Capital Outlay Escrow Account, established by this Section,
in the state treasury. In accordance with R.S. 36:764, no later than sixty days following the
end of each quarter, the state treasurer shall report to the Joint Legislative Committee on the
Budget and the commissioner of administration, all funds contained in the Miscellaneous
Fund of the Comprehensive Capital Outlay Escrow Account. Notwithstanding any
provisions contained herein or other law to the contrary, any original issue premium or
accrued interest proceeds received pursuant to the sale of general obligation bonds shall
remain on deposit to the credit of the Bond Security and Redemption Fund until such time
as they may be utilized in accordance with U.S. Department of the Treasury Regulations
promulgated pursuant to the Internal Revenue Code of 1986. All such monies shall be
administered according to the particular act pertaining to the fiscal year in which such
monies were appropriated. If it is determined by the director of the Office of Facility
Planning and Control, Division of Administration, that the funds appropriated by this Act
or any prior capital outlay budget Act are not sufficient to complete the projects contained
in any capital outlay budget Act, through unavoidable deficiencies in appropriation,
including administrative and legal requirements, the commissioner of administration, subject
to approval of the Joint Legislative Committee on the Budget, may direct the use of interest
earned from the investment of general obligation bond or note proceeds in the
Comprehensive Capital Outlay Escrow Account, not to exceed an aggregate of five million
dollars in any one fiscal year, for the purpose of completing the projects contained in any
capital outlay budget Act and such money shall be deemed appropriated in specific amounts
necessary for such purpose. All appropriations in this Act which are made as additions to
funds for previously authorized projects shall be included, for accounting purposes, in the
account of the previously authorized projects. If it is determined by the director of the Office
Page 150 of 174

HB NO. 2 ENROLLED
of Facility Planning and Control, Division of Administration, that it is cost effective and
practical to combine individual appropriations, the commissioner of administration, subject
to the approval of the Joint Legislative Committee on the Budget, may direct that two or
more appropriations or parts thereof may be combined into a single project for accounting
and audit purposes. The commissioner of administration may direct that funding in the
various statewide and/or multiple parish projects for improvements for state facilities may
be transferred to any project, in this Act or any previFus Capital Outlay Act, which require
supplemental funding for improvements for state facilities which qualify for funding through
the various statewide and/or multiple parish projects for improvements for state facilities.
The Office of Facility Planning and Control, Division of Administration is authorized to
receive settlements and vendor rebates and to add a portion or all of these receipts to the
existing project funds relating to the settlement and/or vendor rebates and appropriated in
this Act or any previous Capital Outlay Act including those previously appropriated funds
that become unavailable. Approval of the Joint Legislative Committee on the Budget will
be obtained if the settlement and/or vendor rebates will be added to any projects in this Act
or any previous Capital Outlay Act which are unrelated to the project from which the
settlement and/or vendor rebates were received. The Office of Facility Planning and Control,
Division of Administration is authorized to receive insurance payments and are hereby
authorized to immediately repair facilities that suffer insurance losses without those projects
being included in the Act and shall report to the Joint Legislative Committee on the Budget
any expenditures from insurance funds received pursuant to this section. A portion, as
determined by the commissioner of administration and not to exceed one percent (1%), of
the funding for projects which qualify for the Percent for Art Program and not to exceed
$450,000 for an individual, qualifying project, may be transferred from the qualifying
project budgets, to the Department of Culture, Recreation and Tourism for costs of acquiring
art and administering the program. For all Percent for Art Program projects in this or any
previous capital outlay, up to ten percent (10%) of the aforementioned one percent (1%) may
be used for the costs of administering the projects.
Section 6. No later than February 1, 2027, agencies administering capital outlay
projects will submit reports identifying completed projects and cash balances to the Joint
Page 151 of 174

HB NO. 2 ENROLLED
Legislative Committee on Capital Outlay pursuant to the reporting requirements of R.S.
39:105 and R.S. 39:116.
Section 7. The commissioner of administration, with the approval of the Joint
Legislative Committee on the Budget, is authorized to supplement or substitute the
appropriations specified in this or previous capital outlay acts with any federal or other funds
which are or may become available and such funds shall be deemed appropriated in specific
amounts necessary for the purposes of this Act. Any funds received by the State Bond
Commission as a result of a prepayment of reimbursement contracts as authorized by law
and the policy and procedure for reimbursement contracts of the Department of Treasury,
office of State Bond Commission, shall be deposited as set forth in such policy and
procedure and shall be deemed available and appropriated in specific amounts necessary for
the purposes of this Act pursuant to the procedure set forth in this section.
Section 8.(A) All projects herein authorized and funded shall be subject to the
provisions of R.S. 39:101 through 128. With the exception of appropriations made to the
Department of Military Affairs, the Legislature, the Louisiana Stadium and Exposition
District, the Department of Economic Development, the Coastal Protection and Restoration
Authority, the Division of Administration for Supplemental State Funds for Local
Government Assistance Program, the Division of Administration for the Community Water
Enrichment Program, the Department of Transportation and Development, or the Office of
Louisiana Highway Construction, all funds herein appropriated shall be considered as having
been appropriated directly to the Office of Facility Planning and Control, Division of
Administration. All cooperative endeavor agreements for non-state entities shall be prepared
by the appropriate administering agency and submitted to the office of State Procurement
for review and approval. As part of its review, the office of State Procurement shall consult
with bond counsel to the State relative to any federal tax issues.
(1) Notwithstanding anything contained in this act to the contrary or any other
provision of law, the appropriations made for the Louisiana Stadium and Exposition District
shall be appropriated directly to the Louisiana Stadium and Exposition District, and are
public purposes pursuant to the provisions of Article VII, Section 14 of the Constitution of
Louisiana primarily for economic development, including the generation of tax revenue,
creation of jobs, and the generation of tourism, and may be used to reimburse any
Page 152 of 174

HB NO. 2 ENROLLED
expenditure made prior to the granting of a line of credit or the sale of bonds by the State
Bond Commission, determination by the State Treasurer that cash funding has been
deposited in the Comprehensive Capital Outlay Escrow Account for the project.
(2) Further, with respect to appropriations to the Louisiana Stadium and
Exposition District for the TPC Louisiana, Planning and Construction project, the Louisiana
Stadium and Exposition District shall be permitted to use alternative competitive
procurement and delivery methods for the award of any contracts to be funded through such
appropriation.
(3) The Louisiana Stadium and Exposition District shall have the authority to
directly appoint a design professional from a list of a minimum of three architectural firms
or joint ventures with professional sports facility design experience acceptable to the
Commissioner of Administration and shall be exempt from other state requirements for
selection of designers. The design professional fee shall be in accordance with state
guidelines administered by the Office of Facility Planning and Control, Division of
Administration.
(B)(1)(a) Funds appropriated in the Capital Outlay Act under the name of non-
state entities shall be administered by the Office of Facility Planning and Control, Division
of Administration under cooperative endeavor agreements; however, projects involving state
or federal highways may be administered by the Department of Transportation and
Development, if appropriate. Except as provided in Section 8(A), cooperative endeavor
agreements entered into pursuant to appropriations in this Act shall not be required to be
submitted to the Division of Administration, Office of State Procurement.
(b) Further, for all projects in the Capital Outlay Act or a previous Capital
Outlay Act which are appropriated to the Office of Facility Planning and Control, Division
of Administration, including those administered by cooperative endeavor agreements, up to
six percent of each line-item may be used for costs of administering the projects.
(c) For all projects in Capital Outlay Act or a previous Capital Outlay Act
appropriated to the Department of Transportation and Development, up to six percent of
each line-item may be used for costs of administering the projects, or for field
engineering/construction supervision.
Page 153 of 174

HB NO. 2 ENROLLED
(d) For all projects in Capital Outlay Act or a previous Capital Outlay Act
appropriated to the Office of Louisiana Highway Construction, up to six percent of each
line-item may be used for costs of administering the projects, or for field
engineering/construction supervision.
(2) Notwithstanding anything in this Act, or a previous Capital Outlay Act, the
Office of Facility Planning and Control may enter into a cooperative endeavor agreement
with the Archdiocese of New Orleans and Jefferson Parish for the Preservation and
Restoration of Historic Structure for Hope Haven/Madonna Manor Campus, Planning and
Construction project.
(C) Line-item general obligation bond projects appropriated to the Department
of Transportation and Development in the Capital Outlay Act or a previous Capital Outlay
Act shall be authorized to draw Transportation Trust Funds from the Highway Program
appropriation, for supplemental funding on overruns in excess of the original estimated
project cost as determined by the Department of Transportation and Development, provided
however that said projects are in the state or federal highway system and in the priority
program, and the overrun is less than $50,000. Any such overrun of $50,000 or more must
be approved by the Joint Legislative Committee on the Budget.
(D) All ports, levee districts and other non-state entities must follow the
provisions of R.S. 39:122.
(E) Pursuant to R.S. 39:122(B)(2), funds to be reimbursed by the state which a
non-state entity attempts to obligate prior to the receipt of funding shall not be eligible for
reimbursement or payment by the state; however,
(1) Notwithstanding anything in this Act or any previous Capital Outlay Acts
to the contrary, contracts may be entered into for the Lafayette Economic Development
Authority, Lafayette Innovation Center (Lafayette) prior to the receipt of funding and the
State is authorized to financially participate in obligations created by such contracts.
(2) Notwithstanding anything contained in this Act or any other provision of law,
Lafayette Parish is authorized to execute contracts for all of Phase 1 and Phase 2 work that
includes the contract for Pre-Construction Services and Amendment No. 1 through
Amendment No. 9 for WBS Number F.50000897 for the Bayou Vermilion Flood Control
project prior to execution of a cooperative endeavor agreement, the granting of a line of
Page 154 of 174

HB NO. 2 ENROLLED
credit or the sale of bonds. Phase 1 and Phase 2 work that includes the contract for
Pre-Construction Services and Amendment No. 1 through Amendment No. 9 for WBS
Number F.50000897 for the Bayou Vermilion Flood Control project shall be exempt from
the requirements of R.S. 39:126. The appropriation for this project may be used to pay any
obligation incurred or to reimburse any expenditure made pursuant to such contracts unless
the Commissioner of Administration is advised by bond counsel to the state that such may
violate federal tax law. The office of facility planning and control shall consult with bond
counsel to the State relative to any federal tax issues.
(3) Notwithstanding anything contained in this Act or any other provision of law,
Lafayette Parish is authorized to execute contracts for the Parish Government Complex,
Parish Courthouse project prior to execution of a cooperative endeavor agreement, the
granting of a line of credit, or the sale of bonds. The appropriation for this project may be
used to pay any obligation incurred or to reimburse any expenditure made pursuant to such
contracts unless the Commissioner of Administration is advised by bond counsel to the state
that such may violate federal tax law. The office of facility planning and control shall consult
with bond counsel to the State relative to any federal tax issues.
(4) Notwithstanding anything contained in this Act or any previous Capital
Outlay Act or any provision of law to the contrary, contracts may be entered into for the
Acadia Parish, Street Improvements of Hains Road project prior to receipt of concurrence
by the Office of Facility Planning and Control and are excepted from bid opening extensions
associated with addenda to bidding documents and the state is authorized to financially
participate in obligations created for such project.
(5) Notwithstanding anything contained in this Act or any other provision of law,
the Port of Lake Charles is authorized to execute contracts for the Berths 4, 5, and 6 Wharf
and Shed Reconstruction at City Docks project prior to the granting of a line of credit or the
sale of bonds. The appropriation for this project may be used to pay any obligation incurred
or to reimburse any expenditure made pursuant to such contracts unless the Commissioner
of Administration is advised by bond counsel to the state that such may violate federal tax
law. The office of facility planning and control shall consult with bond counsel to the State
relative to any federal tax issues.
Page 155 of 174

HB NO. 2 ENROLLED
(6) Notwithstanding anything contained in this Act or any previous Capital
Outlay Act or any provision of law to the contrary, contracts may be entered into for the City
of Slidell, Sewer Lift Station Upgrades at Grafton Dr. (PS 312), Breckenridge (PS 252), and
LaQuinta/Cracker Barrel (PS 202) project prior to receipt of concurrence by the Office of
Facility Planning and Control and are excepted from bid opening extensions associated with
addenda to bidding documents and the state is authorized to financially participate in
obligations created for such project.
(7) Notwithstanding anything contained in this Act or any previous Capital
Outlay Act or any provision of law to the contrary, contracts may be entered into for the
YMCA of Northwest Louisiana, Youth Sports Construction project prior to receipt of
concurrence by the Office of Facility Planning and Control and the state is authorized to
financially participate in obligations created for such project.
(F) Pursuant to R.S. 39:112(E)(2), non-state entity projects shall require a match
for each appropriation in this act; however,
(1) Notwithstanding anything contained in this Act, any prior Capital Outlay
Acts, any other provision of law, or the provisions of R.S. 39:112(E)(2), the projects for the
City of Opelousas for the Water Meter Replacement and Upgrades and for the Bridge
Replacement and Upgrades shall be exempt for all match requirements.
(2) Notwithstanding anything contained in this Act, any prior Capital Outlay
Acts, any other provision of law, or the provisions of R.S. 39:112(E)(2), the project for
Tensas Parish for the Recreation Facility shall be exempt from all match requirements.
(3) Notwithstanding anything contained in this Act, any prior Capital Outlay
Acts, any other provision of law, or the provisions of R.S. 39:112(E)(2), the project for the
East Carroll Parish Sheriff's Office for the Training and Recreation Center shall be exempt
from all match requirements.
(4) Notwithstanding anything contained in this Act, any prior Capital Outlay
Acts, any other provision of law, or the provisions of R.S. 39:112(E)(2), the project for
Oberlin for the Street Improvements, Phase I shall be exempt from all match requirements.
(5) Notwithstanding anything contained in this Act, any prior Capital Outlay
Acts, any other provisions of law, or the provisions of R.S. 39:112(E)(2), the project for the
Page 156 of 174

HB NO. 2 ENROLLED
Fifth Ward Recreation District of St. Helena Parish for Recreation District Baseball Fields
shall be exempt from all match requirements.
(6) Notwithstanding anything contained in this Act, any prior Capital Outlay
Acts, any other provisions of law, or the provisions of R.S. 39:112(E)(2), the project for
Eunice for Renovations to City Hall/Police Department shall be exempt from all match
requirements
(7) Notwithstanding anything contained in this Act, any prior Capital Outlay
Acts, any other provisions of law, or the provisions of R.S. 39:112(E)(2), the project for East
Carroll Parish for Courthouse Improvements shall be exempt from all match requirements.
(8) Notwithstanding anything contained in this Act, any prior Capital Outlay
Acts, any other provision of law, or the provisions of R.S. 39:112(E)(2), the project for the
Amite River Basin Commission for the Upper Amite River Flood Risk Reduction and
Restoration shall be exempt from all match requirements.
(9) Notwithstanding anything contained in this Act, any prior Capital Outlay
Acts, any other provision of law, or the provisions of R.S. 39:112(E)(2), the project for
Opportunities Industrialization Center Incorporated of Ouachita for the New Education
Building shall be exempt from all match requirements.
(10) Notwithstanding anything contained in this Act, any prior Capital Outlay
Acts, any other provision of law, or the provisions of R.S. 39:112(E)(2), the project for
Gretna Government Complex Parking Lot, Planning and Construction shall be exempt from
all match requirements.
(G) Notwithstanding anything contained in this Act or the Capital Outlay Act
to the contrary or any other Act or provision of law, the appropriations made for the
Executive Department for facilities which promote economic development included in the
Repair, Restoration, and Replacement for Declared Disasters, Planning, Construction,
Renovation, and Acquisition project, and the Department of Economic Development projects
are for public purposes pursuant to the provisions of Article VII, Section 14 of the
Constitution of Louisiana primarily for economic development, including the generation of
tax revenues, creation of jobs, promotion of tourism, and creation of facilities for charitable,
cultural, artistic, educational, social, civic, research, service, economic development
activities, or provide facilities for professional golf events, pursuant to the terms of
Page 157 of 174

HB NO. 2 ENROLLED
cooperative endeavor agreements, including leases and all expenditures of these
appropriations and may be exempted, by the Commissioner of Administration, from all
statutes relative to public bidding, contractual review and the provisions of R.S.
33:9029.2(D) and in lieu thereof be allowed to use alternative competitive contracting
arrangements where the appropriate administering entity submits documentation to the
Commissioner of Administration substantiating that it is in the best interest of the citizens
of the state, due to economic and/or operational benefits, and the necessity to complete the
projects in a timely manner; and, the appropriate administering entity shall have the
authority to directly appoint the design professional from a list of a minimum of three design
firms or joint ventures with the appropriate specialized facility design experience submitted
to and acceptable to the Commissioner of Administration and shall be exempt from other
state requirements for selection of designers, and may include expenditures for computers,
fixtures, furniture, and other equipment as such is deemed to be capital outlay in nature, and
unless the Commissi(ner of Administration is advised by bond counsel to the State that such
may violate federal tax law, may be used to reimburse any expenditure made prior to the
granting of a line of credit or the sale of bonds by the State Bond Commission, determination
by the State Treasurer that cash funding has been deposited in the Comprehensive Capital
Outlay Escrow Account for the project or the execution of a cooperative endeavor agreement
from the Office of Facility Planning and Control, and may be used to acquire land or real
property, the title to which is held in the name of an entity exempt from taxation under the
provisions of 26 U.S.C. 501(c)(3).
(H) Notwithstanding any other provision of this Act or the Capital Outlay Act
or any other provision of law to the contrary, all of the funds herein appropriated to the
Department of Economic Development in connection with projects or programs for which
the Department of Economic Development utilizes a cooperative endeavor agreement to
further economic development as permitted under Article VII, Section 14 of the Louisiana
Constitution, including the generation of tax revenues and creation of jobs, shall be
considered as having been appropriated to the Department of Economic Development, may
be used to reimburse any expenditure made prior to the granting of a line of credit and made
prior to the execution of a cooperative endeavor agreement and shall be administered solely
by the Department of Economic Development pursuant to, in compliance with, and on the
Page 158 of 174

HB NO. 2 ENROLLED
terms contained in such cooperative endeavor agreements without compliance with any other
law, including, but not limited to, the provisions of R.S. 39:101 through 128. Additionally,
all expenditures of these appropriations may be exempted by the Commissioner of
Administration, from all statutes relative to public bidding, contractual review and the
provisions of R.S. 33:9029.2(D).
(I)(1) Notwithstanding any other provision of this Act or the Capital Outlay Act
or any other provision of law to the contrary, funds appropriated for the Economic
Development Award Program project for the Office of Business Development are to be used
solely for capital and infrastructure improvements subject to verification by the Division of
Administration, Office of Facility Planning and Control.
(2) Eligible expenses for Economic Development Award Program funds may
include documented project expenses beginning on the date of LEDC Board approval of the
project and may be reimbursed upon execution of the cooperative endeavor agreement for
the project.
(J)(1) Due to the state's current investment in TPC Louisiana and the financial
support it provides to the PGA TOUR event currently played at said facility, said PGA
TOUR event shall not be played at New Orleans City Park Golf Complex without the prior
agreement of the Commissioner of Administration and the Chairman of the Jefferson Parish
Council.
(2) Notwithstanding the foregoing, the City Park Golf Complex may host any
other golf tournament or event, including but not limited to any other PGA-affiliated or
sponsored tournament or event.
(K)(1) For all projects administered by the Office of Facility Planning and
Control and payable from proceeds of self-generated revenues, funds shall be remitted to the
Office of Facility Planning and Control for deposit in the state treasury at such time as may
be deemed necessary by the Office of Facility Planning and Control in order to cover the
amount of contracts or other project expenses.
(2) Notwithstanding any provisions contained herein or any other law to the
contrary, for projects with other means of financing provided to the administering agency
by interagency transfer, the authority to draw these funds shall remain with the user agency.
Page 159 of 174

HB NO. 2 ENROLLED
(3) Any revenue bonds appropriated in Section 1 (A) or Section 1 (B) of the
Capital Outlay Act shall not be secured by the full faith and credit of the state.
(4) The State Treasurer shall refund to the appropriate source any surplus self-
generated funds, advanced insurance funds received by the Office of Facility Planning and
Control as Interagency Transfer from Office of Risk Management associated with hurricane
damage recovery, and interest earned on these funds, provided the Treasurer's Office is
notified, when these funds are deposited in the state treasury, that the user agency or Office
of Risk Management intends to request a refund of this interest.
(L) Notwithstanding any provisions contained in this Act, the Capital Outlay
Act, or any other provision of law to the contrary, any funds expended by the parish of St.
Mary for the purpose of securing a federal grant, for the Infrastructure Improvements and
Construction of a Welding Training Center Facility at the Charenton Canal Industrial Park,
shall be eligible for reimbursement from any cash line of credit approved for the project.
(M) Notwithstanding anything contained in this Act to the contrary or any other
provision of law, the resolution adopted by the Joint Legislative Committee on the Budget
(the committee) on March 19, 2019 approving State of Louisiana Grant Anticipation
Revenue Bonds, in one or more series, not exceeding $650,000,000, and approving the
related projects and providing for other matters in connection therewith, contains the
following approvals:
(1) The first series of bonds in the original principal amount of not exceeding
$185,000,000 in order to fund the following projects in the following estimated amounts:
Barksdale Project ($61,600,000) and portions of the Loyola Project ($77,600,000) and the
I-10 Project ($30,601,000) with the understanding that the Department has the ability to
manage the actual application of bond proceeds in order to appropriately fund the Projects
and meet expenditure requirements of the Internal Revenue Service.
(2) The second series of bonds for the express purpose of granting the required
contracts in the principal amount of approximately $142,000,000 in order to fund the
following projects in the following estimated amounts: the balance of the Barksdale Project
($16,518,000), the balance of the Loyola Project ($87,500,000), portions of the I-10 Project
($37,982,000) and the Belle Chasse Project ($12,500,000) with the understanding that the
Department has the ability to manage the actual application of Bond proceeds in order to
Page 160 of 174

HB NO. 2 ENROLLED
appropriately fund the Projects and meet expenditure requirements of the Internal Revenue
Service provided, however, the Department of Transportation and Development seeks
approval from the Committee for the issuance of the second series of bonds and all
subsequent series of bonds.
(N) Notwithstanding anything contained in this Act to the contrary or any other
provision of law, the Research Vessel (R/V) Pelican Replacement is deemed to be a capital
asset and the appropriation to Louisiana Universities Marine Consortium (LUMCON) to
replace the R/V Pelican is for a public purpose and has a significant economic impact
providing a variety of oceanographic research missions. Further, LUMCON shall be
permitted to use an alternative delivery method to award contracts for design of the proposed
replacement vessel. LUMCON shall have the authority to select the design professional from
a list of a minimum of two engineering firms or joint ventures with ship design experience
acceptable to the Commissioner of Administration and the selection shall be exempt from
other state requirements for the selection of designers. The design professional fee shall be
in accordance with state guidelines administered by the Office of Facility Planning and
Control, Division of Administration. LUMCON shall further be permitted to use an
alternative delivery method to award contracts for the construction of the proposed
replacement vessel. LUMCON shall have the authority to select the contractor from a list
of a minimum of three highly qualified ship builders/shipyards with relevant vessel
construction experience acceptable to the Commissioner of Administration and the selection
shall be exempt from other state requirements for the selection of contractors. The
construction contract shall be administered by the Office of Facility Planning and Control,
Division of Administration in accordance with state guidelines.
(O) Notwithstanding anything contained in this Act to the contrary or any other
provision of law, the appropriations for Major Repairs for Higher Education Facilities –
Infrastructure, and Buildings Based on Statewide Condition Assessment, Planning and
Construction, in Act 7 of the 2008 Second Extraordinary Session identifying specific
projects for higher education is deemed to be complete, and any remaining residual funds
are hereby authorized to be combined and accumulated to accomplish additional major repair
projects within the higher education systems, as deemed necessary and approved by the
Board of Regents and Facility Planning and Control. At the completion of the program,
Page 161 of 174

HB NO. 2 ENROLLED
Facility Planning and Control shall submit a report to the Joint Legislative Committee on the
Budget concerning the use of the remaining residual funds.
(P) Notwithstanding anything contained in this Act or any other provision of
law, LSU Real Estate and Facilities Foundation (LRFF) is authorized to execute contracts
for the University Lakes Restoration Project to Address Flood Control, Environmental,
Safety, Health and Other Issues project prior to execution of a cooperative endeavor
agreement, the granting of a line of credit or the sale of bonds. The appropriation for this
project may be used to pay any obligation incurred or to reimburse any expenditure made
pursuant to such contracts unless the Commissioner of Administration is advised by bond
counsel to the state that such may violate federal tax law, after execution of a cooperative
endeavor agreement. The Office of Facility Planning and Control shall consult with bond
counsel to the State relative to any federal tax issues. Further, LRFF may use alternative
competitive contracting arrangements with the prior approval of the Commissioner of
Administration.
(Q) Notwithstanding anything contained in this Act to the contrary or any other
provision of law, the USS KIDD DD-661, a World War II era Fletcher class destroyer and
National Historic Landmark, is deemed to be a capital asset and the appropriation to the
Louisiana Naval War Memorial Commission for Hull Repair & Reinforcement,
Superstructure Repair, Interior Restoration & Painting and Docking Cradle Repairs &
Upgrade is for a public purpose and will allow the vessel to continue to serve the citizens of
Louisiana as a proven highly successful tourist attraction, educational institution, military
memorial, patriotic ceremonial platform and documentary/theatrical film set. Further, the
USS KIDD DD-661 the only surviving Fletcher class destroyer in her original WW2
configuration and the restoration project requires special consideration in the selection of a
restoration contractor and in the location and complete identification of the repairs to be
performed. Therefore, the Louisiana Naval War Memorial Commission, through the Office
of Culture, Recreation & Tourism, shall be permitted to use an alternative delivery method
to award construction contract(s) for the proposed repairs and renovations to the USS KIDD
and its cradle. The Louisiana Naval War Memorial Commission, through the Office of
Culture, Recreation & Tourism, shall have the authority to select the contractor(s) from a list
of a minimum of three highly qualified ship builders/shipyards with relevant restoration
Page 162 of 174

HB NO. 2 ENROLLED
experience acceptable to the Commissioner of Administration and the selection shall be
exempt from other state requirements for the selection of contractors. The construction
contract(s) shall be administered by the Office of Facility Planning and Control, Division
of Administration in accordance with state guidelines and all restoration and repairs shall
adhere to the U.S. Department of Interiors’ Standards for Historic Ship Preservation
Projects.
(R) Pursuant to R.S. 39:102, each capital outlay budget request submitted as
required by R.S. 39:101 shall include a detailed project description and justification for each
new project requested; however,
(1) Notwithstanding anything contained in this Act or the Capital Outlay Act to
the contrary or any other provision of law, the scope of the appropriations made in this or
any other Capital Outlay Act for the Pointe Coupee Parish School Board Office Relocation,
Due to Flooding Caused by Hurricane Gustav, Planning and Construction project shall be
deemed to include that the School Board Office is to be Located at 8777 Morganza
Highway.
(2) Notwithstanding anything in this Act, any previous capital outlay act, or
other provision of law to the contrary, the scope of the appropriation for the Port of South
Louisiana Globalplex Terminal Building #71 Upgrade project shall be deemed to also
include similar upgrades for other Globalplex Terminal Buildings and a Heavy Load
Capacity Foundation or Floor.
(3) Notwithstanding anything in this Act, any previous capital outlay act, or
other provision of law to the contrary, monies appropriated herein for the Port of South
Louisiana Globalplex Terminal Building #71 and Other Globalplex Terminal Building
Upgrades, Planning and Construction may be expended for design fees related to the
conveyor system and ancillary equipment that exceed the customary ten percent limitation
on design fee costs.
(4) Notwithstanding anything in this Act, any previous capital outlay act, or
other provision of law to the contrary, the scope of the appropriation for the Port of South
Louisiana Globalplex Dock Access Bridge and Equipment Replacement/Repair project shall
be deemed to also include an Access Road.
Page 163 of 174

HB NO. 2 ENROLLED
(5) Notwithstanding anything in this Act, any previous capital outlay act, or
other provision of law to the contrary, the scope of the appropriation for the Port of South
Louisiana Globalplex Rail Siding project shall be deemed to also include a Rail Spur.
(6) Notwithstanding anything contained in this Act or the Capital Outlay Act to
the contrary or any other provision of law, the scope of the appropriations made in this or
any other Capital Outlay Act for the Pontchartrain Levee District Lake Pontchartrain West
Shore Hurricane Protection, Planning and Construction project shall be deemed to include
Ascension Parish.
(7) Notwithstanding anything contained in this Act or the Capital Act to the
contrary or any other provision of law, the scope of the appropriation made in this or any
other Capital Outlay Act for the Statewide Roofing Asset Management Program and
Waterproofing, Related Repairs and Equipment Replacement Program project shall be
deemed to include Peltier Hall at Nicholls State University.
(8) Notwithstanding anything contained in this Act or the Capital Act to the
contrary or any other provision of law, the scope of the appropriation made in this or any
other Capital Outlay Act for the Longview Road Improvements, Beauregard Parish Police
Jury project shall be deemed to include Longville Road Improvements for the Beauregard
Parish Police Jury.
(9) Notwithstanding anything contained in this Act or the Capital Act to the
contrary or any other provision of law, the scope of the appropriation made in this or any
other Capital Outlay Act for the JESTC Training Facility Improvements project shall be
deemed to include facilities at JESTC to accommodate a less than lethal training program
utilizing mobile virtual training.
(10) Notwithstanding anything contained in this Act, any previous capital outlay
act to the contrary, or any other provision of law, the scope of the appropriations made in
this or any other capital outlay act for the Industrial Park Development project for New
Roads shall be deemed to include underground electrical system upgrades.
(11) Notwithstanding anything contained in this Act, any previous capital outlay
act to the contrary, or any other provision of law, the scope of the appropriations made in
this or any other capital outlay act for the Lincoln Manner Subdivision Drainage project for
Page 164 of 174

HB NO. 2 ENROLLED
Kenner shall be deemed to include 30th Street Roadway and Drainage Improvements from
Loyola Drive to Ohio Street.
(12) Notwithstanding anything contained in this Act or the Capital Outlay Act
to the contrary or any other provision of law, the scope of the appropriations made in this
or any other Capital Outlay Act for the Tensas Parish Recreational Facility project shall be
deemed to include Recreational Facilities at Newellton, St. Joseph, and Waterproof.
(13) Notwithstanding anything contained in this Act, any previous capital outlay
act to the contrary, or any other provision of law, the scope of the appropriations made in
this or any other capital outlay act for the LA 93 Roadway Improvements - I-10 Ramp to
Renaud Drive, Planning and Construction project for Scott shall be deemed to include the
planning and design of the Roundabout at Exit 97 Westbound, Planning, Construction, and
Land Acquisition project for Scott and the planning and design of the Roundabout at LA 93
and Renaud Drive, Planning, Construction, and Land Acquisition for Scott.
(14) Notwithstanding anything contained in this Act, any previous capital outlay
act to the contrary, or any other provision of law, the scope of the appropriations made in
this or any other capital outlay act for the Water and Sewer Line Installation along Apollo
Road Extension, Planning and Construction project for Scott shall be deemed to include the
placement of water and sewer line utilities along the roadway.
(15) Notwithstanding anything contained in this Act, any previous capital outlay
act to the contrary, or any other provision of law, the scope of the appropriations made in
this or any other capital outlay act for the Young's Bayou Enhancement of Channel Capacity,
Planning and Construction project for Monroe shall be deemed to include streams and
contributing tributaries flowing into the Young's Bayou Watershed.
(16) Notwithstanding anything contained in this Act, any previous capital outlay
act to the contrary, or any other provision of law, the scope of the appropriations made in
this or any other capital outlay act for the Central Louisiana State Hospital Relocation to
Pinecrest project for the Office of Behavioral Health shall be deemed to include new
construction and renovations of buildings.
(17) Notwithstanding anything contained in this Act, any previous capital outlay
act to the contrary, or any other provision of law, the scope of the appropriations made in
this or any other capital outlay act for the New Education Building project for the
Page 165 of 174

HB NO. 2 ENROLLED
Opportunities Industrialization Center Incorporated of Ouachita shall be deemed to include
new construction and renovations of buildings.
(18) Notwithstanding anything contained in this Act, any previous capital outlay
act to the contrary, or any other provision of law, the scope of the appropriations made in
this or any other capital outlay act for the New Orleans Emergency Shelter project for Eden
House shall be deemed to include acquisitions, renovations, and new construction of other
Eden House facilities statewide.
(19) The following revisions are hereby made to Act 465 of the 2023 Regular
Legislative Session of the Louisiana Legislature for the purpose of transferring the projects
listed below to the appropriate agency:
(a) Notwithstanding any provisions of law to the contrary, including the
provisions of the Capital Outlay Act, the appropriation to 50/NC2 BATON ROUGE
RECREATION AND PARKS COMMISSION for The Inspiration Center – Howell
Community Park (East Baton Rouge) project is hereby amended and reenacted to 50/R01
BATON ROUGE LAW ENFORCEMENT AND CRIMINAL JUSTICE FOUNDATION.
(20) Notwithstanding anything contained in this Act, any previous capital outlay
act, or any other provision of law to the contrary, the scope of work for the Parish Jail
Improvements for Iberia Parish shall be prioritized with coordination between the Parish of
Iberia and the Iberia Parish Sheriff.
(21) Notwithstanding anything contained in this Act, any previous capital outlay
act to the contrary, or any other provision of law, the scope of the appropriations made in
this or any other capital outlay act for the Lake Pontchartrain West Shore Hurricane
Protection project for the Pontchartrain Levee District shall be deemed to include levee
improvements around the Port of South Louisiana's airport runway.
(22) Notwithstanding anything contained in this Act, any previous capital outlay
act to the contrary, or any other provision of law, the scope of the appropriations made in
this or any other capital outlay act for the Water Treatment Facility, Booster Pump Station,
and Distribution System Improvements project for the City of Franklin shall be deemed to
include necessary improvements at the water treatment plant including the transfer pump.
(23) Notwithstanding anything contained in this Act, any previous capital outlay
act to the contrary, or any other provision of law, the scope of the appropriations made in
Page 166 of 174

HB NO. 2 ENROLLED
this or any other capital outlay act for the Commerce Street Improvements and Utilities
Relocation for the town of St. Francisville shall be deemed to include additional
infrastructure improvements and appurtenances to streets and other areas with connectivity
to Commerce Street.
(24) Notwithstanding anything contained in this Act, any previous capital outlay
act to the contrary, or any other provision of the law, the scope of the appropriations made
in this or any other capital outlay act for the Louis Collier Hall Science Building Renovation
project for Southern University Shreveport shall be deemed to include replacement of the
existing building.
(25) Notwithstanding anything contained in this Act, any previous capital outlay
act to the contrary, or any other provision of the law, the scope of the appropriations made
in this or any other capital outlay act for the Roadway Reconstruction, Eugene Garrett Road
for Winn Parish shall be deemed to include the entirety of Eugene Garrett Road.
(26) Notwithstanding anything in this Act, any previous capital outlay act, or
other provision of law to the contrary, the scope of the appropriation for the Port of South
Louisiana Globalplex Roadway Improvements: Parking Area near Building 60 project shall
be deemed to also include a W. 10th Street Access Roadway.
(27) Notwithstanding anything in this Act, any previous Capital Outlay Act, or
other provision of law to the contrary, the scope of the appropriation for the Port of South
Louisiana Globalplex Terminal Building #71 and Other Globalplex Terminal Building
Upgrades project shall be deemed to also include Improvements to the Port of South
Louisiana Executive Regional Airport.
(28) Notwithstanding anything contained in this Act, any previous Capital
Outlay Act, or any other provision of law to the contrary, the scope of the appropriations
made in this or any other Capital Outlay Act for the C.C. Antoine Park, Planning and
Construction project and the C.C. Antoine Museum and Arts Center, Planning and
Construction project for Shreveport shall be deemed to include the planning, design, site
work, construction, reconstruction, or replacement of a replica or replacement structure for
the C.C. Antoine House within C.C. Antoine Park, including construction at a location
different from the original C.C. Antoine House site.
Page 167 of 174

HB NO. 2 ENROLLED
(S) Notwithstanding anything contained in this Act to the contrary or any other
provision of law, all non-state projects that include water systems in the scope of work shall
also be required to include a rate study as part of the project.
(T) Notwithstanding anything contained in this Act or any other provision of
law, the appropriations included herein identified as "Payable from State General Fund
(Direct) Non-Recurring Revenues" are appropriated for the purpose of making supplemental
capital outlay appropriations for Fiscal Year 2025-2026.
(U) Notwithstanding anything contained in this Act to the contrary or any other
provision of the law, the appropriations included herein identified as "Payable from Interest
Earnings" are appropriated for the purpose of making supplemental capital outlay
appropriations for Fiscal Year 2025-2026.
(V) Notwithstanding anything contained in this Act to the contrary or any other
provision of law, any water/sewer project that submitted by August 31, 2022 for the Water
Sector Program shall be deemed to be submitted timely provided a capital outlay request is
submitted and is otherwise compliant with the provisions of R.S. 39:101 and R.S. 39:102.
Such request together with supporting information and documents shall constitute the
feasibility study required by Article VI, Section 11(C) of the Constitution of Louisiana.
(W) Notwithstanding anything contained in this Act or any other provision of
law, the Port of New Orleans is authorized to execute contracts for the Louisiana
International Terminal Roadway and Rail Improvements, Planning and Construction and the
Louisiana International Terminal, Drainage, Site Preparation and Mitigation, Planning and
Construction prior to execution of a cooperative endeavor agreement, the granting of a line
of credit, or the sale of bonds. The appropriation for this project may be used to pay any
obligation incurred or to reimburse any expenditure made pursuant to such contracts unless
the commissioner of administration is advised by bond counsel to the state that such may
violate federal tax law. The office of facility planning and control shall consult with bond
counsel to the state relative to any federal tax issues.
(X) Notwithstanding anything contained in this Act or any other provision of
law, the Board of Commissioners for the Port of New Orleans is authorized to execute
contracts for the Louisiana International Terminal Roadway and Rail Improvements,
Planning and Construction and the Louisiana International Terminal, Drainage, Site
Page 168 of 174

HB NO. 2 ENROLLED
Preparation and Mitigation, Planning and Construction project prior to execution of a
cooperative endeavor agreement, the granting of a line of credit, or the sale of bonds. The
appropriation for this project may be used to pay any obligation incurred or to reimburse any
expenditure made pursuant to such contracts unless the commissioner of administration is
advised by bond counsel to the state that such may violate federal tax law. The office of
facility planning and control shall consult with bond counsel to the state relative to any
federal tax issues.
(Y) Notwithstanding anything contained in this Act or any previous Capital
Outlay Act or any provision of law to the contrary, capital outlay expenditures by the Local
Government Assistance Program (LGAP) shall comply with the definition contained in La.
R.S. 39:2(9) exclusively.
(Z) Notwithstanding anything contained in this Act or any other provision of law
to the contrary, the Louisiana State University Research Well No. 3 at LSU's Petroleum
Engineering Research Training and Testing Laboratory (PERTT Lab) is deemed to be a
capital asset and the funds made available to the Board of Supervisors of Louisiana State
University and Agricultural and Mechanical College (LSU) for Planning and Construction
of the Louisiana State University Research Well No. 3 at LSU's Petroleum Engineering
Research Training and Testing Laboratory (PERTT Lab) are for a public purpose and will
further LSU's educational mission through the support of research, education, testing and
training related to carbon capture and sequestration, oil and gas production, geothermal
energy, and other subsurface engineering technologies. Further, the complexities of the
research well project and the consortium of partners to LSU involved in the design, supply,
and construction of the research well project require special consideration in the selection
of designers, contractors, a general contractor, and/or construction manager. LSU shall be
permitted to use alternative delivery methods to award one or more contracts for the design,
construction, and/or construction management of the research well project. As necessary,
LSU shall have the authority to select and contract with designers, each will be selected from
a list of a minimum of three (3) entities or joint ventures with well design expertise
acceptable to the Commissioner of Administration and the selections shall be exempt from
state requirements for selection of designers. Where applicable, any fee related to design
shall be in accordance with state guidelines administered by the Office of Facility Planning
Page 169 of 174

HB NO. 2 ENROLLED
and Control, Division of Administration. LSU shall further be permitted to use alternative
delivery methods to award one or more contracts for the construction and/or construction
management of the research well project. LSU shall have the authority to select co(tractors,
a general contractor, and/or construction manager, each will be selected from a list of a
minimum of three (3) highly qualified contractors, general contractors, and/or construction
managers with relevant construction and/or construction management experience acceptable
to the Commissioner of Administration and the selections shall be exempt from other state
requirements for the selection of contractors, general contractors, and/or construction
managers. The contracts related to construction and/or construction management shall be
administered by LSU through a delegation of authority by the Director of the Office of
Facility Planning and Control, Division of Administration, pursuant to a cooperative
endeavor agreement with LSU. The administration of the contracts related to construction
and/or construction management shall be in accordance with state laws and guidelines
applicable to public contracts, with the exception that La. R.S. 38:2212(L) shall not apply.
The Project shall be designed in accordance with industry standards and in compliance with
the requirements of the Louisiana Department of Energy and Natural Resources for well
construction.
(AA) Notwithstanding anything contained in this Act or any other provision of
law to the contrary, the Louisiana Optical Network Infrastructure (LONI) is deemed to be
a capital asset and the funds made available to the Louisiana Board of Regents for Planning
and Construction of the System-Wide Telecommunications Wiring and Equipment are for
a public purpose and will further the state of Louisiana’s educational mission through the
support of research, education, and economic development by providing access to advanced
computing and data services. Further, the specialization and complexities of the
telecommunications wiring and equipment project and the consortium of partners to LONI
involved in the locations of the project require special consideration in the selection of
designers, contractors, and/or construction managers.
The Board of Regents and LONI, through the Board of Supervisors of Louisiana
State University and Agricultural and Mechanical College (LSU), who serve as the fiduciary
agent for LONI, shall be permitted to use alternative delivery methods to award one or more
contracts for the design, construction, and/or construction management of the
Page 170 of 174

HB NO. 2 ENROLLED
telecommunications project. As necessary, LONI shall have the authority to select and
contract with a designer, selected from a list of a minimum of three (3) (if available)
applicants or joint ventures with telecommunications wiring and equipment expertise
acceptable to the Commissioner of Administration and the selections shall be exempt from
state requirements for the selection of designers. Where applicable, any fee related to design
shall be in accordance with guidelines administered by the Office of Facility Planning and
Control, Division of Administration. LONI shall further be permitted to use alternative
delivery methods to award one or more contracts for the construction and/or construction
management of the telecommunications project. LONI shall have the authority to select
contractors and/or construction managers from a list of a minimum of three (3) (if available)
highly qualified contractors and/or construction managers with relevant construction
experience acceptable to the Commissioner of Administration and the selection shall be
exempt from state requirements for the selection of contractors and/or construction
managers.
The contracts related to construction shall be administered by LSU through a
delegation of authority by the Director of the Office of Facility Planning and Control,
Division of Administration, pursuant to a cooperative endeavor agreement with LSU. The
Board of Regents shall also have the authority to approve the scope of the project. The
administration of the contracts related to construction shall be in accordance with state laws
and guidelines applicable to public contracts, with the exception that La R.S. 38:2212(L)
shall not apply. The Project shall be designed in accordance with industry standards.
Notwithstanding anything in this Act or any previous Capital Outlay Acts to the
contrary, the Department of Transportation and Development may enter into contracts for
Southern University – Baton Rouge, Ravine, Bluff and Riverbank Stabilization Project (East
Baton Rouge) prior to the receipt of funding including contracts previously entered into for
planning, environmental, engineering, and other preconstruction services, and the State is
authorized to financially participate in and reimburse the Department of Transportation and
Development for obligations created by and eligible costs incurred under such contracts.
Section 9. Notwithstanding any provisions contained herein or any other law to
the contrary, the provisions of Chapter 17 of Title 39 of the Louisiana Revised Statutes of
1950 as amended, shall not apply to architectural and engineering contracts, administered
Page 171 of 174

HB NO. 2 ENROLLED
by the Office of Facility Planning and Control, Division of Administration pursuant to this
or any other capital outlay act.
Section 10. All funds appropriated herein to agencies administering capital
outlay projects, on behalf of non-state entities, by cooperative endeavor agreements pursuant
to this Act shall be expended within two (2) years from the date of the issuance of the bonds.
Agencies administering capital outlay projects pursuant to a cooperative endeavor agreement
shall notify the non-state entity of the date the bonds are issued within three (3) months from
the issuance thereof. If the funds appropriated herein and administered under cooperative
endeavor agreements pursuant to this Act are not totally expended within two (2) years from
the issuance of the bonds, the administering agency can close the project and recommend
that the reallocation of any unexpended proceeds to any project contained in this Act or any
previous Capital Outlay Acts.
Section 11. Notwithstanding any provisions contained herein or law to the
contrary, the proceeds of revenue bonds to be utilized to fund certain projects authorized in
Section 1 (A) and Section 1 (B) hereof may, in accordance with Article VII, Section 9 of the
Louisiana Constitution of 1974, be deposited in special accounts held outside the state
treasury in accordance with the provisions of any bond resolution, indenture, reimbursement
contract, or other bond or financing covenant which provides for the pledge of such funds
in connection with the issuance of revenue bonds. For all projects administered by the Office
of Facility Planning and Control, Division of Administration, authorized in Section 1 (A)
And Section 1 (B) hereof which are payable from the proceeds of revenue bonds, only the
Office of Facility Planning and Control, Division of Administration, will be authorized to
requisition funds from the special accounts described immediately above, at such time or
times as may be deemed necessary by the Office of Facility Planning and Control, Division
of Administration, in order to cover contract amounts or other project expenses.
Section 12. The governor shall have the power to veto any line-item in this Act.
Section 13. Except as otherwise provided herein, no funds shall be expended on
any highway projects on highways within the state highway system as established in R.S.
48:191 under the jurisdiction of the Department of Transportation and Development unless
and until such project is in the Highway Program, R.S. 48:228 through 232, approved by the
Joint Legislative Committee on Transportation, Highways and Public Works. Pursuant to
Page 172 of 174

HB NO. 2 ENROLLED
R.S. 49:214.6.2(B), no integrated coastal protection construction project shall be undertaken
with funds included in this bill except those included in an annual plan finally approved by
the legislature in accordance with the provisions of R.S. 49:214.5.3. No funds appropriated
to the Coastal Protection and Restoration Authority in this Act as a contribution for a project
cost-share or otherwise, for the national economic development and national ecosystem
restoration components of the Southwest Coastal Louisiana Study shall be used or provided
for the expropriation of property or use of eminent domain, except where such funds are to
be used to obtain property voluntarily offered for project purposes, where at least seventy-
five percent of the owners have voluntarily offered the property, or where the record or
apparent owners have voluntarily offered the property but do not have clear title.
Section 14. The word "statewide" used in place of the specific parish designation
for projects contained in this Act indicates that the project or program is applicable to all
sixty- four parishes in the state. The description of any project in this Act shall be deemed
to include planning, design, master planning, studies, permits, surveys, testing, construction,
land and/or building/improvement acquisition, reconstruction, renovation, repair, right-of-
way and utilities, site and other improvements, miscellaneous/contingencies, lease hold
improvements ultimately owned by the state or a political subdivision of the state, equipment
and other acquisitions, and any other component of the project if such are included or
indicated in the capital outlay request for such projects required by R. S. 39:101 subject to
the provisions of Title 39 of the Louisiana Revised Statutes of 1950. For new construction
or renovation projects, equipment or other acquisitions, which can reasonably be considered
necessary for the facility to be functional, may be deemed to be included in the project, even
if such equipment or other acquisitions are not included or indicated in the project name or
the capital outlay request. When local or federal match is referenced in a project title, but
only a portion of the state appropriation is granted a line of credit or otherwise funded, then
the amount of local or federal match, required to be made available, may be prorated relative
to the amount of state appropriation made available through lines of credit.
Section 15. The provisions, items, and projects contained in this Act are
severable and if any provision, item, or project contained herein, or the application of any
such provision, item, or project, is held invalid, such invalidity shall not affect other
Page 173 of 174

HB NO. 2 ENROLLED
provisions, items, projects, or applications of the Act which can be given effect without the
invalid provision, project, item, or application.
Section 16. Notwithstanding any other provisions of law to the contrary, the state
shall not grant cash lines of credit, or authorize or issue general obligation bonds in a
principal amount in excess of $1,994,431,681 for Fiscal Year 2026-2027
Section 17. As of December 31, 2025 the total outstanding net state tax
supported debt, as defined in La. R.S. 39:1367, was $ 8,502,629,398 ($6,214,189,000
principal and $2,288,440,398 interest). The estimated debt service costs associated with the
$ 574,000,000 of new general obligation bond cash line of credit capacity for Fiscal Year
2026-2027 is $ 42,100,000 annually beginning in Fiscal Year 2027-2028 through Fiscal Year
2046-2047.
Section 18. Notwithstanding any contrary provision of this Act or any contrary
provision of law, no funds appropriated by this Act shall be released or provided to any
recipient of an appropriation made in this Act if, when, and for as long as, the recipient fails
or refuses to comply with the provisions of R.S. 24:513. No recipient shall be considered to
fail or refuse to comply with the provisions of R.S. 24:513 pursuant to this Section during
any extension of time granted by the legislative auditor to the recipient to comply.
Section 19. This Act shall become effective upon signature by the governor or,
if not signed by the governor, upon expiration of the time for bills to become law without
signature by the governor, as provided in Article III, Section 18 of the Constitution of
Louisiana. If vetoed by the governor and subsequently approved by the legislature, this Act
shall become effective on the day following such approval.
SPEAKER OF THE HOUSE OF REPRESENTATIVES
PRESIDENT OF THE SENATE
GOVERNOR OF THE STATE OF LOUISIANA
APPROVED:
Page 174 of 174